Everybody who signed the Geneva Convention on Refugees said that. That's ~140 countries world wide.Yeah, and that's exactly what Merkel said. This very quote is from an interview (and taken out of context) - she was asked if there is an upper limit to the _right_ (to apply) for asylum. And she answered no, there is no such upper limit and there can't be one. She just said what's in the law and in international treaties. You can't blame her for traffickers, rightists, the foreign and local press and so on, twisting this statement completely.

This is like the 800,000 refugees Germany wants to take. Nobody ever said that. What was said, is that the BAMF (the service for migration and refugees) guesses that about that number will come to Germany in 2015 and will be registered.

And most of the other quotes are not less twisted than these two examples.Was sagst Du hierzu? L\u00fcgenpresse? https://np.reddit.com/r/de/comments/3kjy9c/allein_unter_wei%C3%9Fen_eine_reportagereise_durch/

Ich w\u00fcrde da an seiner Stelle keinen Urlaub machen wollen. Leute die vor mir auf den Boden spucken, meiner Begleitung Rassenschande vorwerfen, mich bedrohen und mir Hitlergr\u00fc\u00dfe zeigen tragen nicht gerade zur Urlaubsfreude bei. Und ja, ich h\u00e4tte auch Angst vor direkten \u00dcbergriffen - und das sehr gerechtfertigt. 

Und um Missverst\u00e4ndnissen vorzubeugen - nein, nicht alle Leute im Osten sind so. Aber es gibt es eine recht laute und gef\u00e4hrliche Minderheit, die weder von der Mehrheit noch von der Polizei ordentlich in ihre Schranken gewiesen wird, und das nun seit zwei Jahrzehnten. Kaum eine der Szenen - insbesondere die letzte - aus dem Video ist hier im S\u00fcdwesten vorstellbar, solch ein Verhalten wird hier schlicht nicht toleriert. Wer es dennoch versucht, schlie\u00dft sich damit klar aus der Gesellschaft aus.This was not some particular statement by her, this is part of an interview. If you take something like this as big headline statement (and leave out half of it in addition), a politician can't say anything anymore. And no, deterring refugees is not what the Geneva convention or the EU demands. But well, she also made pretty clear statements about refugees and migrants which can't get asylum here. 

&gt;Complaining about quote twisting means you don't understand the dynamics at place.

The dynamics were that tens of thousands already walked towards Germany and hundreds of thousands were stranded in Europe in places where they couldn't stay. So a decision was urgent. Who is to blame here are all politicians - including her - who didn't  address the problem earlier - it was getting bigger for years and got very urgent already in spring. The UNHCR already pre-warned about this situation for 2015 in 2013.&gt;And as I said above, nothing in the Geneva convention mandates that a country has to take refugees - let alone all of them.

The Geneva Convention combined with the Universal Declaration of Human rights demands exactly that. Only factual reasons could void this obligation. 

For many of the refugees coming to Germany currently, you are correct, because they aren't all Geneva refugees or politically persecuted and are taken voluntarily, or taken because they can't lawfully be expelled. That they can't be expelled is also caused by other countries which do deter refugees and don't fulfill their obligations under international and European law.

&gt;Do you think Germany can build 10,000 houses a day for the refugees? Or be able to digest millions of refugees? Sometimes, a harsh decision has to be made. This is the time.

Well, what kind of decision should that be? To let the people which were mostly already in Eastern Europe starve and freeze there in winter? And destroy the economy of the countries there? What is your legal and humane solution for these people, who were already in Eastern Europe, and for the countries in which they would be stranded?

&gt;Or be able to digest millions of refugees?

The EU is able to digest a few million refugees, yes. We are 508,000 million. And for huge numbers - Germany had 10 million refugees in a population of just 50 million once. And Germany had a refugee population of well above one million just short ago in the 1990s. I don't even want to start to speak about e.g. Jordan or Turkey.Elections don't make a democracy - at least none, like most people today understand it. Oh, the elections will be "free". All groups still left and embracing the then changed constitution, will be able participate.Poe's law is strong on this. There are (sadly even many) people actually believing that.The checkpoints are there to check and register them - not to close the borders for refugees. That's not even legally possible.Yes, this is the biggest problem with such people: having opinion-based facts instead of a fact-based opinion. You can't debate with people, without having a shared factual base.Er meint vermutlich eine Anomie.Das ist falsch. Solange man nicht zur\u00fcck in ein Land kann, dessen Staatsb\u00fcrgerschaft man hat, und keine andere Staatsb\u00fcrgerschaft bekommen hat, bleibt man Fl\u00fcchtling und bekommt z.B. sogar einen internationalen Fl\u00fcchtlingspass, mit dem man in vielen der Unterzeichner-Staaten visafrei reisen kann.

Nat\u00fcrlich kann man dennoch ein Fl\u00fcchtling und gleichzeitig ein illegaler Einwanderer sein.Das sind erstmal keine Einwanderer und es handelt sich "nur" um eine Verz\u00f6gerung der Registrierung und der Daten\u00fcbertragung.Was f\u00fcr versicherungstechnische Gr\u00fcnde denn?&gt;Da ist die Krankenkasse ganz schnell nicht mehr dein Freund und Helfer und es kann teuer werden.

Was hat das bitte mit der Krankenkasse zu tun? Die zahlt erstmal und wenn sie die M\u00f6glichkeit hat, wird sie das Geld vom T\u00e4ter einklagen. F\u00fcr Dich macht das \u00fcberhaupt keinen Unterschied.

Und EU-Ausl\u00e4nder unterliegen \u00fcbrigens f\u00fcr normale Aufenthalte keinerlei Registrierungspflicht.Warum bitte Illegale? Es geht hier darum, dass diese knapp 300.000 Leute noch nicht beim BAMF registriert sind oder die Daten noch nicht \u00fcbertragen wurden. Nicht mehr und nicht weniger.Nein, das sind knapp 300.000 Leute, die aufgrund von Engp\u00e4ssen in der Verwaltung und aufgrund von Problemen der Daten\u00fcbertragung zwischen Bundespolizei und BAMF noch nicht beim BAMF registriert sind. Und das BAMF beschwert sich \u00fcber diese Situation.

Die allermeisten dieser Personen werden noch registriert werden oder sind es bereits provisorisch von der Bundespolizei. Ein Gro\u00dfteil davon wird vermutlich sp\u00e4ter auch Asyl beantragen.Die sind nicht illegaler hier als alle anderen. Diese sind nur noch nicht registriert. Und nat\u00fcrlich sind die meisten davon in Unterk\u00fcnften und werden versorgt.Auch in dem Sammelunterk\u00fcnften sind bei weitem noch nicht alle BAMF-registriert. Die werden dort durchaus versorgt und sind den lokalen Leuten und der Bundespolizei bekannt. Einige verweilen nat\u00fcrlich auch bei Verwandten oder Freuden und verschieben die Registrierung um das Sammellager zu vermeiden.

Es geht hier auch erstmal um die Registrierung, noch nicht um das Einreichen eines Asylantrages. Vermutlich sind da auch einige Leute darunter, die gar kein Asyl beantragen wollen.&gt;Wollen sie denn nicht bleiben? Erh\u00e4lt die Wahrheit nicht wohl Bleiberecht?

Die zweite Frage verstehe ich nicht. Und nein, bei weitem nicht alle wollen dauerhaft bleiben / einwandern. Die letzte Umfrage die ich kenne (ist aber nicht mehr aktuell und war kurz vor der gro\u00dfen "Welle") sagt f\u00fcr Syrer, dass ein Drittel gerne bleiben w\u00fcrde und sich eine Zukunft in Deutschland vorstellen kann/w\u00fcnscht, ein Drittel sich unklar ist und ein Drittel so bald wie es sicher m\u00f6glich ist, wieder nach Hause m\u00f6chte.https://www.jurion.de/Gesetze/GFK/1 definiert die Fl\u00fcchtlingseigenschaft. Durch die von Dir genannten Dinge kann man sie nicht verlieren, diese spielen daf\u00fcr schlicht keine Rolle. Und Fl\u00fcchtling sein, hei\u00dft nat\u00fcrlich nicht, dass man \u00fcberall das Recht auf Asyl hat.

edit: Nur evtl. Missverst\u00e4ndnisse zu beseitigen - ich beziehe mich auf diese: "Wer von einem Kriegsgebiet in einen sicheren Drittstaat reist, der ist ein Fl\u00fcchtling. Wer unerlaubt von einem sicheren Staat in einen anderen reist, der ist ein illegaler Einwanderer." Aussage von Dir. 

&gt;Nein. Anomie ist wenn man zu wenig Eisen im Blut hat.

Ne, das ist ganz bestimmt eine Amnesie.Nun, ich vermiete auch Wohnungen - und ich verlange nicht den maximalen Mietzins, sondern was ich f\u00fcr angemessen halte und gern haben m\u00f6chte. Das scheinen einige so zu machen - in einem Haus mit 120 Parteien haben wir eine Eigentumswohnung - in diesem Haus unterscheiden sich die Mieten (f\u00fcr mehr oder weniger identische Wohneinheiten) bei Neuvermietungen um \u00fcber 50%.

Wenn ich einen Makler beauftrage, preise ich die Maklerkosten in die Miete ein. F\u00fcr einen kurzzeitigen Mieter ist das von Vorteil, f\u00fcr jemanden der lange bleibt von Nachteil.Dann hast Du noch nicht viel ferngesehen. Wahlwerbung ist nicht untersagt, das Gegenteil ist der Fall, den Parteien muss entsprechende Sendezeit gew\u00e4hrt werden. Und die wird selbstverst\u00e4ndlich genutzt.&gt;Plus, you guys really don't have the military needed to do it.

Well, we don't want to put it together and use it. Combined the EU would be the second strongest conventional military force on the planet, in terms of spending alone the UK + France + Germany could reach this second place. In terms of nuclear weapons Europe is number three.If anybody, then it should be Steinmeier, not Merkel. The refugee crisis wasn't fuelled that much by Merkel. The by far biggest part of refugees which now came to Germany, was already in Europe before, either inside the EU, or in the Balkans encircled by the EU. Merkel just reacted to that and quoted the law. And she only fully used the Dublin clause after Hungary already started (violating Dublin-III) sending refugees to Germany.The development of new arrivals in Greece and Italy doesn't seem to have changes much by her statements, about 350,000 arrived alone this year at the shores already before. http://data.unhcr.org/mediterranean/regional.php - the curve is developing like this since spring. If you can blame Merkel and the European leaders for something, then for reacting much too late, and for insisting on Dublin-III for too long. The crisis we have now, was even predicted by the UNHCR for this year already in 2013.Nein. Leider.If it's not the propaganda, and not the focussing on the "Volk"/"Narod" in the GDR and the exclusion of foreigners, then why it is exactly the two valleys of the clueless (T\u00e4ler der Ahnungslosen), in which and around which the far-right parties have the highest outcomes in the elections and where the most assaults on foreigners and leftists happen? And this for 25 years now?Oh, we don't want to give you hard workers and well-educated people back :) We need in particular your doctors here.

But what you tell about economic migrants is just wrong - the biggest part of the refugees crises we see currently, are not economic migrants. That doesn't mean we can and should take them all - but defaming them as solely economic refugees is also a bad move. Even the ones from the Balkans, with the highest quota of economic refugees, are recognized up to ~40% as refugees e.g. in Switzerland or Belgium. They are persecuted for their ethnicity, sexual orientation or victims of blood feuds. That the numbers of recognized refugees from these countries are so different, is because of different laws, Switzerland e.g. accepts blood feuds as a reason and also some of the persecution against the Romani, while e.g. Germany doesn't.Sorry, but let me ask about your nick in this context - do you also see Eichmann as less degenerate and a more just leader?The comment was answering a comment, about the EU countries not having the needed military strength. The EU countries have this military strength, we just don't want to unite it and use it together. Oh, this _Plus, you guys really don't have the military needed to do it._ is ambiguous - I understood it as us EU-people, not as the EU as an institution.Afair, the result was that it was published in the 1950's to 60's in a Swedish magazine. Merkel is born in 1954.&gt;Im Januar waren 600.000 abgelehnte Asylbewerber in Deutschland.

Das ist schon wieder so eine verdrehte Zahl. Diese ist an sich richtig, aber:

* Am 30.Juni 2015 lebten ca. 538.000 abgelehnte Asylbewerber in Deutschland. 

* Von diesen haben 47% einen unbegrenzten Aufenthaltsstatus und 36% einen befristeten, vom Rest ist der Status geduldet oder unbekannt.

* Dies inkludiert alle abgelehnten Asylbewerber, die in Deutschland leben - mit Ablehnungen bis zur\u00fcck in die 80er Jahre. Die meisten haben heute einen ordentlichen Aufenthaltsstatus, einige sind sogar Unionsb\u00fcrger, unter diesen sind z.B. auch 13.000 Polen.

* Diese Leute k\u00f6nnen und sollen selbstverst\u00e4ndlich gro\u00dfteils nicht ausgewiesen werden.

* Diese Zahl hat sich in 2014 um 20.000 erh\u00f6ht.

&gt;Nach diesem Artikel[2] wurden bis zu dessen Erscheinen \u00fcber 10.000 Personen abgeschoben.

Bis Juni diesen Jahres wurden 8100 Personen abgeschoben (und 3150 zur\u00fcckgewiesen).

Interessanter f\u00fcr einen \u00dcberblick ist wahrscheinlich die Zahl der noch aufh\u00e4ltigen Asylbewerber am 30.Juni 2015, die im Verlauf des  Jahres 2014 abgelehnt wurden, davon sind 25.000 noch hier, 18.000 haben das Land verlassen. Unter den noch Aufh\u00e4ltigen sind z.B. auch  2500 von 2600 abgelehnten Afghanen oder 1250 von 1324 Syrern. Der Gro\u00dfteil ist allerdings aus den Balkanl\u00e4ndern.

Quelle: http://dip21.bundestag.de/dip21/btd/18/058/1805862.pdf (die ganze Antwort auf die Kleine Anfrage ist sehr interessant)&gt;Merkel said Asylum knows no limits. Which is evidently wrong.

Merkel said, the _right to asylum_ doesn't have a limit. As an answer in an interview.
In the EU probably yes. This is by the Council of Europe, which has 47 member states. (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Member_states_of_the_Council_of_Europe)&gt;Nope. Just applying the law. If Germany makes exceptions, that's their thing.

That's only True to a very small part. Germany has to make these "exceptions" also because they can't deport to Hungary and Greece,; the ECHR and German courts rules numerous times that the humanitarian standards in Hungary and Greece are too bad, and deportations into these countries are illegal.&gt;How could you deport them to Hungary if they aren't eligible for asylum in Hungary in the first place?

Hungary or Greece are in most cases the first countries they enter the Dublin-III area, so Hungary/Greece is responsible to process the asylum application, and house and shelter them for this time, and if asylum is granted, also afterwards. (I know that this is impossible in the current situation, but that's what is in the treaties). If they are eligible for asylum in Hungary is nothing Germany needs to care about, this is something Hungary has to check; only if the country is fulfilling the obligations of the ECHR (this includes a fair application process and the rule of law) and humanitarian standards is something Germany has to check before deporting.At the moment the European Court for Human Right says in most cases they had to rule about, that deportations to Hungary and Greece are not possible, German, French, Belgian courts ruled similarly. I don't know the current situation for Croatia.

For expelling denied applicants directly back to the Kovoso - this is another situation, because they are send back home, and the application was processed in Germany. If there is no particular hardship in the individual case, they can be (and many are) send back.This is the wrong border, at least if it is not just for migrants/refugees from the Balkans or Ukraine. If they are already in Europe, and the ways back are closed, this means just letting them strand there, and put the burden on some countries which can even less than Hungary care about them.More than 3/4 of the 3 million people with Turkish ancestry living in Germany is believing in this religion and is not running around killing people like you.

Also - religion is not a choice for most of those people, in particular in the countries those people come from.

And according to the rules of which Islam you want to judge them? Then Islam has no hierarchy and hundreds of different groups with in some cases very different and contradicting rule sets  and believes.&gt;Syrian migrants themselves say they come because of Merkel.

Only a small fraction of the refugees which came to Germany, started their trek after Merkel made her statements. Most of them were already in Europe.

The development of the numbers of arrivals over the Med didn't change (much) after Merkels statements, it is rising in the same way since spring: http://data.unhcr.org/mediterranean/regional.phpMost of them from the war in Syria, Afghanistan, Iraq and from undersupplied camps in Jordan, Lebanon, Turkey. Inside Europe from overfilled camps primarily in Greece, but also Italy.

And no, they can't stay in the transit countries, none of them is able or willing to host some hundred thousand refugees. 

Also this shouldn't be the question, because the ones already in Europe can't be send back further than Greece, which already is unable to care about the ones there. So they are in Europe and we have to find a solution for them. Closing the borders in Eastern Europe and provoking a humanitarian catastrophe there in particular in the coming winter, can't be a solution. Having them in camps in Greece might be one, but a very inhumane for the refugees and a very unsolidary one against Greece. And if the situation in Greece doesn't change tremendously one which will  long-term probably lead just to them spreading all over Europe as illegal immigrants.No such laws exist for outer Schengen borders, they can and should be enforced. Such laws exist inside the EU and inside Schengen, inside Schengen borders like we knew them before are more or less illegal.

And this is also a practical question - closing the borders inside Schengen or the EU, even just to the level we had in the 1980's inside Western Europe would be extremely economically damaging (and practically pretty impossible), and even back then the borders were still more or less open aside the dedicated border crossings and the controls there e.g. between France and Germany were already sporadic.&gt;Wrong. A thermobaric weapon contains only the reactive explosive, but no oxygen like a normal explosive. It's usually a powder or aerosol. On detonation, the powder is scattered, mixed with the surrounding oxygen and then ignited. The result is very much an explosion which lasts only for a maximum of a few tens of milliseconds, no burning liquid involved.

These are fuel-air bombs (fuel=any type of ignitable fluids like powders or liquids), and they can also contain liquids, and sure there is in some also burning liquid involved. A typical simple thermobaric explosive is a fuel (in this case=e.g. gasoline) bomb, the fuel is dispersed into a cloud and mixed with the air by a conventional explosive load and then ignited by a secondary conventional explosive, which leads to a deflagration. 

But yeah, the article is still full of factual errors.Von diesen L\u00e4nderen k\u00f6nnen wir nach ECHR-Urteilen und deutschen Urteilen aufgrund der katastrophalen Umst\u00e4nde vor Ort, Fl\u00fcchtlinge aus Drittstaaten einzig nach \u00d6sterreich, Serbien, Kroatien abschieben, wobei die beiden letzteren schon nach wenigen Abschiebungen die gleichen Probleme mit dem humanit\u00e4ren Standard und der rechtsm\u00e4\u00dfigen Abarbeitung der Antr\u00e4ge haben d\u00fcrften. Die meisten dieser L\u00e4nder sind desweiteren weder verpflichtet die Fl\u00fcchtlinge aufzunehmen noch willig. Rechtlich k\u00f6nnten wir vermutlich sowieso nur nach Ungarn, evtl. Griechenland und Syrien abschieben.Der hat der russischen Propaganda auch sehr sch\u00f6ne Interviews geliefert:

_In einem Interview mit dem staatlichen russischen Auslandsradio "The Voice of Russia" zum Ukraine-Konflikt hat Dehm behauptet, Teile der deutschen Medien w\u00fcrden von US-Geheimdiensten kontrolliert._
_Dehm, langj\u00e4hriges Mitglied des Bundestags, sagte dem Radiosender mit Blick auf Deutschland w\u00f6rtlich: "Teile der Medien sind komplett in den H\u00e4nden der US-Geheimdienste und anderer Geheimdienste. Sie arbeiten sehr eng zusammen mit ihnen. Und im Moment wollen manche von ihnen den Konflikt vertiefen und deshalb dr\u00e4ngen die Medien die Regierung."_

[...]

_Die russische Propagandamaschine scheint in diesen Wochen zu einer Form wie in alten Sowjet-Zeiten aufzulaufen, Zitate eines deutschen Parlamentsmitglieds werden dabei gern ausgeschlachtet. Auf der englischsprachigen Website des Senders ist der Artikel zu dem Dehm-Interview so \u00fcbertitelt: "Teile der deutschen Medien komplett in der Hand von US-Geheimdiensten - deutscher Bundestagsabgeordneter"._

http://www.spiegel.de/politik/deutschland/ukraine-dehm-von-die-linke-sieht-medien-von-us-geheimdiensten-gesteuert-a-965010.htmlWell, not donate, but there were a few amputations of limbs done for people suffering from BIID. Correct, BIID is not a psychiatric, but in most cases clearly a neurological disorder, which can be shown by brain imaging. And some doctors haven chosen to treat it with amputation (in the cases I know of, of limbs, not of the eyes). This condition is most often congenital, but some similar conditions  can also be caused by a stroke or another brain damage. The victims often have full perception and function of the limbs / organs, but they are felt as not integrated into their body, as something alien attached to them, being not part of them. This is the first case involving sight and the eyes I hear about, but I think it can lead to even greater suffering, when permanently something alien puts pictures and impressions into your mind, it is even much more intrusive, than having the condition e.g. for a leg.

_In BIID, or apotemnophilia, individuals express a strong desire to have a healthy limb amputated at a very specific location. People with this condition  usually describe the affected limb as being \u201cintrusive\u201d or \u201cover-present\u201d, and report that they have had the desire to remove since early childhood, but do not understand why. This desire can be so strong that sufferers sometimes resort to damaging the affecting limb irreparably, thus forcing doctors to amputate it. The vast majority of BIID sufferers have no other psychological disturbances, and almost always say that they feel much happier when the limb is eventually amputated._

_A growing body of literature suggests that body awareness disorders such as BIID occur as a result of abnormal activity in the right parietal lobe, which is known to be essential for constructing a mental representation of the body. Specifically, this body image is constructed in the superior parietal lobule (SPL), which performs a function referred to as multisensory integration, whereby different types of sensory information entering the brain are brought together. Thus, information from the visual parts of the brain and the primary somatosensory cortex, which processes tactile sensations and proprioceptive information relating to the position of the body within space, is sent to the superior parietal lobule. There, it is combined with information from the motor cortex, which controls movement, and all is processed further to generate an internal model of the body. If these processes are perturbed, the body image is compromised._

http://scienceblogs.com/neurophilosophy/2009/03/27/voluntary-amputation-extra-phantom-limbs/

As far as I know, the most successful treatment for the condition we have currently, which is chosen rarely by doctors because of the ethical dilemma, is still amputation. 

_In 1997, a Scottish surgeon by the name of Robert Smith was approached by a man with an unusual request: he wanted his apparently healthy lower left leg amputated. Although details about the case are sketchy, the would-be amputee appears to have desired the amputation on the grounds that his left foot wasn\u2019t part of him \u2013 it felt alien. After consultation with psychiatrists, Smith performed the amputation. Two and a half years later, the patient reported that his life had been transformed for the better by the operation. A second patient was also reported as having been satisfied with his amputation._

_Smith was scheduled to perform further amputations of healthy limbs when the story broke in the media. Predictably, there was a public outcry, and Smith\u2019s hospital instructed him to cease performing such operations. At present, no hospital offers healthy limb amputations. Would-be amputees \u2013 or \u201cwannabes\u201d, as they refer to themselves \u2013 would appear to number in the thousands. They have their own websites, and are now the subject of a recent documentary._

[...]

_Other forms of asomatognosia concern only the patient\u2019s perception of their body and leave the doxastic component of their body image intact. Oliver Sacks eloquently describes his own experience of this condition:_

_"In that instant, that very first encounter, I knew not my leg. It was utterly strange, notmine unfamiliar. I gazed upon it with absolute non-recognition [\u2026] The more I gazed at that cylinder of chalk, the more alien and incomprehensible it appeared to me. I could no longer feel it as mine, as part of me. It seemed to bear no relation whatever to me. It was absolutely not-me \u2013 and yet, impossibly, it was attached to me \u2013 and even more impossibly, continuous with me."_

http://www.philosophy.ox.ac.uk/__data/assets/pdf_file/0016/1087/amputees.pdf

This is also connected to e.g. Hemispatial neglect (or hemineglect, https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hemispatial_neglect) where people lose the ability to process and perceive one side of the body or environment (but not to sense it). This http://tactustherapy.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/12/leftfood.png is fully eaten up, by a person with hemispatial neglect. When you turn the plate 180 degrees, he'll have another full meal to eat.

_Imagine that there\u2019s nothing wrong with your eyes, but you can only see what\u2019s on the right side of your plate. You start writing in the middle of the page, and sentences you read seem to start mid-sentence. You leave your bedroom with only your right arm through your shirt sleeve and only the right side of your hair combed._

_It may sound fantastical, but this is reality for people with a neurological condition commonly referred to as left neglect. After damage to the right sides of their brains, many stroke and brain-injury survivors are left with this type of attention deficit\u2014and they may not even be aware of it."_

http://tactustherapy.com/what-is-left-neglect/

Oliver Sacks wrote a bit about such conditions, but most literature about them is in the field of philosophy of mind and neurophilosophy, because these conditions pose (and answer) some interesting questions, about how reality, how self- and world-models are constructed and perceived by human brains.BIID is maybe not part of the standards/manuals, but BIID seems to be a condition that is caused by neurological disorders relating to the world- and body-models. The cult for disability and so on, seems to develop mostly, when people are born with these neurological disorders, instead of acquiring them later. 

&gt;there is no such disorder as BIID, so she doesn't have that.

No matter how you call it, there are many thousands of people suffering from conditions similar to hers - most of them related to limbs. And saying a psychological/psychiatric disorder doesn't exist is pretty much bullshit, because they exist when they are described/defined and experienced, both is the case here. If and which name you give them doesn't matter.Would you please define a "real psychiatric disorder"?

Aside the disability fan cult and the sexual part, there are hundreds of cases described in the literature of people who feel a part of their body not belonging to them, as something alien attached to them (while these parts are fully functional). The cases in which brain imaging was done, showed similar differences to the behavior of a normal brain. This seems to be pretty much a real condition, no matter how you want to call it, and if you want to put the label neurological, psychiatric, psychological on it. Probably it is a psychological/psychiatric disorder caused by a neurological disorder.

And I don't know if this particular woman suffered from it, the article doesn't explain her condition well.In a few similar cases with legs and arms, amputations were done after psychiatric and neurological assessments, so I wouldn't rule it out. If this should be done is very disputed and an ethical dilemma. Afaik all patients so far felt healed after the amputations. For more about the conditions, see my other comments in this thread.&gt;What if somebody constructed a machine that could beam at people and give them this disorder? It would take normal, healthy people and flip the little pathways in their head so that they no longer believed parts of their bodies belonged to them. 

Pretty similar conditions are sometimes caused by strokes or other brain damages and were induced experimentally in monkeys. But this: https://www.lakeforest.edu/live/files/1141-colesreviewaprint1pdf is much more interesting and makes me humble. Learning about neglect disorders is interesting and scary at the same time.

_As mentioned by L. Swan, if patients are asked to \u201cdescribe, from memory, a square in Milan\u201d (Swan, 2001, p. 1572), they would accurately portray the right side of the square, but pay no attention to the left side. If then asked to describe the square positioned from the opposite orientation, they would give the new right (the old left) of the square, but pay no attention to the new left (old right) side. Fascinatingly, the entire square is encoded in the patients\u2019 memory. Patients are able to describe each half of the square at different times, yet in a single instance, they can only perceive one half of the square in their memory._

[...]

_The third deficit characterized in hemispatial neglect is that of sensory neglect. Sensory neglect refers to patients\u2019 complete neglect of their left visual and spatial field. This is the most characteristic symptom of the disorder as observed by an outsider because merely standing on the left side of the patient will render one completely out of the patient\u2019s \u201cworld.\u201d A patient with hemispatial neglect may experience sensory neglect to the extent of asomatognosia, or notion that the neglected limb/hemisphere of the body does not belong to her. For instance, \u201cwhen approached\u2026from their left they may fail to acknowledge them or\u2026they may orient themselves to the right and reply with their gaze directed away from the person they are addressing\u201d (Parton, Malhotra, &amp; Husain, 2004, p. 13). An absolute disregard for the left is frustrating for those around the patient, but also for the patient herself since she is equipped with the intellectual knowledge of someone in the room, but unable to verify such information with experiential \u201cfact.\u201d_

[...]

_Additionally, patients who are asked to draw a clock will draw just the right side (numbers 12-6) and feel as if they have drawn a
complete clock. Thus, sensory neglect is used in diagnosing USN as it is the most easily measured symptom._ 

(an example of such a drawing by a patient: http://neuropolitics.org/hemineglect.gif )

&gt;I could say the same thing to you. You're obviously the one with no argument. "I compare a lady making herself blind to people being transgender and I see no flaws in this." You truly are Mr. Logic.

Well, in some respects he is correct. People with such conditions feel these body parts as alien, not belonging them and still being attached to them and in some cases always putting sensory information, which is also alien to them, onto their mind. I think in the case of such alien eyes, this can probably lead to even more suffering than being transgender.

And no, drain cleaner is for sure not the correct treatment. But amputations of perfectly functioning limbs were done in some similar cases. And the patients which suffered all their lives before, feel healed after that and freed of a huge burden.&gt;Do wie really need structures like these? It doesn't seem to have an immediate purpose like a bridge over a river or a deep valley etc. 

That's True for most things. They are not needed. We want them. And I think many people want to see and cross such a bridge and will become a little bit happier by it.

&gt;If you think how freaking expensive those are with so little purpose.

If it only is used for 10 years and the numbers are correct, it's less that 60 ct / use. That's ok, I would pay more than that if there was a fee. Crossing such a bridge is much more fun, than drinking a fifth of a cup of coffee in a restaurant.Jetzt w\u00fcrde ich gerne noch eine Statistik sehen, wieviele der Christen begeistert sind, wenn ihre Tochter einen Muslim heiratet. Und wie gro\u00df da der Unterschied zwischen Sohn und Tochter ist.The toxic substances released vary - lithium is the smaller danger, the big problems are e.g. fluorides and organic compounds released by the burning electrolyte.Bild is an awful source. They are well connected and sometimes really break stuff, but sometimes it's just completely off bullshit. In both cases they often claim to have sources  or to have seen reports. 

In addition, there is this:

_Given family structures in the Middle East, this would mean each individual from that region who is granted asylum bringing an average of four to eight family members over to Germany in due course, Bild quoted the report as saying._

This is just completely off, family reunification is (with few exceptions) for the spouse and kids below 16 (with restrictions below 18). This would mean, that _the average_ refugee coming to Germany has 5 minor kids and a spouse at home.

In addition this would mean that we would see far more than 1.5 million.

So it's a bad source, and it contains passages, which seem to be too inconsistent and too stupid for an official report.

Thus I file this as unconfirmed. Not many get deported, this is the wrong number, deportation is the last (expensive and not very comfortable) step of escalation if somebody is not leaving the country voluntarily after he got an order to do so. 

From the people who got denied asylum last year, 25000 were still in the country in June 2015, 18000 had left. Amongst the 25000 which are still in Germany are e.g. also 2500 of 2600 Afghans and 1250 of 1324 Syrians, which are currently not expelled.Let me add, that these 28,4% include many kinds of reasons for not expelling people, not only accepting them as refugees. E.g. for many people with Abschiebeverbot the status is checked every few months (for subsid\u00e4rer Schutz once a year) and if the circumstances changed, they can be immediately ordered to leave the country.The Syrian Civil war neither caused by drought nor overpopulation. Who believes this, believes something obviously wrong.I posted this comment about the source already in /r/germany:

Bild is an awful source. They are well connected and sometimes really break stuff, but sometimes it's just completely off bullshit. In both cases they often claim to have sources  or to have seen reports. 

In addition, there is this:

_Given family structures in the Middle East, this would mean each individual from that region who is granted asylum bringing an average of four to eight family members over to Germany in due course, Bild quoted the report as saying._

This is just completely off, family reunification is (with few exceptions) for the spouse and kids below 16 (with restrictions below 18). This would mean, that _the average_ refugee coming to Germany has 5 minor kids and a spouse at home.

In addition this would mean that we would see far more than 1.5 million.

So it's a bad source, and it contains passages, which seem to be too inconsistent and too stupid for an official report.

Thus I file this as unconfirmed. Well, Germany has a police force of 293 / 100,000, the US 373 / 100,000. (England and Wales has 227 / 100,000). The world wide median seems to be at around 300 / 100,000.

The US has 0.42% soldiers, Germany 0.23%, the UK 0.27%. (excluding civil employees)

&gt;What if they decide that they don't want to leave? If I remember rightly, Germany has a very small police and military force relative to somewhere like the US. Would you even be able to physically deport them?

So far the majority of the people getting an order to leave the country leave voluntarily, a deportation is expensive and also means being not allowed to enter Germany for a few years, and in some cases being detained for some time until the deportation itself takes place. After they got the order, these people could only stay long term as illegals, and this is by far more difficult than e.g. in the US.It's difficult to calculate the costs - with this article you can probably  make a more informed guess: http://www.zeit.de/feature/refugees-in-germany-deportation-flights-lawsThe EU doesn't accept citizens, but accepts refugees, the ones without papers will have huge problems - yeah, they'll not be deported, if the authorities can't find out who and from where they are - but most of them also won't get asylum and never a work permit, a permanent settlement permit or even citizenship. They also can't be reunited with their families, their education is lost and they can't reenter the country.

It's the duty of the applicant to support the application process, if he doesn't, he'll be denied asylum. With his support, replacement papers can be gotten from most countries, witnesses can be found and so on.Yes, I can't see a Merkel-jump in the numbers of refugees entering Europe for the first time via the Mediterranean: http://data.unhcr.org/mediterranean/regional.php The curve is developing in this way since spring.

What Merkel (and at least as much Orban) initiated was a trek inside Europe, not into Europe.&gt;it's the whole politics and rethorics of Germany leaded by Merkel that causes the huge rise of immigration.

There is no huge, new rise of immigration after the Merkel statements (which you twist pretty badly) into Europe so far. In June: 54,000, July: 76,000, August: 131,000, September: 177,000 came into Europe via the Mediterranean, Merkel made her statements in early September. The huge majority of the refugees which came to Germany after the statements (and after Orban started to sent them unilaterally and in violation of Dublin-III), were already in Europe, inside the EU or in the Balkans encircled by EU-countries.

http://data.unhcr.org/mediterranean/regional.phpI don't see how 1.5 million (which are not even a homogeneous group) can make 81 million a minority. If you think of Muslims in Germany (which are even less a coherent group than the refugees coming now) and all of the 1.5 million would be Muslim and would stay in Germany, Germany would have 6.7% Muslims instead of 5.1%.

But I also don't see why no one culture shouldn't be better than other ones. Sure there are better and worse cultures. Cultural relativism is a pretty stupid idea.Maybe you misunderstood me - these 25000 are not people who can be expelled or were ordered to leave. That's only the case for a fraction of them, which size I sadly don't know. People could also be accepted to stay in the country temporarily without getting asylum - e.g. the Syrians and Afghans I mentioned, which can't be sent back currently, people who are not accepted back by their countries, but also e.g. sick people, families with children who are allowed to stay until the end of the school year, ... 

The big problem is not that we have too less deportations (because the majority ordered to leave, leaves voluntarily), but that the application process is pretty slow, and we had already 250,000 not processed applications in the queue in June.

If you understand German, you can find many numbers in this Kleine Anfrage: http://dip21.bundestag.de/dip21/btd/18/058/1805862.pdf and you'll also see that many numbers swirling through the particular international media are often correct, but out of context or with the wrong description (e.g. often quoted: there are living 538,000 people in Germany to whom Asylum was denied. This is correct. But these are all people to whom ever Asylum was denied in Germany back to the 1980s and before and which are still here - the majority of them with a legal permanent status, some of them are even EU-citizens (e.g. this number includes 12,000 poles)).Germany also still gets significant numbers of refugees from Russia, in particular Chechens.&gt;No significant number is ever deported.

Yes, but this is because the vast majority of the ones which get an order to leave the country leave, or at least leave, when they get a visit by the police and a ticket (which they have to pay when they enter the EU again).&gt; The authorities' report also cited concerns that those who are granted asylum will bring their families over to Germany too, Bild said.

&gt; Given family structures in the Middle East, this would mean each individual from that region who is granted asylum bringing an average of four to eight family members over to Germany in due course, Bild quoted the report as saying.

This is completely bullshit, and makes me wary about the rest of the article. Family reunion is generally only for spouses and kids below 16 (or 18 with restrictions). So this would mean, that _the average_ refugee has a spouse and 5 minor kids. The kids are only able to claim citizenship when they live legally for 5 years in France and are at least 13 years old.I am talking about Germany. And I don't have numbers for orders and how many left on those orders, because this would need complicated calculations. But I can provide some other numbers. 

In 2014 about 10,000 deportations took place. The number of denied asylum seekers living in Germany was going up in the same year by 20,000 (this includes ones tolerated in the country for other reasons).

Of the people whose application was denied in 2014, in 2015 25,000 still were in Germany, 18,000 left. The 25,000 include the ones which are accepted to stay in Germany for other reasons - this includes e.g. 1250 Syrians and 2500 Afghans.

At the 30 June 2015, 50,000 persons which were ordered to leave the country immediately were still living in Germany. In the first half of 2015 more then 10,000 were forcefully deported.

So even if we don't know the precise number, it's much more than 1%.

source: http://dip21.bundestag.de/dip21/btd/18/058/1805862.pdf~~There is no comment from the Government so far.~~ 

edit: __There is a statement by the interior ministry now, which doubts the number published by Bild.__

edit2: __There is now also a statement by a government speaker. He stated, that the government doesn't know  about such a report/prognosis.__

&gt;Does Bild have a history of writing articles where they claim to have seen government documents and it turns out the documents never existed?

No, because they "quote" confidential papers, and sources from closed sessions and so on. This normally doesn't get any comment by the government - neither a positive nor a negative.

Let me give you an example I remember well: Last year in spring, Bild reported about information they got by a source from a closed government session in which was reported about 400 Academi mercenaries being deployed in Ukraine. Academi denied it. Russia claimed it, as she claimed it also before. This breaking story was also parroted by the international media for 2 or 3 days, then it disappeared. I followed this conflict very closely, and but weird rumors from weird sources I never heard something supporting these claims again.

And I don't know if this document exists, probably something does. But that doesn't mean it has the content Bild published. In particular the part about the family reunification shouldn't be in a government report. If it really is, this report as such is bs.

And well, let me quote from their Wikipedia:

_Bild has been described as "notorious for its mix of gossip, inflammatory language, and sensationalism" and as having a huge influence on German politicians. Its nearest English-language stylistic and journalistic equivalent is often considered to be the British national newspaper The Sun, the second highest selling European tabloid newspaper, with which it shares a degree of rivalry._

_Der Spiegel wrote in 2006 that Bild "flies just under the nonsense threshold of American and British tabloids ... For the German desperate, it is a daily dose of high-resolution soft porn". According to The Guardian, for 28 years from 1984 to 2012, Bild had topless girls featuring on its first page; the paper published more than 5,000 topless pictures."_

(https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bild)

Does that seem like a reliable source?&gt;Given family structures in the Middle East, this would mean __each individual from that region who is granted asylum__ bringing an average of four to eight family members over to Germany in due course, Bild quoted the report as saying.

So this is the average for all refugees coming. Sure there can be 4-5 extra in some cases, but for sure not 6 in average. I think you know pretty less about the life of a refugee in Germany. 

No, they are in no way better off than citizens. They have less rights and get a little bit less welfare than Germans, they can only get a job if there is no German or EU-Citizen available for it and so on. And they don't get flats - they get the flats paid, as Germans getting welfare also do. When they are accepted and they want to move out of the camp/refugee home, they have to search for a flat like everybody else (some towns help them coming together with landlords).You are throwing around random numbers you don't seem to understand.

* rejected asylum application doesn't mean you have to leave the country. You can still be tolerated for many other reasons. Also there are two different applications for asylum - for political asylum or as a Geneva refugee in Germany. 

* In 2014 42,000 applications were rejected, of those 18,000 are not in the country anymore in June 2015. Of the 25,000 who stayed, 5450 are from countries to which no deportation is possible (e.g. Syria and Afghanistan), and some are from countries in which probably their life is directly threatened by blood feuds (e.g. 935 Russians). From the Balkans more than half left the country.

* The vast majority is not deported, because deportation is the last and most uncomfortable and expensive way to leave the country. Most people just leave on their own, many others in the second step of escalation alone with a pre-paid train or plane ticket.

* There are no valid statistics on how many people left the country voluntarily, estimations for 2014 are well above 20,000. About 10,000 were deported in 2014. On 30. June 2015, 50,000 people ordered to leave the country lived in Germany.

Source: http://dip21.bundestag.de/dip21/btd/18/058/1805862.pdfThere were 42,000 rejections in 2014, more than 10,000 deportations and an unknown number of at least 13,000 voluntary departures (these are the supported ones, there are no stats for unsupported ones).

But the numbers are not directly related.  Of the rejected ones from 2014, for sure less than 20,000 ever got the duty to leave the country. (see my other comment: https://www.reddit.com/r/europe/comments/3ni2fo/germany_now_expects_up_to_15_million_migrants_in/# )&gt; Nah, they were exciled after WW2 for killing too many non-Germans.

That's a bit of an euphemism. They were forcefully displaced because they were ethnic Germans.America is very different in this respect. In America, the ethnicities are much more separated than they are in Germany. Germany was and is more of a melting pot, while the US always was more multicultural.Source? (I gave you mine, it's an answer by the Government).Did you consider to read my source? It's an original source/the government (Antwort auf eine kleine Anfrage) and not a newspaper or an "Recherchenetzwerk".

&gt;Its actually worse than I originally said. Roughly 185k asylum seekers had no right to asylum, yet only about 20k left or were deported.

This is again a completely different number. And it seems wrong. On the 30.June there were 50,681 people ordered to leave the country living in Germany, not 185,000. The 50,681 is according to the answer by the government and not to some Recherchenetzwerk. See the answer to question 24: http://dip21.bundestag.de/dip21/btd/18/058/1805862.pdf

Maybe the 185,000 is a correct number for something. But not for the "unmittelbar ausreisepflichtigen Personen".

Also "ausreisepflichtig" are not only people with a rejected asylum application.

&gt;You are also wrong about no data on people leaving voluntarily:

I said no _valid_ data. And the government says this:

"Valide Angaben oder Einsch\u00e4tzungen zur tats\u00e4chlichen Zahl der freiwilligen Ausreisen k\u00f6nnen nicht gemacht werden. Zwar liegen aus unterschiedlichen statistischen Quellen in begrenztem Ma\u00dfe Daten zu einzelnen Sachverhalten vor, jedoch l\u00e4sst sich daraus kein konsistentes Lagebild zusammensetzen." --- "Dar\u00fcber hinaus ist es m\u00f6glich, dass ausreisepflichtige Personen ohne jede Form
einer Unterst\u00fctzung freiwillig ausgereist sind und daher in keiner Statistik erfasst werden (k\u00f6nnen)." (Antwort auf Frage 29.)Collaboration by having an ethnicity? Or speaking another language? Collective guilt theories? Or the idea of one crime justifying another one?

And no this is clearly no second holocaust - but it were forced displacements of mostly innocent citizens, which were forced to leave their homes and were robbed of their property. According to the international treaties made short after the displacements, clearly a crimes. &gt;No, that would mean, that the average refugee has 3 to 5 minor kids and a spouse at home. You left out the lower number. Nobody says that the average refugee has to be at the top of the number.

No, I took the average of the two stated numbers - 4 and 8, which is 6. For both numbers it would be an average of 3-7 minor kids and a spouse. Still pretty off.

&gt;With a fertility rate of 2.68, a family with 3 kids seems to be pretty normal.

It is not normal that this is the average for "each individual from that region who is granted asylum", alone 20% of the refugees are kids themselves, and many of the young men have no kids. So for the ones with kids, it would be much higher numbers than 3, even if I take the lower number.Colonists? Yeah, e.g. the Sudetendeutschen in the 12th and 13th century. Since then they lived there. Or for Danzig - the Germans came there with the German order in the 14th century. And the ones we are talking about here in Hungary/Serbia, came in the 18th century.

And collaboration - yeah, that happened. But that happened also often with non-German-ethnicities. And it is for sure no justification for collective punishment or partial or complete ethnic cleansing.

&gt;Don't start me on the innocents caught in the crossfire. The overwhelming majority actively participated in expropriation of land, theft, rape and murder. This is grounds for reprisals, don't act stupid.

No, most didn't. Most of the displaced were women, elders and children, because the men fought for the Hungarian or German army and were dead or detained.Familiennachzug is something different to Familienzusammenf\u00fchrung. Familiennachzug is only possible if the relatives are hosted, paid for and guaranteed for by the inviting relative. (see e.g.: http://www.nds-fluerat.org/infomaterial/syrische-fluechtlinge/syrien-familiennachzug/)

For minor children coming alone to Germany, there is the possibility to get the parents to Germany in the family reunification, and with them probably also siblings.
Yes, because of that I wrote generally. It can include other relatives in cases of particular hardship, if they are the last family member left or if they need care, or if the one in Germany needs care from the relative. But even if these rare cases would happen much more often, let's say one for one refugee, it would still be _an average_ of one spouse, 4 minor kids, and one elder for every refugee. 

I don't think there is a reasonable way to explain the numbers in the article.Yeah, I am pretty much biased against forced displacements of ethnic groups. As the human rights charter, the Geneva conventions and many other international treaties ratified short after the second world war also are.

And I don't even blame the people who committed these crimes in this context. 

But what you do, is telling that the victims deserved what happened to them and it was their own fault. And this is just wrong. The displaced, mostly women and children, were as innocent as most other victims of that terrible times. Being of a particular ethnicity can't make you guilty of something, guilt is something individual and not something collective.Elections are only a very small part of democracy. Freedom of opinion building is e.g. another one. And freedom of political association. And the government being a proxy of the complete people, acting in the interest of the complete people. And many more things.democratically elected (this is already a stretch) &lt;&gt; democratically legitimized

Secular, well, partially:

_Article 3 of the Syrian Constitution_

_The religion of the President of the Republic is Islam; Islamic jurisprudence shall be a major source of legislation; The State shall respect all religions, and ensure the freedom to perform all the rituals that do not prejudice public order; The personal status of religious communities shall be protected and respected._???

You mean I brigaded you by answering to two of your (13) comments? And that brigading you is my job?Hungary is the wrong border - it is in the middle of Europe, between some Balkan countries encircled by the EU and the EU itself. It's not a European outer border.&gt; Until their case gets ruled on they enjoy the same benefits and protections as legitimate refugees.

Yeah, they currently all get a few months of this: http://cdn1.stuttgarter-zeitung.de/media.media.2c90978e-3835-4e77-91f2-a9dec3b2544f.normalized.jpegShe wanted and probably did prevent a humanitarian catastrophe in the Balkans, where these people were already on the trek long before her statements (http://data.unhcr.org/mediterranean/regional.php). And she didn't expect the reaction by Orban just starting to send refugees in violation if Dublin-III to Austria and Germany, which more or less forced both countries to react and suspend Dublin-III officially.This is probably also one of the many reasons why Merkel wanted to take the refugees out of this region and to prevent a catastrophe this winter there.Marking something published by the Bildzeitung - a pretty sensationalist and well connected but also publishing bullshit tabloid -  is only fair.

And the BBC is also quoting Bild as the source, like all other media. 

[now the interior ministry doubted the estimation]You should realize, that without Germany taking them, they would be in one of your home-countries. Only a fraction of the ones which came to Germany now, entered the EU after the Merkel statement, and the number of ones coming to Europe didn't rise more than before (http://data.unhcr.org/mediterranean/regional.php) . And what she said, is that we won't send them back to Hungary, Spain, Italy and Greece, and instead process the application here - not that they'll all get asylum.Can't you just contribute to a European solution for a European problem, like it is the spirit of all European treaties? There's no use pushing refugees around inside the Balkans and ignoring them is also not a solution, that won't make them disappear. These people are already in Europe, and fences between European countries can't change that. Such a behavior is very indecent against your neighbors and against the EU and COE and very inhumane against the people stranded in your region.Yeah, isn't that great. And even if it wasn't Bild - we still wouldn't  know what kind of report it is and by whom.

The interior ministry now also doubted the number in a statement.Merkel made a statement, that Germany won't send refugees which come to Germany from Hungary back to Hungary for humanitarian reasons. This wasn't even factually changing something, because courts in Germany and the ECHR already had decided, that refugees can't be send back to Hungary for humanitarian and rule-of-law reasons. 

Orban did in reaction not even talk to Germany or Austria but just started buses to the border, and didn't register the refugees anymore at all. No - nobody expected this, this is also a clear and intentional breach of the Dublin regulations. And this happened in the course of some hours - Merkel didn't put the refugees on the Hungarian border, they were in the region and inside Europe long before.I remember a war weather report at the beginning of the Iraq war on CNN-i. I only saw it once - probably they recognized that it wasn't a good format.&gt;Because she cant. You cannot deport a foreign person to another foreign country.

She could according to Dublin-III - Hungary is the first Dublin-III country they enter from a none Dublin-III country - so Hungary is responsible for registering, sheltering, processing the applications and sheltering the refugees afterwards if they get a refugee status. That she can't is only because Hungary can't/doesn't keep the humanitarian standards and can't process all the applications, so the European Court of Human Rights decided that such Dublin deportations to Hungary and Greece are not possible at the moment.Well, in this comment I didn't criticize in particular the Hungarian government, but some governments in the region, which aren't willing to find a European compromise solution. This is also Orban, but not only. Hungary is the completely wrong place to close the borders (at least for refugees from the Middle East) - this can't be a solution for Europe. And Dublin-III alone also wasn't ever meant to be one for the situation we are facing now.

We are speaking about different problems here - the refugees which are already in Europe and the inflow. For both EU and/or European political solutions are needed. Most of the ones already in Europe can't be send back outside of Europe. So how to care about them? Start a weird little nationalist pushing around of refugees from country to country? Build fences, that another country has the burden and has to deal with them? Yell at the EU, hey, we don't want them, stop it. Sorry, this is just anti-European and disgusting and disregarding as well the interests and the solidarity with your fellow Europeans and of the refugees. And that Hungary is opposing quotas is even more off and probably mostly populism - Hungary would have a smaller refugee population and more support with any of the proposed quota regulations.

So I just asked to stop this odd nationalist sandbox struggles (which also unnecessarily raises the tensions in the region) and start to get real and back to the EU and the European spirit again and to find a pragmatic and humane political solution for a common problem together. She should have expected that Orban reacts to a statement in a speech, that Germany won't use Dublin-III for Hungary anymore (what was factual done for months before because of court rulings), leads to Hungary sending unregistered refugees to the Austrian border in breach of a whole bunch of treaties just some hours later? I don't think anybody thought this is probable.&gt;a risk factor to only succumb to "the worst possible storm surge in 10.000 years"

This is not a very high risk factor. This means that the chance to experience this in a lifetime is 1/125 (if we don't add a margin of error). This is a 2.5 times higher risk than to die in a traffic accident (about 1/320 today for the Netherlands - in 1970 in Germany it was about 1/40).It's not bad. The EU is by far more transparent than most national governments. 

But transparency doesn't mean, that you'll see things if you don't look at them.&gt;It is the task of politicians to represent their constituents.

Oh, no. It's absolutely not, this would be against all modern ideas of (liberal) democracy. It's the task of politicians to act in the interest of the whole people once he is elected, and not only in the interest of their constituents. 

And it is also part of the job of a politician and in particular the political parties to support the opinion building process, in particular by interaction with the people they represent.&gt;What I mean is if you believe that the distance between a constituent and a representative politician should be small, in order to be more in touch with the needs of the population, then what is hypocritical about being against the EU bureaucracy?

This is can't work in a modern times. There are questions which should be solved on different levels. It's e.g. True, that as well the EU as the Nation states interfere too often in regional questions. But it's also True, that the Nation-states too often interfere into questions that should be answered on a supranational or international level. It's useful to have bodies and politicians on all these levels - from a municipal to a planet wide level. The old style national level is probably one of the least important ones of these.Which studies? And how do they define this distance?I even support this. But I support at the same time that the national states delegate more things to supranational decision makers and elections.Climate change should be addressed at least also on a supranational or better global level. Doing it on a national level is nearly as useless as doing it on a regional level.&gt;EEU would be absolutely fine. We would fence up our borders, like Hungary and all other EEU countries want. It's Germany stopping it.

No, it's the treaties and the common values that's stopping it. That Germany can't Dublin-III deport refugees to Hungary or Greece, is not really a German decision, but was ruled by the ECHR, because Hungary doesn't keep/can't keep the humanitarian and judicial standards. Most of the problems we have now, were produced by insisting on Dublin-III in a situation for which it wasn't meant and can't work for much, too long. To deal with the refugees from the Middle East is clearly a EU, even more a European problem - and the treaty has a rule for that - in the case of a huge inflow of refugees into a member state, the EU should install measures to take the burden of those members. The very idea of the EU is solidarity and a undivisible union of fate, and for people who still embrace the European idea, this also includes the countries which should become members in the future to some degree, and even if not, it's clearly in our interest to have economic and political stability in our greater region. So pushing refugees around inside Europe or even the EU between countries can't be a solution, and it is also a pretty disgusting and inhumane behavior.

I think you have a completely wrong impression of Merkel and of the German conservative politics. They want closed outer borders, they want less or at least controlled migration, they always insisted on Dublin-III (even much too long), they even proposed exactly what you said, about camps abroad. But at the same time, they are also strong Europeans, which say, that we have to deal with  European problems on a European level. And the refugee population we already have in Europe is clearly a European problem we could either solve in solidarity with as well the affected nations as the refugees or we could disregard both and just let them strand somewhere in eastern Europe. 

In September, after Merkel's statement 40,000 more refugees entered Europe, that's the same increase like in the months before. But Germany took some hundred thousand from other European countries, and took the burden of caring for them from these countries which don't want to or are not able to care about them. And what Germany asks for now, is just a little bit solidarity by the other European countries - according to all proposals (quotas by GNI and to a smaller part population), Germany would still have to take by far the most refugees in the EU and e.g. Hungary could even send more of the refugees they now have to care about to Germany. If Germany just insisted that this is not their problem, and that they don't want most would be in Eastern Europe, Greece, Italy and Spain, or somewhere in camps just along the German borders.

&gt;And the refugees already on our territories would get no benefits, no resettlement. They would be housed until such time as the war is over and they can be returned. I.e. the standard international procedure for asylum seekers.

This is not the standard procedure in the Western world. Should we have done that with refugees from Eastern Europe? With the Hungarians? Having them wait for 35 years in camps? Or with all the refugees from the Yugoslav wars? No, the Hungarians were resettled and got a chance of having a decent life in numerous countries. And we also didn't with the Yugoslav refugees, we housed them, gave them benefits if they needed, let them live with us, gave their kids an education, gave them jobs for the meantime. And we sent them back when it was safe again. From &gt;350.000 refugees from Bosnia in the 1990, in 2000 less than 20.000 were left in Germany. (I don't think that sending so much back was a good idea, because it damaged our economy, but that is another topic, and they were also needed again at home. But nobody complains about a country decides to send refugees back, if the danger ends in a reasonable time).

&gt;That's exactly what I want! To get the EU back to its core principles\u2014economy. 

The EU is a peace, solidarity, stability and value Union from the very beginning. The economic intertwining and reach for prosperity are more means than goals. For a current definition, you should read up the EU-Treaty and the Treaty on the Functioning of the EU and your politicians should've told you what kind of club you signed into.

&gt;I want an trade/economic union (single market), absolutely not a political union.

That's a completely different Union than the EU ever was meant to be from the early 1950's on.&gt;Up until the late '90s the EU was so purely about economics that it reached its endgame: to get more economic integration we wanted to drop the border controls as they were a hamper on it (and the EEU states were very much in favour of that too), then we wanted to get rid of exchange rates and get a bigger currency to match the US dollar. But these last two things have political implications too.

Both things, in particular the Euro, were primarily politically motivated and not economically. That we got the early Euro introduction (and also that these regulations are one-way roads), was caused by the fall of the Berlin Wall and the German reunification, and the price Mitterand (also other European leaders, but only Mitterand had the lever of being one of the Four Powers to give Germany finally full sovereignity) demanded from Kohl for having Germany reunified. This was meant to intertwine the European Union even much stronger than it already was and to prevent any national state in the EU from even becoming too strong and too nationalist again, in particular Germany. Both Kohl and Mitterand knew back then, that this is doing the second step before the first, but they believed that a further federalization and in particular also some kind of fiscal union would naturally follow the monetary union.

&gt;We could go back to 'purely' economical, but what would that mean? Seal each others borders again? Remove the euro, everyone is hugely underestimating the costs that would have. Even the Eastern Europeans.

Well, the borders in Western Europe never were sealed like that. Germany had already refugees from Africa before the borders to the west were opened, neither the Spanish-French nor the German-French border were ever borders like the Iron-Curtain, which could prevent individuals finding a way to cross them somewhere between the official crossings.

The Euro is a one-way road. There is no way out of the Euro inside the EU and all countries, which signed the unmodified treaties, have to join the Euro some day. The only way out of the Euro or for not having the Euro some day in the future, is leaving the EU. And this is fully intentional - the Euro is not just some monetary union or economic project, but an important ingredient of the glue that should hold the European union of fate together for the times to come.That's wrong. The number of voluntary departures is unknown. Of the 43000 people which got denied asylum last year, 25000 were still in the country this year in June. But that doesn't mean that these 25000 could be deported - many of them have deportation protection or another legal ground to stay in Germany, amongst these 25000 are alone 5400 from countries to which can't be expelled for obvious reasons like e.g. Syria and Afghanistan. And it also includes people who don't get political asylum, but have a very high risk to be killed at home. And it includes people who are allowed to stay until they or they children have finished a degree. Or people in the middle of a medical treatment which can't be continued at home.

The high number you get, is reflecting another problem - that the application process itself is very slow in Germany, this is a huge problem and it'll get bigger. The number of people living in Germany at June 30th, which had the duty to leave the country were only about 50,000. The high and problematic number are &gt;250,000 which were waiting to have the application processed. But that has no relation to the deportations or departures. All stats show, that most people ordered to leave the country do - voluntary or forced. 

Also it is wrong that currently most are not valid refugees - we have two asylum systems in Germany, Geneva refugees and political asylum.  For Geneva refugees, only less than 10% get their application denied and this huge trek of refugees we see now, is mostly made up by Geneva refugees and not by people asking for political asylum.Sure it's a balance between risk and cost, and I think it's not too much on the cost side. I just wanted to point out, that such huge numbers on the first glance often make risks seem much smaller than they really are.

edit: Let me give you another example - 33/100,000 yearly traffic deaths doesn't say much (that's the 1970 number from Germany). But this means, that if you have 40 friends and relatives, one of them will [probably] be killed by it.Well, I can't see that - 50,000 people which have ordered to leave the country (these are not all denied asylum seekers) lived in Germany on June 30th. ~10,000 people were deported alone in the first half of this year, this is 20% (if the number kept constant). And how many voluntarily left is not in any available stats.

&gt;The fact remains that the najority of rejected sylum aeekers are not deported

Sure, because the have a permit, or because they leave in some of the other ways, e.g. by a supported departure (which is probably the most common way, why should you wait for a deportation without any luggage and at a random time, with sometimes weeks of detention in advance and with an reentry denial for 2 or 5 years for the EU, if you just can get the travel home paid and take your luggage with you). Rejected asylum doesn't mean you have to leave the country - e.g. of the 1200 Syrians who got denied asylum in Germany in 2014, all have either a permit or a deportation protection and can legally stay in Germany. 

&gt;Valid, accepted refugees make up a tiny proportion

Of the Geneva refugees (which currently are by far the most) the quota is above 90% acceptance. For the political asylum seekers (which includes e.g. the ones from the Balkans), it is less than 30%.http://russiapedia.rt.com/of-russian-origin/vytrezvitel/&gt;What kills more people in America, cars or guns? It's cars by a long shot. A really really long shot.

I just wanted to answer this is wrong. But it's only partly. The death rate by guns is 10.64 / 100,000 citizens/year and the one by traffic is 11.6 / 100,000. 

I knew that the gun death rate is that insanely high in the US, but why the fuck does the US have such an insane traffic fatality rate also? (For comparison, Germany is at 4.3/100,000, the UK at 3.5, Poland at 10,9 - I know Americans drive more, but they also drive much slower than we do e.g. in Germany.)&gt;There is no justification for putting forth legislation to force ALL guns, even those not held within homes where children are, behind lock and key. It serve no purpose.

It serves the purpose that the gun is always protected from being stolen or used by any unauthorized party. It may be debatable to not store the guns in a safe, if you treat your house like a gun safe. 

But this would mean gun safe level secure windows and doors, never letting a door or window open and no visitors allowed into the house. 

And I would even go further - the gun and the ammunition should be stored securely apart from each other, like it is law e.g. in Germany. 

And no, Germany is not a gun free zone like many people may think, and Australia also not. We just don't have such an insane number of gun accidents with kids and unauthorized people, because our rules work. In Germany we have 30 (legal) guns/100 resident, Australia has 15, and well, the US 112 (nearly double the number of any other country). &gt;When did this discussion become about securing your guns from being stolen? This entire argument is utterly irrelevant to a discussion about gun safety around children.

No, this part of the discussion was about the safe storage of guns and why it is useful to not restrict this to households with kids.

&gt;Not to mention your argument is about as valid as "Well, your car could be used to kill someone if they stole it. So now you MUST legally lock your car whenever it is not in your immediate possession, else they might steal it and use it to harm someone".

This is actually the case in Germany and many other European countries. You have to lock your car. 

&gt;Any legislation requiring you to put your gun behind lock and key when there are no children present to possibly gain access to the weapon is absolutely useless, the legislation should be limited ONLY to situations where it would be useful.

&gt;If not, fuck off with your bullshit and pointless legislation.

Well, I am happy with having a tenth of the gun related deaths compared to the US. Probably not much - the inhibition threshold for other kinds of fatal attacks is much higher, and for many there is also time while still doing it to stop it.

I don't think the boy had stabbed, beaten to death or strangled her.Ok, let me translate the data from the source (took place from 18.9-25.9.2015, http://www.deutsche-marktforscher.de/index.php/presse/einstellung-der-deutschen-zur-asyl-und-fluechtlingspolitik-Truebt-sich-ein):

Question | East | West
--------------------------------------------------|-------|-------
Is Germany not an immigration country? | 45% | 32%

Question | . | .
--------------------------------------------------|-------|-------
Should hunger and poverty accepted as a reason for asylum | East: 45% | West: 54%
. | female: 54% | male: 50%
.| Germany: 52%
.| Thuringia/Saxonia: 29% 


Question | . | .
--------------------------------------------------|-------|-------
Is the immigration of refugees positive in the light of the demographic change | East: 39% | West: 51%
. | Germany: 49% |
. | female: 54% | male: 43%

Question | . | .
--------------------------------------------------|-------|-------
Is the decision to let unregistered refugees from Hungary into Germany correct | No Germany: 59%
.| No East: 69% | No Bavaria/BW : 55%


Question | . | .
--------------------------------------------------|-------|-------
Should the yearly amount of refugees coming to Germany be limited | Germany: 90% 
.| Education: | low: 93%
.| . | middle, without Abitur: 91%
.| . | high: Abitur or finished studies: 84%

Question | . | .
--------------------------------------------------|-------|-------
Temporary ban on immigration | Germany: 72%
.|  East: 83% | West 69%

Question | . | .
--------------------------------------------------|-------|-------
Reintroduction of border controls | East: 92% | West: 79%
.| Germany: 81%

Question |.|.
--------------------------------------------------|-------|-------
Should the first safe country care about refugees? | Yes: 78%

Question |.|.
--------------------------------------------------|-------|-------
Can Germany afford the immigration of refugees? | No West: 63% | No East: 78%

representative study, Persons above 14 years, n=1011




In September 177,000 refugees arrived in Europe via the Mediterranean. That's about 40,000 more than in the August, but it's  just the same rate of increase since spring. The vast majority of the hundreds of thousands Germany now took came from inside Europe; her statement didn't change the development of the amounts for the Mediterranean in a recognizable way.Temporary border controls on the affected borders are introduced and in action? And they already were before this poll was finished?The AfD itself had at least for most of its time a distinct National Conservative and a (National) Liberal / Eurosceptic wing. This wasn't caused by some reiteration from the outside.Well, Orban also did nothing to address the European problem. These people are already in Europe, so building fences inside Europe (and that even between a EU-member, and a country we like as EU-member in the future), is of no use at all. This is just nationalist and populist Hungarian policy.

And btw. using razor wire against refugees is really demonic. This wire is meant to be mounted out of reach (above 2.2 m height or behind a fence) and is meant to seriously harm or even bleed the victims to death, while it is about as safe against using simple tools to remove it, as any other barbed wire.No, (Geneva-)refugees are often allowed and able to travel - they get an international refugee passport. But they only can only settle, work, or get benefits in the country in which they are registered. Then just remember to be the next Max Schrems when it becomes necessary and there will be one.I am not sure if I understand you, but this poll was taken between  18.9 and 25.9.2015. 

With a population of about 50,000 ordered to leave, &gt;10,000 were deported in the first half of 2015. I wouldn't say this is a small number. This is 20%. This doesn't include supported and voluntary departures, for which no valid numbers exist, but which were in the past the way the huge majority of the ones ordered to leave have chosen.Most of the people she is talking about never were in the Middle East. They were raised in the EU.That we don't accept these people, doesn't mean that they are not persecuted, oppressed or threatened in their home countries. In particular for the Balkans there is the persecution of Romanis and blood feud. In Switzerland, which has different criteria (and e.g. accepts an imminent risk from a blood feud as grounds for asylum), e.g. 37% of the Serbian refugees are accepted, in Belgium it is about the same number, while it is in Germany well below 1%. 

I don't think that we should grant all those people asylum - but for a significant fraction of this group, calling them economic refugees, is just a defamation.This is also True. We have many cases a year, in which single persons ordered more stuff with the intention to never pay it, than this whole refugee center. This is so called "Eingehungsbetrug". (https://de.wikipedia.org/wiki/Eingehungsbetrug). The number of people who just don't pay, but didn't commit a crime by it, is even much higher.

For online shops, the typical quota of finally not paid invoices is about 1-2% in Germany, afair one of the smaller ones in Europe. For some shops with easy to resell products (mobile phones, perfumes, ...) the quota is even much higher.If you had the intention or knowledge that you won't/can't pay, this is a crime - Eingehungsbetrug, punished with up to 5 years jail.

But well, most of the people who don't pay, just can't. That leaves the shops with above 1% finally unpaid invoices.Diese Dame ist momentan auf Marketing Tour f\u00fcr ihr Buch durch alle Talkshows. Und sie berichtet nat\u00fcrlich nur \u00fcber den sehr kleinen Ausschnitt, den sie selbst zu sehen bekommt.Richtig - Abschiebungen nach Ungarn (das w\u00e4re f\u00fcr die meisten des (Wieder-) Eintrittsland in den Dublin-Raum, f\u00fcr Griechenland gilt aber grunds\u00e4tzlich das gleiche) sind wegen der dortigen Umst\u00e4nde (humanit\u00e4re, aber auch Zweifel an der rechtsm\u00e4\u00dfigen Abarbeitung der Antr\u00e4ge) nach einer ganzen Reihe von Gerichtsurteilen, u.a. des ECHR, nicht m\u00f6glich. Und Ungarn lehnte Hilfe um diese Umst\u00e4nde im Land zu verbessern regelm\u00e4\u00dfig ab.Soweit ich wei\u00df, m\u00fcssen Asylantr\u00e4ge auch hier bearbeitet werden, wenn absehbar keine ordnungsgem\u00e4\u00dfe Bearbeitung und menschenw\u00fcrdige Unterbringung im Dublin-Einreiseland gew\u00e4hrleistet werden kann. Dies ist f\u00fcr Ungarn und Griechenland momentan der Fall, f\u00fcr Ungarn sicherlich zu einem relevanten Teil vors\u00e4tzlich.&gt;Auch abgelehnte Asylbewerber bekommen noch Leistungen wie Sozialhilfe, selbst wenn sie die Ausreise verweigern.

Wenn vollziehbar ausreisepflichtige Personen die als Asylbewerber gekommen sind, weiterhin Leistungen nach dem AsylbLG beziehen oder beantragen (die dann nur die Grundleistungen beinhalten und nur bei ca. 60% der Sozialhilfe liegen)  f\u00fchrt das im Allgemeinen zur Abschiebung. Alle Beh\u00f6rden - ausgenommen Schulen und Bildungseinrichtungen - m\u00fcssen Illegale bei der Ausl\u00e4nderbeh\u00f6rde/Polizei melden.Do you even read what you answer to?

These are numbers of the past to see how high the quota of deportations (which is not the normal way somebody ordered to leave the country leaves - there is also just voluntary departure and supported departure) is compared to the number of people ordered to immediately leave the country. (I could have also quoted that Germany deported more than 50,000 in 1994).

Another number might be more interesting - of 43,000 denied asylum seekers in 2014, 25,000 were still in Germany on 30th June 2015, 18,000 had left. Denied asylum doesn't mean that all of them have to leave the country, e.g. 5450 of those 25,000 are from countries to which Germany doesn't deport, e.g. 1250 Syrians. Many others probably are also tolerated. Estimated by this number by far more than 50% of the ones ordered to leave last year have left.&gt;Yeah, it is pretty normal for registry information about all kinds of vehicles (cars, yachts, boats, airplanes, helicopters...) to be open. Also property and real-estate records.

This is international not normal, e.g. in Germany of this information only the property and real-estate records are partially (you can review them, if you have a reasonable interest) open. This reminds me of tanks and artillery, we have witnessed last year firing from churchyards. Do you agree for them also on: "Terrorists be terrorin'"?CNN aired the GOP primary debate for 3 or 4 hours. But well, this is much more interesting (and also funny) for the American audience.I understood pretty well. But your number is just wrong - it's not 10,000 who left, it's 10,000 who got deported. We don't even know how many left (well we know, that it's well above 20k because at least additional 10k used the supported departure). And these numbers must be put into relation with the ones that were here at this time and ordered to leave - not with the ones which will be here someday. The number of deportations has already risen by about 100% in the first half of this year, compared to last year; in the 1990's, when we also had a higher refugee population, much higher numbers - up to 50,000 deportations a year, were common. And e.g. of the 350,000 Bosnians we sheltered in Germany in the 1990's, only 20,000 were left in Germany in 2000 (only small fraction of those 330,000 who left Germany, were deported).Sure, there are some examples - this is one of them: http://www.liveleak.com/view?i=7fa_1404470017&amp;comments=1Nun, dann sind schlicht die meisten Moslems keine Moslems.&gt;Gibt's hier auch Volkswirtschaftler, die ebenjene These, dass entsprechende hunderttausende Arbeitspl\u00e4tze f\u00fcr Geringstqualifizierte nur existieren k\u00f6nnen, wenn der Mindestlohn unterschritten w\u00fcrde, widerlegen k\u00f6nnen?

Wer redet denn hier von hundertausenden Geringstqualifizierten? Alle Zahlen die wir bisher kennen widerlegen das. Und auch pers\u00f6nliche Berichte aus Aufnahmenstellen - diese Leute wollen nichts lieber als weiter qualifiziert werden und z.B. eine Ausbildung machen (und auf dem Ausbildungsmarkt fehlt es vor allen Dingen an einem - motivierten Bewerbern, insbesondere f\u00fcr Handwerksberufe). 

Dass der Mindestlohn den Markt verzerrt ist au\u00dferdem nichts neues, aber dies k\u00f6nnte z.B. auch durch die Einf\u00fchrung eines Grundeinkommens beseitigt werden.&gt;Wir haben in Deutschland keinen Bedarf an unausgebildeten Leuten ohne Schulabschluss, teils Analphabeten (gesch\u00e4tzt 15-20%)

Wenn wir von Syrien sprechen - dort liegt eine Alphabetisierungsquote von 83,6% (2008) vor - allerdings ist diese seit 1981 von 55% angestiegen und seit 2003 gibt es eine 9j\u00e4hrige Schulpflicht. Analphabetismus unter jungen Syrern sollte somit kein Problem darstellen, und die Quote unter denen die hier ankommen, nahe Null sein. In 2010 haben in Syrien 0.088% der Kinder im schulpflichtigen Alter (das sind dort 9 Schuljahre) keine Schule besucht.

&gt;Das ist aber der Gro\u00dfteil der Leute die aktuell herkommen, das BAMF sch\u00e4tzt aufgrund dieser Fakten die Langzeitarbeitslosigkeit auf 80-90%.

Quelle? Ich kann keine solche \u00c4u\u00dferung des BAMF finden - und soweit ich wei\u00df, hat das BAMF noch nicht mal ver\u00f6ffentlicht, welche Leute aktuell gekommen sind (unter anderem, weil es dies selbst \u00fcberhaupt noch nicht wei\u00df, weil sehr viele \u00fcberhaupt noch nicht registriert sind)...

&gt;Die Heilsretter und Doktoren die die deutsche Rente sichern klingt immer sch\u00f6n, die Realit\u00e4t sieht aber anders aus. Genau wie die Bilder von Fl\u00fcchtlingskindern und -frauen wenn +70% junge, m\u00e4nnliche Migranten sind.

Nun, die Doktoren kommen nicht als Asylanten - die k\u00f6nnen Gro\u00dfteils auch so kommen und bekommen ihr Studium mit oder ohne erneuter Pr\u00fcfung hier anerkannt. Aber 70% junge M\u00e4nner, die gerne eine Handwerksausbildung machen wollen und motiviert sind, w\u00e4ren genau das was viele Regionen in Deutschland h\u00e4nderingend suchen. &gt;Die Leute wollen nichts weiter als qualifiziert zu werden bedeutet nichts anderes als dass sie, status quo, geringstqualifiziert sind. Ergo kann auch keine Zahl, die wir kennen, das widerlegen. Also dein Argument musst du schon ein wenig widerspruchsloser machen, damit man auf Basis dessen diskutieren kann.

Nein, das ist kein Widerspruch. Diese Leute haben einen Schulabschluss oder bereits eine Ausbildung und wollen eine hier anerkannte machen. Die Behauptung war, dass hundertausende Geringstqualifizierte kommen (was schon mal nicht stimmt) und das f\u00fcr diese keine Arbeit da ist (was teilweise stimmt, aber nicht mehr wenn diese eine Ausbildung machen und gar nicht direkt auf den Arbeitsmarkt, sondern in den Ausbildungsmarkt dr\u00e4ngen)

&gt;Ein Grundeinkommen l\u00f6st das Problem der Einbettung in globale Wirtschaftsprozesse nicht. Das Grundeinkommen muss eingenommen werden bevor es verteilt wird, und dieses Einnahmen stellen entweder eine Belastung der Firmen oder eine Belastung der h\u00f6heren Einkommen dar. 

Nat\u00fcrlich ist das nur eine Umverteilung - hier ging es um den Mindestlohn und mit einem Grundeinkommen ist ein solcher nicht n\u00f6tig um ein ausk\u00f6mmliches Einkommen zu garantieren und somit sind selbst marktgerechte und marktgeregelte L\u00f6hne von 1 Euro die Stunde akzeptabel.

&gt;Wir hatten das Problem der zu hohen Lohnst\u00fcckkosten schon in den 90ern, wodurch die Agenda 2010 erst n\u00f6tig wurde.

Ob die Agenda 2010 n\u00f6tig und richtig war und ob und weshalb die Lohnst\u00fcckkosten zu hoch waren ist eine komplett andere Frage. Diese Kurve scheint beides nicht gerade zu best\u00e4tigen: http://www.flassbeck-economics.de/wp-content/uploads/2013/04/LStK-DLetEstSlo.gif - Deutschland ist und war eines der L\u00e4nder mit der h\u00f6chsten Produktivit\u00e4t.&gt;"Die Vermittlung der Fl\u00fcchtlinge ist allerdings schwierig, wie das Modellprojekt "Early Intervention" der Bundesagentur zur fr\u00fchzeitigen Integration von Asylbewerbern in den Arbeitsmarkt gezeigt hat. Viele sprechen kein Deutsch und bringen nicht die Qualifikationen mit, die auf dem deutschen Arbeitsmarkt gebraucht werden, oder aber ihre Berufsabschl\u00fcsse werden in Deutschland nicht anerkannt. In dem Modellprojekt lag die Vermittlungsquote lediglich bei zehn Prozent."

Early Intervention ist ein Programm um Asylbewerber sehr fr\u00fch - bereits in der Asylbewerbungsphase - in den Arbeitsmarkt zu integrieren - daf\u00fcr ist ein Ergebnis von 10% nicht schlecht. Und es ging hierbei darum, formal qualifizierte Bewerber in Jobs die ihrem Qualifikationsniveau entsprechen zu bringen - nicht in irgendwelche. Das Modellproject mit allen Kursen und so weiter lief auch insgesamt weniger als anderthalb Jahre.

&gt;http://www.welt.de/wirtschaft/article147049947/Mehr-als-90-Prozent-der-Fluechtlinge-brauchen-Hartz-IV.html

Mir ist nicht ganz klar, was diese Zahlen sagen sollen - dass die Zahl der Arbeitslosen und Hartz IV Empf\u00e4nger aus den Fl\u00fcchtlingsl\u00e4ndern um 20% respektive 23% gestiegen ist und gleichzeitig die Zahl der Arbeitenden um 8%, scheint mehr zu zeigen, dass viele dieser \u00fcberhaupt erstmals in den regul\u00e4ren Arbeitsmarkt eintreten. Ob der Anteil der Arbeitslosen unter den Fl\u00fcchtlingen angestiegen ist, sagen diese Zahlen nicht, sondern nur, dass die Zahl der arbeitslosen Fl\u00fcchtlinge gestiegen ist.

Was man aber sehen kann, wenn man etwas mit den Zahlen spielt, ist das 597.000 Arbeitslosengeld oder Hartz IV beziehen und 492.000 arbeiten. Das ist weit entfernt von 90% Langzeitarbeitslosen und inkludiert nat\u00fcrlich auch die vielen in Hartz IV, die dem Arbeitsmarkt momentan \u00fcberhaupt nicht zur Verf\u00fcgung stehen. (ich halte die ganze Statistik aber nicht f\u00fcr sehr aussagekr\u00e4ftig, da es sich hier einfach um Menschen mit einer bestimmten Nationalit\u00e4t handelt.)Ah, sorry, searching for a better video (the others still around were mostly cut) I missed that this one has no explanatory text.

It's the Transfiguration Church in Slavyansk, the two orthodox don't belong to that church, they are also "occupiers". It's the church where also four people got abducted and later found in a mass grave. (http://fondsp.org/en/read/article/677531 - the two orthodox in the video are standing on the left outside the photo)

I chose this example because it was pretty much debated at the time. And it's not that much about putting civilians in harm - here it is more about probably intentionally attracting counter fire to the church building. But I also remember many other instances, where graveyards or churches were used to fire artillery from.

&gt;Nevertheless there are loads of videos of Ukrainian artillery shelling in Donetsk with no separatist artillery or troops in sight.

Sure, and I don't want to count that up against each other. It's just that back then, this behavior was defended by many pro-Russians, but now when Russia finds the same done by the enemy many cry foul. I don't remember if you ever defended this.Hm, 15-20 years ago, we all got out on Christmas eves at about 0:00; then the pubs and dance clubs opened again. There you met your old friends which also came home to celebrate Christmas with their families, and well, you just got pretty drunk with them. Isn't that a thing anymore?Tanzverbot ended at 24:00 here :)&gt;Keep in mind, you're dismissing the fact that the shelling of residential areas was conducted by the Ukrainian army as something rebels started themselves. While it is possible that some shellings were in fact counter battery, most of them probably weren't.

The only thing I said about those shellings, is that I don't want to count them against other war crimes? I dismissed nothing. That I'm more on the Ukrainian side because I think the insurgents and Russia caused a completely unnecessary war, doesn't mean that I defend how Ukraine lead the war and how they treated and often disregarded their own citizens in the east.


&gt;Where? How about you show us that these scores of "pro-Russians" you claim exist and you aren't making this up? You can't do that, now, can you?

No I can't. This is over one year ago, and these debates from back then are nearly impossible to find again. But why should I make this up? On my twitter lists, I have an extra one for all "pro-xxx" people - I don't (dis)like one more than the other.

I remember pretty well how I got into some long arguments about if this was illegal or not, if it was feasible to shoot from another location, if an occupied church is still a church, or just a cultural building, if a baptist church is a cultural building at all, ...

&gt;You obnoxious Kraut, go astroturf somewhere else.

Oh - that's not very gentle, dear GentleRussianBear ;) 

And lol, me being an astroturfer. But it would be interesting for whom you think I astroturf?&gt;I think one of the biggest problems is on the definition of 'fairly distributed'. What is this? By population? But Portugal and Spain have 16% and 26% unemployment, respectively. By GDP per capita? But then the Netherlands or Luxembourg can, understandably, be afraid of the impact of a substantial % of the population becoming migrants.

The demanded "fair distribution" so far was leaning closely to the German K\u00f6nigssteiner Schl\u00fcssel - that's 2/3 by tax revenue to the eu (that's about the same as you would use the GNI/GDP) and 1/3 by population.

The resulting numbers for the poorer members thus would be pretty low.&gt;Who the fuck cares in which light other countries see us and whether we are the good obedient subordinate EU member? 

If you enter a club and sign the rules, you have to obey to the rules. And that's not obedient, that's just being part of the team.

&gt;he only concern of every politician should be interests of his country and nation, not whether EU is happy or wether France think we are not progressive enough.

Then you should act on your own and not sign into teams, you don't have to obey, but you also won't get the benefits. Being part of a team also means wanting to solve problems together as a team. And to sometimes put your own interests behind the ones of the team, if being a member of the team is an overall gain.Yeah, some people really like the idea to solve this problem in their interest by a competition in whom deters refugees the best.They can learn German, get an education or studies in Germany and work there. They are welcome, they even get much support in all of that. But most people just don't like to leave their home behind. 

Btw. also the Syrian refugees don't - according to a current poll 68% of the ones in Germany want to go home as soon as the war is over, and 90% someday. These numbers will probably be a bit lower, when they really arrived in Germany after some years, but it shows a typical trend, and it were about the same numbers in refugee crisis before - the vast majority wants to live at home. And it's something which clearly differentiates them from a regular economic immigrant.Treat them well, give them a chance, integrate them well, don't let them live in ghettos, but integrate them into your middle cities and rural regions, where they are in intense contact with the population, and you'll never get these problems. 

What is done with fear mongering and inciting against refugees is exactly the opposite and could very well become a self-fulfilling prophecy.

The problem we see in France, Britain and in parts of Germany, are caused by a bad integration policy of the past - these youths were raised here and they are like they are because of the circumstances in which they were raised in Germany, France, Britain, ... and not because of their heritage.And Serbia will hopefully someday be a member of the EU. And all of them are part of Europe and part of the European idea and deserve our particular solidarity (beside that, to have stability in the Balkans is also a very realist geopolitical interest of the EU) - neither they are already members or not.&gt;Like I said in my first post, asylum seekers in Turkey have to wait up until to 2021 to get their application started; in April this year, you can imagine how the situation is now. So practically refugees can't get asylum in Turkey. Is Turkey still the first safe country when they can't stay there?

Turkey is not even part of the Geneva Convention for non-Europeans - they are just tolerating the Syrians, they don't get support according to Geneva there (and with the current amount to provide this also would be impossible for Turkey).&gt;For example nordic wellfare model cannot exist with open borders.

But it has open borders to in comparison very poor countries in eastern and poor countries in southern Europe, which don't have such welfare systems. It's the regulations on welfare and on the freedom of settlement inside the EU, which protect these systems, not sealed borders.&gt;PS:"Borders" are a part of the "nation-being" system.

Not really. The concept of sealed borders, which don't let civilian individuals cross from one country to another, only existed in very few instances and often only for short terms in history. Most of the time a border was just limiting what belongs to one and where the other starts and a place where customs were taken.In rural Germany and in the middle towns, most of the immigrants of the last 70 years integrated pretty well. There are big problems in poor quarters in the big cities - but these problems aren't restricted to immigrants.Did you read the paper: http://www.amnestyusa.org/sites/default/files/hungary_briefing-final-embargo-081015.pdf and not just the briefing? It is well sourced with many footnotes, also to the relevant regulations and treaties. And well, Hungary clearly broke the law in many instances.Direct link to the paper: http://www.amnestyusa.org/sites/default/files/hungary_briefing-final-embargo-081015.pdfIs Guy S. Goodwin-Gill^1 also pulling everything out of his arse? And did you read his paper on article 31(1)/(2) and the complete paper by Amnesty International, which is full of footnotes to the relevant breached regulations? 

&gt;__Summary and tentative conclusions regarding Article 31(1)__

&gt;100. States party to the 1951 Convention/1967 Protocol undertake to accord certain standards of treatment to refugees, and to guarantee to them certain rights. _They necessarily undertake to implement those instruments in good faith._
&gt;101. States have choice of means in implementing certain Convention provisions, such as Article 31, and may elect to use legislative incorporation, administrative regulation, informal and ad hoc procedures, or a combination thereof. Mere formal compliance is not itself sufficient to discharge a State\u2019s responsibility; the test is whether, in the light of domestic law and practice, including the exercise of administrative discretion, the State has attained the international standard of reasonable efficacy and efficient implementation of the treaty provisions concerned.
&gt;102. _Particular attention needs to be paid to situations where the system of administration may produce results incompatible with the applicable principle or standard of international law._
&gt;103. __Refugees are not required to have come directly from their country of origin.__ Article 31 was intended to apply, and has been interpreted to apply, _to persons who have briefly transited other countries,_ who are unable to find protection Article 31 of the 1951 Convention 34 from persecution in the first country or countries to which they flee, or __who have \u2018good cause\u2019 for not applying in such country or countries.__ The drafters only intended that immunity from penalty should not apply to refugees who had settled, temporarily or permanently, in another country.
&gt;104. To come directly from the country in which the claimant has a well-founded fear of persecution is recognized in itself as \u2018good cause\u2019 for illegal entry. To \u2018come directly\u2019 from such country via another country or countries in which he or she is at risk or in which generally no protection is available, is also accepted as \u2018good cause\u2019 for illegal entry. __Other factual circumstances, such as close family links in the country of refuge, may also constitute \u2018good cause\u2019. The criterion of \u2018good cause\u2019 is flexible enough to allow the elements of individual cases to be taken into account.__
&gt;105. _\u2018Without delay\u2019 is a matter of fact and degree as well; it depends on the circumstances of the case, including the availability of advice._
&gt;106. __Although expressed in terms of the \u2018refugee\u2019, Article 31(1) applies also to asylum seekers and \u2018presumptive refugees\u2019.__
&gt;107. The practice of States as evidenced in their laws and in the decisions of tribunals and courts confirms this interpretation of the 1951 Convention. __States have also formally acknowledged both that refugees will often have good reason for moving on from countries of first refuge, and that circumstances may oblige
them to use False documents.__
&gt;108. The term \u2018penalties\u2019 is not defined in Article 31, but includes prosecution, fine, imprisonment, and other restrictions on freedom of movement.
&gt;109. Provisional detention is permitted if necessary for and limited to the purposes of preliminary investigation.
&gt;110. __Article 31(1) obliges States parties specifically to take account of any claim to be a refugee entitled to its benefit.__ This responsibility can be engaged by voluntary act of the individual in making a claim for asylum/refugee status. It may also be engaged by an act of the State, for example, in asserting jurisdiction over the individual with a view to implementing immigration-related measures of control (such as removal or refusal of entry), or instituting immigration-related criminal proceedings (such as prosecution for the use of False travel documents).
&gt;111. Where a State leaves compliance with international obligations within the realm of executive discretion, a policy and practice inconsistent with those obligations involves the international responsibility of the State. _The policy of prosecuting or otherwise penalizing illegal entrants, those present illegally, or those who use False travel documentation, without regard to the_ __circumstances of flight in individual cases, and the refusal to consider the merits of an applicant\u2019s claim, amount to a breach of a State\u2019s obligations in international law.__
&gt;112. As a matter of principle, also, it should follow that a carrier should not be penalized for bringing in an \u2018undocumented\u2019 passenger, where that person is subsequently determined to be a refugee.

[highlighting by me]

http://www.unhcr.org/3bcfdf164.pdf

^1: https://www.law.ox.ac.uk/people/guy-s-goodwin-gill ; https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Guy_Goodwin-Gill&gt;You never replied.

Did I miss that somewhere? Sorry, if I did, I'll do now.

&gt;Why are the refugees not put on airplanes in Turkey and flown to Germany, USA, Sweden Canada and other countries willing to recognize them as refugees as defined in the convention?

Germany did that pretty early (since 2013, also in 2014) for 20,000 Syrian refugees, selected by the UNHCR, these were three thirds of all finally resettled Syrians worldwide. This program was for people who likely can't ever return to their home, or for which particular dangers exist in the camps. Sure this is a better way for resettlement.

&gt;There is no NEED for them to ever cross the border of Hungary ever. The nations willing to take them are fully able to put them on planes in Turkey and fly them.

Well, Germany currently is willing to take a part of the ones which are already in Europe - because of humanitarian reasons, but also because of European solidarity and to take pressure off the regions and countries in which they are stranded, and in which partially are already high tensions and many problems for many other reasons.

&gt;It is insane to promote that these people should come with the smugglers instead of coming on planes.

I never promoted that. What Merkel now did, is finally taking responsibility and taking pressure out of a situation that was partly also caused by her politics of insisting on Dublin-III much too long, by letting in particular Greece and Italy alone with the burden, but also by the International Community and many European countries  not fulfilling their obligations to the UNHCR.

For the crisis we have now, I would like to have a politics that resettles a limited number to Europe, selected by need, but the chance to ever live at home again, but also by the will to integrate and settle permanently in Europe. At the same time building up the camps in a way that not only guarantees survival, but also gives them the necessary means to later have a chance of a decent life and to rebuilt their country. In addition to that, foreign students from these countries should be able to apply in a simplified way and some restrictions should be loosened.

For crisis in which a permanent resettlement is necessary, we need other solutions. It is so far not clear if this will apply to Syria (hopefully it won't), and if so, to how many.That Israel is breaking international law in many cases, doesn't mean anything for Hungary or any other country. That my neighbor beats his wife, doesn't give me the right to beat her also.So Hungary starting to bus unregistered refugees to the Austrian border is not in breach of Dublin? Not sheltering them orderly is also not in breach of Geneva and Dublin? Putting penalties on them for crossing the border without processing and considering each individual case and checking if they had a good cause to do so is also not? Closing borders crossings for 30 days was also not (they stopped that after 3 days, because an international outrage started)? Building alibi transition zones (which are btw. according to the ECHR are a legal fiction and can't be extraterritorial, so the refugees entering them have full rights for application and for access to legal advice and a court), in which there was no orderly legal advise, no sheltering, no humanitarian support by the state and only the possibility for some 2-5 refugees an hour to apply, and people are directly denied without considering individual cases and orderly processing is also not possible (this is btw. also a blatant violation of European Convention on Human Rights rules about the application of the rule of law)? Sending them back to Serbia, which not allows asylum applications for refugees from particular countries, and has a very flawed refugee legislation, is also not? And so on. &gt;Wrt the dang fence: at Hungarian-Serbian border there are places where anyone can claim asylum.

No, there weren't at least until short ago (I don't know the current situation). There were the so called transition zones, which couldn't process a relevant number of them. And the razor wire fence is awful and useless. It's only is another sign of countries pushing around refugees between each other inside Europe and nobody liking really to address and solve the common problem together - to find a good solution for Europe and for the refugees. Every country  telling, but WE don't want them, is of no use at all. They won't disappear.&gt; Maybe I misunderstood but to me it seemed like you are against the protection of borders, against the EU law of Schengen (outside borders must be protected, can NOT be crossed only at BCP-s and only in opening hours). And in support of criminals breaking through the outside border of Schengen.

Sure, I am always for orderly processes. But they must also be realistic and shouldn't break fundamental rules and values in their realization. For the ones already in Europe, which which can't be sent out of Europe again, there must also be the possibility to cross these borders in some way, and to be redistributed in some way. As I wrote in my other comment - pushing them around between Macedonia, Serbia, Hungary, Slovenia, Croatia, ... or even back to Greece, won't make them disappear. Letting them strand in the Balkans is not only bad because of humanitarian reasons, but did and might even more raise tensions in that fragile region, which is fully surrounded by the EU and should be a part of it in the future, and also inside the EU to a much worse degree compared to what we see now. Imagine those regions had to deal with some hundred thousand refugees this winter... This is even a huge problem for Germany which has taken only a part, has a much better administration, a bigger population and is economically much stronger.

And well, for Schengen borders I think, it's impossible to seal them completely today, but sure it should be done better than now. But long term, the only solution seems to be, to lower the motivation of the people who want to come to Europe. I think things like the Agenda 2030 are more important to reach this goal, than trying to completely seal borders; if only a fraction of the 17 development goals (http://www.un.org/pga/wp-content/uploads/sites/3/2015/08/120815_outcome-document-of-Summit-for-adoption-of-the-post-2015-development-agenda.pdf, pg. 12 following the 169 subgoals) is reached, we are much closer to a solution and we might one day in the far future really be able to open the borders.

What people often forget, is that most people want to live at home and want to go back home. Even if they can come legally to Western Europe, and work and settle their, most EEU people, also from the very poor countries, decided to stay at home, or to go back home some day. This is even True inside Germany - many Eastern Germans in economically very weak regions stay there, even without the chance for a apprenticeship or a job, instead of deciding to live in the economically very strong Western German regions. Short, it must be very bad at home, to make a significant part of the population decide to permanently emigrate.&gt;It means you accuse Israel of breaking international law 

Not me, but the e.g. UNHCR  - the very administrative body for the Geneva Convention on Refugee is accusing Israel for its breaches of the Convention for years. Also many of the numerous blatant and permanent breaches of obligations under international law, are not only related to this, but also in relation to the wall and settlements in relation to the fourth Geneva convention were also ruled by the ICJ.

&gt;&gt;Illegal deportations

&gt;&gt;For years Israeli authorities have known UNHCR's position on Israel's systematic deportation of refugees. Michael Bavli, a senior adviser to UNHCR, told the head of Israel's Immigration Administration in 2008 that "deporting Sudanese to Sudan would be the gravest violation possible of the refugee convention that Israel has signed \u2013 a crime never before committed".

&gt;&gt;Sudan defines Israel as an enemy country and has warned that it will punish any of its citizens who set foot in Israel. &gt;&gt;Consequently, human rights groups have said, deportation constitutes a violation of Israel's most basic obligations under international law. According to the 1951 U.N. Refugee Convention, to which Israel is a signatory, Sudanese and Eritrean citizens cannot be deported from Israel.

&gt;&gt;"In deporting people to Sudan, Israel [crosses] a red line and is not only violating its most basic obligation under international law, but demonstrating cruelty, hard-heartedness and indifference to the fate of human beings," Assaf, the Aid Organisation for Refugees and Asylum Seekers, said in a statement.

(Refugees daily: http://www.unhcr.org/cgi-bin/texis/vtx/refdaily?pass=52fc6fbd5&amp;id=518c88b95 )

ICJ Ruling on the Wall:

 &gt;&gt;_ 120. As regards these settlemeilts, the Court notes that Article 49, paragraph 6, of the Fourth Geneva Convention provides: "The Occupying Power shall not dlrport or transfer parts of its own civilian population into the territory it occupies." That provision prohibits not only deportations or forced transfers of population such as those carried out during the Second World War, but also any measures taken by an occupying Power in order to oirganize or encourage transfers of parts of its own population into the ciccupied territory.

&gt;&gt;In this respect, the information provided to the Court shows that, since 1977, Israel has condiucted a policy and developed practices involving the establishment of Settlements in the Occupied Palestinian Territory, contrary to the terms of Article 49, paragraph 6, just cited. [...]

(http://www.icj-cij.org/docket/files/131/1671.pdf)Oh, I think you got me wrong. I just wanted to point out, that borders are only a small part of a barrier against legal immigration into welfare systems. The much bigger barrier are laws and regulations. E.g. that you can't immigrate inside the EU (where the borders are more or less open for most citizens) directly into the welfare system of another country.

Another important point is, that most people like to live in their own home country. Both together is enough to prevent a huge immigration wave from the very poor EEU countries for most of the population groups. E.g. let's take the culturally very close, but economically and in respect to welfare still very different countries of Finland and Estonia - if I remember it correct, there are about 40,000 Estonians living in Finland and about 8,000 Finns living in Estonia. 40,000 is much for a small country like Estonia, but it's not like Estonia would be empty and everybody is living in Finland now.

I think such welfare states can have open borders - but only to countries which are above a particular threshold of "badness" and only with laws preventing direct immigration into welfare systems.To be honest, this 

_...; and one part to the person who shall have done the most or the best work for fraternity between nations, for the abolition or reduction of standing armies and for the holding and promotion of peace congresses._

(http://www.nobelprize.org/alfred_nobel/will/will-full.html)

doesn't really fit for either of them.

But Gore got the price together with the ipcc, which does really great work and in my opinion deserved the prize. That it included Gore, who was more something like a bad propagandist for a good course, and of whom I don't know if he has done more good that bad, is pretty debatable. 

I just looked through the list of laureates, and well, many deserved the prize, in particular the institutions. But are also some debatable and some terrible winners - e.g. Mother Theresa and Kissinger should not be on this list. A fundamentalist person, that didn't treat the pains of her patients, because of her belief and somebody who ended a war, which he had unnecessarily prolonged before and in which he was complicit in many war crimes.After both of them won the prize together?&gt;If one person misunderstands you, then that's that person's fault. If a million people misunderstand, then that's your fault.

Only that she never said something like this. This was an administrative preliminary prediction. This was only misunderstood because right-wing people, traffickers and the international press twisted and spinned it. And they wasn't misunderstood, they just often probably fully intentional, spread this wrong information.That's completely bullshit. She never said something like that. She said in one answer to an interview, to the question if their is a limit to _the right of asylum_, that there can't be such a limit. 

This is German, European and international law.

And she said, in relation to preliminary estimations by the administration for refugee and migrants, that Germany will be able to cope with the predicted number.&gt;Which is of course technically correct, but a very unwise thing to say in a world of a global media landscape where you cannot direct any public message to a specific audience only.

Well, she said that first, in an interview as an answer to a direct question, if there is an upper limit to _the right for asylum_. I don't see how anybody seriously could answer that different. She had to explain, and explained it many times afterwards. You can't really blame her, for people taking this single statement out of a longer interview, making it an headline and spinning complete articles around it. This is a clear fault of the international media, and also of people who intentionally abused this - in particular right-wingers and traffickers.&gt;Some do get through, but just as in Greece and Italy it seems likely that Turkey has no realistic way to hang onto everyone, much less desire to do so.

It has also not the right to hold anybody back. While entry into a country is widely restricted by it's sovereignty, if it's not the own country, leaving any country, also the own, is a fundamental human right.It's some hundred thousands of people in camps. This is not surprising at all. And yes, everything but the far-right attacks, are single isolated incidents. What else is it, if people start to beat each other up, after e.g. some assholes demand money for using the showers in an overcrowded camp?This is wrong. The main shortage is in the field of well educated (and also well paid) craftsmen, and there in particular for apprentices. It's a vast range of jobs from painters to electricians, to turners, carpenters and builders.

These are often jobs which today need much more qualification than in the past - e.g. there are unqualified cleaners - but for professional cleaning of buildings today, you also need some qualified journeymen and masters as foremen (these need a 3+ years apprenticeship+school, much focusing on chemistry, material science, work safety and environmental impacts).

&gt;Most teenagers want something better.

They want something different. I would at any time prefer to be a master craftsman, e.g. a turner, carpenter to working in a bank.For Syrian doctors - afaik they only have to learn the language, the medical university education as such in Syria was on the European level. Medical specialists need to repeat their exams on their field of expertise in Germany. This is about the same for doctors we invite from all over Europe.

But not many Syrian doctors come as refugees. They can just learn German in Syria, and then will get an entry and work permit for Germany.Well, many will go back. The current polls say 68% of the Syrian refugees want to go back home when the war is over, and 90% some day.Lithuanian, Estonian, Latvian, Hungarian, Bulgarian, Spanish, .... doctors come to Germany, learn German and work as doctors. Why shouldn't Syrian doctors (which have a qualification as least on-par with some of these countries) work as doctors here?MDs from Syria have a good education on a European level, and at least in Germany their MD degree is pretty easily accepted. Specialists need to repeat the exams (and internships), but they also do this without much struggles. My ophthalmologist came from Syria in the early 2000's - she needed only 2 or 3 years to get her exams and internship, learn the language and get a bank loan to open her own office.That's only for medical and pharmaceutical fields. For most other fields of study, in particular science and engineering, everybody who applies will get a place.Qualified craftsman journeyman or masters, engineers, technicians get a good to excellent wage in Germany. And if you are motivated and you have the skills, you could start you apprenticeship or studies immediately. People just don't like these jobs and prefer to get an an education in non-technical, non-scientific, non-manual work job. &gt;Syria wasn't even poor to begin with, you could go to university of Damascus or elsewhere, graduate with a useful degree, learn German and apply in germany.

That's what my (btw. excellent) ophthalmologist did about 15 years ago. Yeah, this is ridiculous. These are not immigrants/migrants, these are refugees and political asylum seekers. You can't select them. And that some of them might stay and help with the pensions is just a side effect.

And well, Germany is encouraging people from other European countries. But people like to live at home, and also the other European countries don't like it much, that we take all their qualified or motivated people.&gt; I would rather see her and other reader pressing her allies to stop provoking violence and starting the wars and "revolutions" around the world than trying to force someone else to deal with the consequences.

She and Steinmeier probably did more in the last one and a half year, to prevent much more violence in Europe, than any other world leader. And Steinmeier also played a very important role in many other negotiations, in particular in the Iran nuclear deal.

&gt;So first she forces people of Germany to do what they don't want to do, and now she is doing the same to the rest of the Europe.

Merkel never forced any refugees into Europe or Germany. They were and are here. And they won't disappear. She just doesn't participate in the awful "which countries deters refugees the best" competition, which is nationalist, inhumane and anti-European. The numbers of refugees entering Europe didn't took a significantly different development since her statements, she just allowed in a pragmatic and value based way, to happen, what had happened a bit slower and more inhumane, and with much bigger tensions in the Balkans, anyway. That we can't expell to Hungary and Greece isn't her decision, it's the law, it's the decision of our courts and of the ECHR and caused by the circumstances/conditions in these countries.

And anyway - these people can't stay in Hungary or in the European countries fully encircled by the EU where most of them already were. This would've ended with a humanitarian but also and in particular a political catastrophe.

What you could blame her for, is for insisting much too long on Dublin-III (but well, less long than most others), which isn't made for such a situation. And forcing them on others is not her idea, this is in the treaties: In the case of a huge inflow of refugees into one member country, the council should decide on measures to take the burden off them and share it.You're not alone. There are still some IR-liberals and Europeans amongst us :)

I think there is a massive lack of coverage of the supranational EU and CoE politics and our values in our media but also in our schools, same for global organisations like the UN. Most people have read the first paragraphs of our constitution, not many have read the EU-treaty, the ECHR, the EU Human Rights Charter, the Universal Declaration of Human rights, the UN Charter, ... which not only reflect our values, but are applicable law in Germany and many other countries. For the EU this leads in particular to confusing a peace and value project and a project for an indivisible union of fate for all of Europe, with a primarily economic or administrative Union.

Let me quote the second/third articles of the Lisbon-Treaty which define the fundamental values and the aim of the Union (Countries breaching the values of Article 2 can be sanctioned according to Article 7):

&gt;&gt;&gt;Article 2

&gt;&gt;&gt;The Union is founded on the values of respect for human dignity, freedom, democracy, equality, the rule of law and respect for human rights, including the rights of persons belonging to minorities. These values are common to the Member States in a society in which pluralism, non-discrimination, tolerance, justice, solidarity and equality between women and men prevail.

&gt;&gt;&gt;Article 3

&gt;&gt;&gt;__1\. The Union's aim is to promote peace, its values and the well-being of its peoples.__

&gt;&gt;&gt; 2\. The Union shall offer its citizens an area of freedom, security and justice without internal frontiers, in which the free movement of persons is ensured in conjunction with appropriate measures with respect to external border controls, asylum, immigration and the prevention and combating of crime.

&gt;&gt;&gt;3\. The Union shall establish an internal market. It shall work for the sustainable development of Europe based on balanced economic growth and price stability, a highly competitive social market economy, aiming at full employment and social progress, and a high level of protection and improvement of the quality of the environment. It shall promote scientific and technological advance. 

&gt;&gt;&gt;It shall combat social exclusion and discrimination, and shall promote social justice and protection, equality between women and men, solidarity between generations and protection of the rights of the child. 

&gt;&gt;&gt;It shall promote economic, social and territorial cohesion, and solidarity among Member States. 

&gt;&gt;&gt;It shall respect its rich cultural and linguistic diversity, and shall ensure that Europe's cultural heritage is safeguarded and enhanced.

&gt;&gt;&gt;4\. The Union shall establish an economic and monetary union whose currency is the euro.

&gt;&gt;&gt;5\. In its relations with the wider world, the Union shall uphold and promote its values and interests and contribute to the protection of its citizens. It shall contribute to peace, security, the sustainable development of the Earth, solidarity and mutual respect among peoples, free and fair trade, eradication of poverty and the protection of human rights, in particular the rights of the child, as well as to the strict observance and the development of international law, including respect for the principles of the United Nations Charter.

&gt;&gt;&gt;6\. The Union shall pursue its objectives by appropriate means commensurate with the competences which are conferred upon it in the Treaties.They started big local campaigns for the refugees/migrants from the Balkans telling them, that their chances to get asylum in Germany are close to zero. And if the estimates are correct, this already worked to some degree.It's not his caring what I dislike. It's two other points - first he abused this for personal gain, but that's excusable. What is not excusable is that he used oversimplified and exaggerated facts and stats for his propaganda. He might have had the right intention, but this is highly damaging for the course. (my environmental technology professor saw that different, he meant everything is OK, to promote the good course - I always thought this is wrong, not only because it is morally flawed but also because people just get stupid arguments against you, many won't believe you anymore).

A easier to get example is fracking. Fracking is a technology that poses some fundamental risks and dangers, but could in some cases also be pretty safe. Some problems are in the technology itself, many more in how it is done. Now anti-fracking people not only mix those two up (what is already bad, and every pro-fracking person would tell you for the second: but we can do that different, everything's fine if we don't spill our waste water into the environment), but also invent new dangers of fracking that don't exist, like the trending burning water video in the kitchen sinks, which are not directly related to fracking. Now all people tell me, well fracking is not dangerous, it's doesn't make the water in our sink burn. That was a lie. That there are real risks is not seen anymore.

So what Gore did, and e.g. also these anti-Fracking people do, is providing the deniers the perfect strawman.Well, after they are here for some time, and if they are not in training or integration programs, they have to apply for any job and take them or their welfare will be cut. It's pretty disputed if this is good for the economy.

 Letting somebody who has the skills of a nuclear scientist drive a cab, instead of sending him to a German course and a university to get an accepted degree e.g. again as an engineer or a physicist, with which he could be multiple times more productive and contributing, doesn't seem like a good idea. Neither for him, nor for the society.Ah, sorry, international relations liberalism: "Liberalism is a combination of beliefs that reject power politics, and relies on international cooperation and shared interests between actors in order to shape state preferences and international relations." (copied from wiki)&gt;We could rather say "against the values of the EU" or something like that. "Anti-European" makes me cringe so hard I literally can't even.

Hm, I don't think this term is bad. Most people seem to use it like me - what I meant is: "against the European idea(s)", the "European Idea" is an established term for the historic and current ideas of European unity and a common fate of the continent.  But as it seems to be ambiguous, I'll try to phrase it different in future comments.Ethnicism or Cultural Racism ( https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cultural_racism ).Russia violated numerous international treaties, in particular also treaties involving directly the EU or EU-members, which stabilized Europe for many decades, and Russia used old style power-politics and military force in our very region instead of a peaceful settlement of disputes. This must be sanctioned in the interest of the EU; this was a direct attack on many fundamental EU values and interests, and it was even directly related to EU-foreign politics.This is one point. And well, I don't want to speak for Finland, but the Helsinki final act should also still be pretty important for Finland and to damage it even more, by letting breaches unsanctioned, can't be the interest of Finland.&gt;* If you travel back to your country you might lose your refugee status (after all you get it because you fear for your life in that country)

This is even more for Geneva refugees.

&gt;* You cannot move to another country, you have to stay in the country you applied (and got accepted) in for at least 5 years.

For Geneva refugees: They can get an international refugee passport, with which they can _travel_ to about 100 countries without a visa, or with simplified visa-regulations. But they can't work, get benefits or settle in any other country but their country of refuge.Nobody from the government gave an estimation of 1.5 million. The highest official estimation were 800,000, unofficial ones 1 million, after that no new numbers were published.This is not like family reunification ("Familienzusammenf\u00fchrung") works. Family reunification is only for the core family - minor kids (below 16, below 18 with some restrictions) and the spouse (which must be above 18). One can only apply for other members of this core family, minor kids only if nobody who can care about them is in Germany (which doesn't have to be a parent). Elderly parents (or other close relatives) can only be brought as an exception in cases of a special hardship, e.g. if they have nobody else left at home, or are fully dependent on their children. This doesn't happen often.

Then there is also another kind of familiy reunification under German law, "Familiennachzug". This is for people who already work and a good income and much living space. They must have a permanent permit, the have to guarantee living space and full financial support for the persons they get into Germany themselves. This regulation was/is typically used by guest workers and not by refugees. This is an estimate denied as well by the interior ministry and as by the government speaker himself. This was either made up by Bild, or an estimation by some random lower administration body.Sure, that's what I wrote about it 5 days ago: https://np.reddit.com/r/europe/comments/3ni2fo/germany_now_expects_up_to_15_million_migrants_in/cvoov2j

It was pretty stunning how people reacted to this completely unsourced and later denied tabloid "leak".It difficult to find numbers on that - but for a raw picture: There were 50,000 people ordered to leave Germany (unmittelbar ausreisepflichtige Personen) living in Germany on 30.June 2015 - not all of them related to asylum. From January - June there were alone 10000+ deportations. There are no numbers for voluntary departures and no valid numbers for supported departures (which is the most used way to leave Germany, deportation is the last step of escalation).

Of the denied (political) asylum seekers (for non-Geneva asylum, for Geneva refugees the recognition quota is very high): Last year, 43,000 were denied Asylum, as of 30. June 2015 25,000 were still in the country, most completely legally - because they can't be ordered to leave for different reasons - amongst them e.g. Syrians and Afghans.

The German asylum law is very complex, there are many different permits to stay, including toleration, which is checked every few months. Most of denied Asylum seekers not leaving the country, have such a permit.

The often quoted number of 528,000 denied asylum seekers living in Germany is correct, but completely misleading. This includes all people living in Germany who got ever denied asylum here, and includes people which came back to the 1980s. Nearly all of them have a legal status, many of them are now citizens of the European Union. This number includes e.g. 12,000 polish citizens.Well, Bild is pretty well connected. My best guess, taking what the government says into account, is that this report exists, but is just a raw guess by some lower administrative (maybe from a state and not federal) body, maybe even by one not closely related to refugees at all. If it is really a leak, it is probably an intentional political and spinned one, e.g. by some CSU politician.

What we know for sure, is that this is not a reliable source and not a reliable number.I enrolled to some universities in Germany in my lifetime. I never needed a bank account to do so. What exactly do they demand from you?

For the landlords - some want to see something that shows, that you're able to pay the rent - this doesn't have to be a German bank account. The Pravda is more into headlines like: "Why Americans are stupid". (http://english.pravda.ru/news/society/06-08-2015/131592-stupid_americans-0/)Do you have a source for that? I don't see why they should demand that, and I never saw it demanded. On their homepage I also only found about them telling that you have to pay to their account and until when - not that the payment must be from a German bank account. E.g. paying it at any German bank with a "Bareinzahlung" should perfectly work. (If you choose that way - compare the fees - some banks demand up to 20 Euro for this service...). At my universities I could also pay it in cash at a special office (Zahlstelle).

What the university  likely doesn't want, is a bank transfer from a foreign account in which also _the receiver_ has to pay a high fraction of the fees - they want to receive the complete amount. The laws and regulations changed in the last years - I don't know for which countries this is still a problem.

Or did they just mention that online payment / direct debit is only possible from a German account, and you misunderstood it for bank transfers, because you don't know the nasty little details of German payment habits?

If this is really a problem, just give them a call and ask how to manage it. Politics is always based on irrational decisions/values. There are e.g. zero rational decisions/arguments that makes it better not to have slavery, not to  have women and girls oppressed, not to let the your poor starve or just euthanize them, not to have a dictatorship, ...Politics has aims. These aims are always irrational, they can't be rational or realist. Rationality or realism is about means, not about goals. So the balancing of different moral goals always and only decides about the decision making.What Germany and France (and some of the other early members) now demand, is not more than what is clearly in the treaties. The EU has pluralist societies. The EU's aim is peace, promotion of its values and the well-being of it's people. The protection of minorities is one of the fundamental values of the EU. Solidarity is one of the fundamental values of the EU. 

What you could blame France and Germany for, is that they are also slow in implementing the fundamental values, we all decided for. That many of the others do even less, doesn't make them dominating. Dominating is the European idea and are the European values, we all together decided for.Nobody ever said that, in particular not Merkel. Merkel is as conservative as she always was. She is just addressing the crisis in a more pragmatic (and also value based) way. 

What she demands is more or less: Better sealing of the outside borders, much more help for the refugees outside Europe and limited resettlement programs, much more overall developmental help, caring together for the refugees already in Europe, sending the ones home which are not refugees, taking the burden off the countries which had the highest inflow of refugees in Europe,  instead of chaotic movement, taking the tension out of the Balkans and regaining order in the region, engaging more in foreign policy in the European interest and finally sticking to our values, because they are the most precious and stabilizing thing we have. She also did much of that much too late, but she finally demands it. 

So tell me, what else could bring a solution to this crisis? &gt;As for your point, None of the eastern European countries have either the infrastructure nor the ability to integrate them

You really mean, a polish village with 1500 citizens, can't integrate a refugee family of 4? Really? That'd be pretty sad. 

That's what the quota would look like, if we would distribute 1.5 million refugees with the current quota system.

&gt;There is nothing unreasonable in helping to the best of your ability, even if it isn't too much.

This is clearly something Poland could achieve.&gt;&gt;The Lisbon Treaty, which entered into force in December 2009 (1.1.5), introduced codecision and qualified majority voting on legal migration and a new legal basis for integration measures. Now the ordinary legislative procedure applies to both illegal and legal immigration policies, making Parliament a co-legislator on an equal footing with the Council. __It may be noted, however, that the provisional measures to be instituted in the event of a sudden inflow of third-country nationals are to be adopted by the Council alone, after consulting Parliament (Article 78(3) TFEU).__

&gt;&gt;The Lisbon Treaty also clarified that the competences of the EU in this field are shared with the Member States, notably concerning the number of migrants allowed to legally enter a Member State to seek work (Article 79(5) TFEU). Finally, the Court of Justice now has full competence in the field of immigration and asylum.

http://www.europarl.europa.eu/atyourservice/en/displayFtu.html?ftuId=FTU_5.12.3.html

And the Art 78(3):

&gt;3\. In the event of one or more Member States being confronted with an emergency situation characterised by a sudden inflow of nationals of third countries, the Council, on a proposal from the Commission, may adopt provisional measures for the benefit of the  member State(s) concerned. It shall act after consulting the European Parliament.

http://www.lisbon-treaty.org/wcm/the-lisbon-treaty/treaty-on-the-functioning-of-the-european-union-and-comments/part-3-union-policies-and-internal-actions/title-v-area-of-freedom-security-and-justice/chapter-2-policies-on-border-checks-asylum-and-immigration/346-article-78.html

That is what was done, and what will be done. That's something the EEU countries negotiated and signed and ratified. Demanding that problems are solved according to the core treaty of the EU is not domination. Also these decisions according to article 78 (3) are found in the Council, in which every member has one vote.

And let me remind you, that they also signed the core values in Article 2 and 3 of the EU-treaty:

&gt;&gt;Article 2

&gt;&gt;The Union is founded on the values of respect for human dignity, freedom, democracy, equality, the rule of law and respect for human rights, _including the rights of persons belonging to minorities_. These values are common to the Member States in a __society in which pluralism, non-discrimination, tolerance,__ justice, solidarity and equality between women and men __prevail__.

&gt;&gt;Article 3

&gt;&gt;1\. The Union's aim is __to promote peace, its values__ and the well-being of its peoples.

&gt;&gt;2\. The Union shall offer its citizens an area of freedom, security and justice without internal frontiers, in which the free movement of persons is ensured in conjunction with appropriate measures with respect to external border controls, asylum, immigration and the prevention and combating of crime.

&gt;&gt;3\. [...] __It shall combat social exclusion and discrimination, and shall promote social justice and protection__, equality between women and men, solidarity between generations and protection of the rights of the child. 

&gt;&gt;[...] It shall respect its rich cultural and linguistic diversity, and shall ensure that Europe's cultural heritage is safeguarded and enhanced.

&gt;&gt;5\. In its relations with the wider world, the Union __shall uphold and promote its values and interests__ and contribute to the protection of its citizens. _It shall contribute to peace, security, the_ __sustainable development of the Earth, solidarity and mutual respect among peoples__, _free and fair trade,_ __eradication of poverty and the protection of human rights, in__ _particular the rights of the child,_ __as well as to the strict observance and the development of international law, including respect for the principles of the United Nations Charter.__&gt;Are we independent countries or we under EU's dictate?

You haven given up a part of the sovereignity to the EU, as also Germany and all other members did. For such a situation like we see it now, in particular to the council. For details, see my other comment in this thread: https://www.reddit.com/r/europe/comments/3oaxtw/polish_mep_ryszard_legutko_confronting_angela/cvvw887This money is an investment in a Union which has core values and an aim. _The Union's aim is to promote peace, its values and the well-being of its peoples._ It is not about economic investments, it's an  investment in peace, values and well-being.&gt;&gt;Better sealing of the outside borders

&gt;You mean besides the point when she openly criticsed hungary for doing exactly that.

She didn't. She criticized that Hungary is the wrong country to do so, the refugees are not entering Europe in Hungary, and she criticized how Hungary did it. Merkel always supported the better sealing of the Schengen outside borders, and insisted on Dublin-III very long. That it stopped to work, is partially because of a competition to deter refugees and populist politics in some countries, but also because these countries just couldn't take the burden anymore. This was already ruled by European courts since 2011, in 2015 the situation became so bad, that deportations into some countries inside Dublin-III would've been clearly illegal for humanitarian and rule-of-law reasons.

&gt;&gt;much more help for the refugees outside Europe

&gt;besides the point when her government criticised austrias government for making exactly that suggestion

Hm, where and when?

&gt;&gt;limited resettlement programs

&gt;Limited to? She demands a quota not a limited resettlement program.

These are two different things. Germany already took &gt;100,000 refugees directly from camps in the last few years, selected by the UNHCR (according to need, this includes e.g. stateless Christians from Syria, which probably never can get back, and sick people) - this is an resettlement. The quota is for refugees which are already inside Europe, which can't be send back out of Europe and for which somebody has to care. (and this can't be Greece or Hungary, and even less the countries in between - to demand that, is really against humanitarian values and against European values -  trying it would lead to a political and humanitarian catastrophe in the Balkan region. This is again related to why Hungary is criticized - just pushing the refugee trek around between countries in the Balkans, can't be a solution. And a competition in who deters refugees the best, also not. This doesn't mean that she not also wants to strictly limit the number of people coming to Europe.)

&gt;&gt;taking the burden off the countries which had the highest inflow of refugees in Europe

&gt;Which conveniently is Germany. There was no talk of that at all from her side about the three countries that get the most applications per capita (which are sweden, hungary and austria in that order)

No, this was primarily about Italy, Greece and Hungary. The quota demanded in the Council was in particular also meant for Hungary. And the quotas would mean, that Germany would still take &gt;&gt;25% of all distributed refugees. 

And well, she mentioned Austria, Sweden and Hungary many times.

&gt;&gt;instead of chaotic movement

&gt;you mean the part where her government criticse dhungary for attempting to force refugees to apply at the border rather than just crossing it?

She never criticized that. She criticized how Hungary did it. And not only she, the UNHCR, the EU, many international organisations ... also did. Hungary even took back some measures after the international and EU demanded it. This behavior of Hungary is a part of the problem, not the solution. Hungary has a duty according to many international treaties to process the applications made by refugees. Not sheltering and giving food to refugees, building alibi transit zones, in which people are illegally sent back and which can only process 2-3 refugees an hour of thousands waiting, trying to deter refugees, using razor wire, is not only against European values, but partially against international and EU law. And it's again a sign of countries pushing refugees around in the region, which is inhumane, against the European idea/European solidarity and completely useless to solve a common European crisis.

&gt;&gt;So tell me, what else could bring a solution to this crisis?

&gt;Im not going to give you a simple recepie how to fix this. But for starts doing what Denmark is doing and send a clear messege that germany will not take everyone.

This is done by campaigns in the Balkans, where the most denied asylum seekers come from, and there seems to already be some progress, the numbers of application from those countries declined pretty much. And for the "invitations" spread by the international press - this is very difficult to counter, if everything she or the government says is taken out of context and twisted.

&gt;Then make a concrete operation to secure the borders, this is already beeing partly done by a coalition of eastern european countries IIRC.

This is something also Germany demands. Not the Orban way, but between Greece and Turkey in a way according to international humanitarian law.

&gt;Finally speed up the asylum process and get people that have no business beeing here out.

For the first - yes, this is a huge problem in Germany. Our administrations and courts always tend to be very precise, but also very slow. For the second - this is a problem to a much smaller extend, related to the number of people which are ordered to leave Germany immediately, there are enough voluntary departures, supported departures and deportations. It only needs too much time to get to that point.

&gt;This should be done by better border controlls that actually check if these people are syrian.

This can't legally be done at the border - but sure this is checked pretty well, e.g. with linguist experts. The chances to get asylum in Germany by claiming to be Syrian for sure exist, but they are very low. 

&gt;Then stop confusing political asylum with temporary stationary right, because thats not the same thing, yet everyone acts like it is.

Well, this is about Geneva asylum, not political asylum. Geneva asylum is granted in Germany for 3 years, then the situation is reconsidered. If the situation did change, the refugee has to leave Germany again after these three years. Maybe we will change that in the future, because we like some of them to stay as immigrants, but that's only an internal German question, and the debate about that didn't even begin.

&gt;Next start cracking down on smugglers and distribute them among prisons in europe. Why? because border countries like austria and hungary have to bear the most of that burden in their prisons.

I don't think this is legally possible, but well - I wouldn't be opposed to that. But this would mean a much higher integration of the EU in respect to criminal justice - I don't think the EEU countries want that. But well, then there could still be financial support for those duties.

&gt;Its not easy, there is no one way solution. But the most important part is to acknowledge that there is a problem, which currently is only happening very slowly.

Merkel called it from the very beginning the biggest challenge for Germany at least since the Germany reunification. And one of the biggest challenges the EU ever faced. I don't think you can put a problem much higher.

She acted much too late, like most of Eastern and Western Europe - something you can blame her for. That she acted in an emergency situation, which must be resolved as soon as possible, is not.&gt;I never said it cannot. 

You literally said: _As for your point, None of the eastern European countries have either the infrastructure nor the ability to integrate them_

And I said for the proposed numbers - and even for much bigger ones - the integration shouldn't be a huge problem. For Poland, a distribution of 10 times of what we are talking about now, would still mean just a refugee / citizen quota of 1/350. 

&gt;Merely that it should not be forced to it as most other countries.

The council will decide, by one vote for any member, and a 65% majority of the represented population, how is this forcing? This is just a regular decision according to the EU treaties, which all members have signed, in particular TEU Art. 78 (3). If you think making EU-laws is forcing somebody, well - that's just the way the EU works, for many decisions there are no veto rights. If 55% of the countries, representing at least 65% of the EU population vote for it, it'll be done.At least the 3 Universities I know pretty well, took cash for any payment you have to do. They have so called "Zahlstellen". Sometimes they have ridiculous opening hours, but they'll take it in cash. Else you could just make an "Einzahlung auf ein fremdes Konto" e.g. at a Postbank. You just need an ID and the money for that, and you have to pay a fee.Well, who studied medicine at Damascus university can get it recognized in Germany, and the level seems to be on-par.

&gt;I've worked with developing world electrical engineers who could not do basic calculus, which is completely insane. I don't understand how they were able to even finish one course successfully in uni.

And how is this related to Syria? Syria had pretty high standards of education. Iranians not only come to Europe highly educated, their children keep that up. Iranian immigrants in Germany finish even more often secondary and tertiary education than Germans, which is pretty remarkable compared to other immigrant groups.It's the minimum, also in Germany. The Bachelors studies which are typically leading to Masters studies, tend to have a shorter duration, than the ones being a full education on themselves. E.g. for Universities of Applied Sciences 7-8 semesters (as long as the old diploma) are more typical than 6.The most open generation of immigrants was mostly the first generation, and where we see some fundamentalism developing is sometimes in the second, but more often in the third generation. They don't learn that from their parents. This fundamentalism is primarily not brought to Germany or France, it mostly developed here.

And well, you should also consider, which parents our leading generations had - those were often in no way better than those parents. The law for condemnation of violence in the education of children came just in 2000 (and not without big debates), the last criminal law particular for homosexuals was removed just in 1994.Well, I grew up in my early childhood with immigrants - they were always integrated pretty well, and even while they had less good chances than me, now 30 years later, most of them found their place in our society, most of them are part of the non-academic middle class. 

Why did this work? Because I lived in a smaller industrial town in a pretty open but square region of Germany, because already their parents were welcomed here, because it were many different nationalities in the quarter and not just one , and partially also because we don't have significant unemployment here.
I don't know how they count the employment rate - but your numbers clearly doesn't fit for a current unemployment quota in Germany of 6,2%. This graph: http://www.bpb.de/nachschlagen/zahlen-und-fakten/soziale-situation-in-deutschland/61724/ausgewaehlte-arbeitslosenquoten-i shows it better.

And well, how many basic workers we need, also depends on how many qualified workers we can get to create jobs, and we clearly don't have enough of them. For my state and region, e.g. the Bosnian refugees in the 1990's probably lowered and not raised the overall unemployment quota, because they partially filled this gap.Well, I hear this whining about automation and robots killing jobs since the 1980's. And it didn't happen. ( http://www.voxeu.org/sites/default/files/image/FromApr2012/krebs%20fig1%2019%20sep.png (unemployment according to OECD standard, Germany, 2015  it is even lower, ~ on the level of 1975).

Old jobs were gone and new came. And we got more productive, and could work much less. People always forgot to take that great achievement into account in particular for Germany, who has the lowest annual working hours of all OECD countries - Germany has a very high productivity and alone since the 1990's we achieved to work 200 hours a years less, 300 hours and nearly 25% less than the OECD average or the US, while raising the standards of living. I can't see that's a bad development. (https://stats.oecd.org/Index.aspx?DataSetCode=ANHRS#)
We know why. Because they in some regions and in particular in some big cities they were pushed out of the society, and tried to find something of their own. In my region - with full employment, no real ghettos, but some poorer quarters in which all nationalities live together, we have nearly none of these problems.

This is for "normal" traditionalism. For extremism the reasons are different - this seems to be more like a youth culture to me. One of the worst we ever had.Well, I lived in a town of about the same size in Baden-W\u00fcrttemberg. It's not like everything went completely flawless - but we never had those problems on a large scale. We never had real Muslim "ghettos" - the "ghetto" I grew up in, was a mix of Germans, Turks, Yugoslavs, Italians, Portuguese, ... We had also some smaller problems with youth gangs - but all of those were interreligious and interethnic. A bit later we got some trouble with immigrants (and we still have, and get more with their now teenage and young adult children), with the fraction of ethnic Germans from eastern Europe, which came late, which didn't get good support in particular in education and language, and which were housed in "ghettos". At the same time, the ones in the smaller villages around without "ghettos", and with more interaction and support by the German population, integrated very well.&gt;Does the fact that a well-regulated militia is no longer required -- because the US now has a standing army -- mean the right to bear arms is no longer protected? Doesn't "well-regulated militia" mean that you can't just give guns to anyone who wants them -- they have to be properly trained to fight as a disciplined militia? 

_A well regulated militia being necessary to the security of a free state, the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed._

Well, the US has numerous _well-regulated militias_ (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Militia_(United_States)#Organized_militia), probably more than any other country. And even in a narrow interpretation, I can't see, that _the people_ here means each and every person, but the complete people as such, e.g. in the national guards in difference to the army. &gt;Unless you are a hunter or you protect a cash transport (or anything where a gun is necessary to protect yourself), there is absolutely NO reason for a private person to own a gun.

Those people are allowed to carry guns, many more are allowed to own guns.

&gt;A gun is a device primarily designed to kill individuals and animals and should always be treated as that. I'd rather have people not being able to collect guns or persue shooting as a sports, than risking such a killing device falling into the wrong hands.

Well, we allow that in Germany and it doesn't make much troubles. You shouldn't forget, that Germany is also a highly armed country - we own about a third of the weapons / capita compared to the US. We just have more strict regulations on how to deal with those guns.Germans are still on place 15 worldwide with 30 firearms / 100 citizens. 
&gt;Almost 1000 people die each day in car crashes. Should we ban driving?

Around 90 people die every year by traffic accidents in the US. And about 90 gun related deaths (including suicides) happen every day in the US. Both numbers are much too high compared to Germany, and sure something should be done about it.

Nobody demands to ban guns or to ban driving. Guns are not banned in Germany, and Germany is anything but a gun free zone. It is on rank 15 world wide in guns owned by citizens, with 30 guns/100 citizens.&gt; A lot of people think this is outragous, but its the main reason its in the constitution... Guns give you security against the government itself. They have to take you more seriously if you can fire back. Theoretically, this is a check on government power.

This is not in the constitution. In the constitution is that _the people_ must be allowed to own guns, like in well-regulated militias, not that every citizen is allowed to own or even carry a gun.

But you forgot one point pro-point, which I would sign - in some regions it is very reasonable to have a gun to protect oneself against dangerous animals.Probably less than one might think, I'm not sure. But e.g. Switzerland and Germany have about the same rate of suicide, Switzerland has a much higher quota committed with guns, because the availability is much higher there.&gt;Given that, the Second Amendment could be said to apply only to members of the states' National Guards, or to all able-bodied men between the ages of 17 and 45, or both, or -- because the text doesn't explicitly say that the right to bear arms should only apply to the militia, only that the need for a militia is the reason -- everyone.

It says explicitly the people, and not every citizen, every adult or every man. This is pretty clear for me. No matter how it is interpreted in a reasonable way, it never means everyone. And that not even in the NRA interpretation - they don't include children, insane people and so on. While this sentence might've been meant different, a restriction to only people with military training, available or organized in militias, would still fully comply with this paragraph. It wouldn't infringe the right _of the people_, but just the right of many individual citizens.Vor allen Dingen sind auch die Definitionen ganz verschieden. Wenn man z.B. nach Bi- oder Homosexualit\u00e4t fragt, dann inkludiert man z.B. bei weitem nicht alle M\u00e4nner-die-Sex-mit-M\u00e4nnern haben, sich aber dennoch aufgrund des Rollenmodells als heterosexuell definieren.&gt;Ich w\u00fcrde es eher unter "moralischer Sache" abstempeln, da sich der "Nutzen" solcher Programme halt eher schwierig bestimmen l\u00e4sst [da d\u00fcrfen sich dann wieder irgendwelche Experten ihre Statistiken aus dem Arsch ziehen]. Es ist keine Autobahn von der man genau absch\u00e4tzen kann wie viele Autos diese nutzen k\u00f6nnen usw. ;-)

"Moralische Sache" klingt etwas sonderbar - dies ist schlicht Grundwertschutz. Der Schutz von Minderheiten und die Vertretung von Minderheiten durch die Regierung ist fundamental f\u00fcr unser Staatsmodell.  

Und das ist etwas das nicht nur die Minderheit betrifft, sondern die gesamte Gesellschaft, die Kosten auf die Anzahl der betroffenen Minderheit umzurechnen ist nicht nur sehr schwierig, sondern schlicht falsch. 

Selbst mit einer rein neo-liberalen, komplett moralfreien Herangehensweise, m\u00fcsste man ganz anderes Rechnen - n\u00e4mlich wieviel kann durch Verminderung der gesamtwirtschaftlichen Sch\u00e4den eingespart werden und wieviel produktiver wird die Gesellschaft durch Akzeptanzma\u00dfnahmen?

&gt;Naja, Umfragen und Statistiken gibt es zu jedem Thema und anonym kann man sie auch gestalten. Da sollte es eigentlich keine Probleme mit der Akzeptanz geben.

Das gibt Riesenprobleme, da man noch nicht einmal eine einheitliche Definitionen der Ph\u00e4nomene hat. Au\u00dferdem \u00e4ndert die Anonymit\u00e4t nichts an pers\u00f6nlichen Selbstdefinitionen und Rollenmodellen,  z.B. sehen sich viele M\u00e4nner-die-Sex-mit-M\u00e4nnern, nicht als homo- oder bisexuell.F\u00fcr ein Akzeptanzprogramm an der h\u00f6heren Akzeptanz in der Gesellschaft. Was auch immer man als Parameter daf\u00fcr verwendet, die Anzahl der LGBT ist keiner.

Die Anzahl der LGBT ist wichtig f\u00fcr die Frage, ob man ein solches Programm \u00fcberhaupt machen sollte. Daf\u00fcr ist es aber egal, ob es 1%, 3%, 5% oder 15%, das ist alles ein relevanter Teil der Gesellschaft und wenn dieser Teil diskriminiert wird, muss man dagegen Ma\u00dfnahmen ergreifen. 

Wenn man die Ausgaben unbedingt auf eine Kopfzahl umrechnen will, dann bitte auf alle Mitglieder der Gesellschaft oder auf die Anzahl an Homophoben.Richtig, entweder m\u00fcsste man die Gesamtgesellschaft, den nicht LGBT-Teil der Gesellschaft, oder die Anzahl an Homophoben als Grundlage nehmen, und nicht die Anzahl der LGBT. Wenn man weiss (und das ist der Fall), dass es eine signifikante Anzahl an LGBT gibt, spielt deren genaue Anzahl \u00fcberhaupt keine Rolle.Den Bedarf erzeugen und ben\u00f6tigen aber nicht LGBT, sondern Homophobe. Wenn man jemanden z\u00e4hlen m\u00fcsste, dann diese. Wenn ein relevanter Anteil der Bev\u00f6lkerung unter Diskriminierung leidet, muss diese beseitigt werden, das Problem dieser Bev\u00f6lkerungsgruppe zuzuschieben ist v\u00f6llig daneben.&gt;Ich habe eh nie verstanden was diese politischen Aktionen gegen Diskriminierung bringen sollen. Ich finde es diskriminierend wenn auf dem CSD Tunten rumspringen und das als das Prototyp des Schwulen r\u00fcberkommt.

Richtig, das sehe ich auch als recht problematisch, hier wird nur wieder ein weiteres Rollenmodell zementiert, statt schlicht von dem ganzen Klumbatsch endlich wegzukommen. Das hat denke ich prim\u00e4r historische Gr\u00fcnde, die Homosexuellen wurden f\u00fcr ein Jahrhundert in ein solches Rollenmodell gedr\u00e4ngt, und haben dann angefangen sich als Gruppe zur Wehr zu setzen. Mit der alten Idee von der sexuellen Befreiung, wo schlicht solche Gruppenmodelle und Rollenmodellen verschwinden sollten, hat das nicht viel zu tun. Ich hab doch nichts gegen Tunten oder Transen - ich finde es nur nicht besonders f\u00f6rderlich, wenn man eine von 2 Schubladen, die es fr\u00fcher gab, jetzt durch 10 kleinere ersetzt, aber immer noch in Schubladen denkt und immer noch Personen ganz prim\u00e4r durch ein Stereotyp von ihrer Sexualit\u00e4t definiert, insofern diese Personen nicht heterosexuell sind. &gt;Aber insgesamt ging es mir auch nicht darum ein Verfahren vorzuschlagen, sondern anzumerken, dass hier reine Polemik betrieben wird, wenn der AfD unterstellt wird ein "Schwulen-Register" f\u00fchren zu wollen.

Das werfe ich der AfD \u00fcberhaupt nicht vor. Was ich hier sehe ist eine Art von Hetze gegen LGBT, nach dem Motto: "Schaut mal wie viel Geld wir f\u00fcr die/wegen der paar abartigen Dekadenten wieder bezahlen m\u00fcssen. Und wir kriegen nichts, dabei sind wir das Volk und nicht die. "

&gt;Antidiskriminierungs-Programm: 5% der B\u00fcrger sehen eine Verbesserung von 100% (LQBT), 95% sehen eine Verbesserung um 10%. Damit haben wir einen Nutzen f\u00fcr die gesamte Bev\u00f6lkerung von 14,5%.

So kann man nicht rechnen. In einer diskriminierungsfreien Gesellschaft zu leben ist ein Ideal nach dem unseren Gesellschaft strebt, inbesondere auch im Rahmen der EU. Um was es hier geht, ist diesem Ideal n\u00e4her zu kommen, der Nutzen ist f\u00fcr die Gesamtgesellschaft, nicht nur f\u00fcr die Diskriminierten.

Und ich sehe diesen Nutzen durchaus auch ganz pers\u00f6nlich - ich finde es widerlich das Personen in der Gesellschaft in der ich lebe diskriminiert werden, auch wenn ich pers\u00f6nlich nicht diskriminiert werde. Rechts unten im Titelbild befindet sich der play-button. Keine Ahnung warum Deutschlandfunk den so idiotisch platziert...Vor allen Dingen w\u00fcrden sie nicht in Griechenland oder der T\u00fcrkei gestoppt - eine Ausreise kann man n\u00e4mlich kaum verhindern, sondern in Serbien oder anderswo im Balkan und w\u00fcrden dann dort stranden. Und das w\u00fcrde nicht nur eine humanit\u00e4re Katastrophe, sondern sehr wahrscheinlich auch eine politische, in der immer noch nicht vollst\u00e4ndig stabilisierten Balkanregion, herbeif\u00fchren. Du scheinst zu vergessen, dass wir ein Teil der EU und Europas sind. Und das Probleme in der EU und in Europa auch unsere Probleme sind. Und das nicht nur moralisch oder im Sinne der Europ\u00e4ischen Idee, sondern auch ganz real, wirtschaftlich und geopolitisch.Das ist sicher auch einer der Gr\u00fcnde: http://cdn.akamai.steamstatic.com/steamcommunity/public/images/avatars/64/64a2926797dbd6cb2914816c20ce9ea389b1c798_full.jpgRichtig. Und die Zustimmungsquote von Merkel ist ja auch nicht ins bodenlose Gefallen, wie sich das manche w\u00fcnschen, sondern hat sich etwas normalisiert, &gt;50% ist immer noch hervorragend. Das die Zustimmung etwas sinkt, wenn sie tats\u00e4chlich auch mal teilweise innenpolitisch und sichtbar, kontroverse Entscheidungen trifft, ist nicht \u00fcberraschend.&gt;Man muss immer wieder auch daran erinnern, dass Merkel mit ihrer Einladung im Fernsehen viele der Ankommenden erst "zu Fl\u00fcchtlingen gemacht" hat.

Das ist schlicht von den Zahlen her nicht gedeckt. \u00dcber die Mittelmeerroute kamen im August 140.000, im September 170.000 - ungef\u00e4hr der gleiche Anstieg wie all die Monate bevor Merkel irgendwas gesagt hatte. Die, die jetzt nach Deutschland kamen, waren zum gro\u00dfen Teil bereits auf dem Balkan in Europa unterwegs und dort w\u00e4re es sehr bald zu einer gr\u00f6\u00dferen humanit\u00e4ren und politischen Katastrophe gekommen. 

&gt;Sie sollte zur\u00fccktreten (anders geht nicht mehr), und der n\u00e4chste baut den Gegendruck wieder auf, dass hier eben nicht 100% der Grenz\u00fcberschreiter auch anerkannt und bleiben k\u00f6nnen.

Ein guter Teil dieser Grenz\u00fcberschreiter, hat das Recht (bzw. darf daf\u00fcr nicht bestraft werden) nach der Genfer Konvention die Grenze illegal zu \u00fcberschreiten, insofern er sich dann zeitnah bei den Beh\u00f6rden meldet. Nur wenn sie sich vorher in einem anderen Land, das angemessene Versorgung bietet, niedergelassen hatten, haben sie dieses Recht nicht mehr.

&gt;Sie dort zu versorgen w\u00e4re auch erheblich billiger gewesen, selbst mit Milit\u00e4reinsatz um eine sichere Zone aufzuspannen und 100% Vollversorgung durch uns bezahlt.

Ja, h\u00e4tten wir noch mehr in Jordanien, der T\u00fcrkei, Libanon, ... investiert (wo wir \u00fcbrigens auch schon recht gut gezahlt haben) h\u00e4tten wir jetzt weniger Fl\u00fcchtlinge in Europa. Aber wir haben nicht. Und andere haben noch viel weniger.

&gt;Nicht DIE L\u00f6sung, aber ein Teil davon w\u00e4re wenn die Dame aufh\u00f6ren k\u00f6nnte Willkommensbotschaften in die Welt zu senden und ihren Fehler da einzugestehen.

Merkel hat recht wenige "Willkommensbotschaften", zumindest wenn Du diese als Einladung verstehst, in die Welt gesendet. Man hat viel mehr alles, was sie gesagt hat, vollkommen verdreht. Die deutlichste "Einladung" die von ihr kam, ist dass Syrer, die \u00fcber Ungarn kommen, nicht nach Dublin-III zur\u00fcckgeschoben werden - das war seit Jahren regelm\u00e4\u00dfig nicht m\u00f6glich, und seit Mitte diesen Jahres \u00fcberhaupt nicht mehr. Und damit hat Merkel \u00fcberhaupt nichts zu tun, das haben deutschen und Europ\u00e4ische Gerichte aufgrund der humanit\u00e4ren und legalen Umst\u00e4nde in Ungarn (und auch Griechenland) so entschieden, die Orban zu einem ordentlichen Teil, wenn nicht herbeigef\u00fchrt, dann zumindest gef\u00f6rdert hat.Das ist schlicht eine falsche und un\u00fcbliche Auslegung, inbesondere bezogen auf Transit und "good cause". Aus dem Kommentar eines der bekanntesten Rechtsexperten^1 auf dem Gebiet ist z.B. (sorry in english):

&gt;__Summary and tentative conclusions regarding Article 31(1)__

&gt;100\. States party to the 1951 Convention/1967 Protocol undertake to accord certain standards of treatment to refugees, and to guarantee to them certain rights. _They necessarily undertake to implement those instruments in good faith._

&gt;101\. States have choice of means in implementing certain Convention provisions, such as Article 31, and may elect to use legislative incorporation, administrative regulation, informal and ad hoc procedures, or a combination thereof. Mere formal compliance is not itself sufficient to discharge a State\u2019s responsibility; the test is whether, in the light of domestic law and practice, including the exercise of administrative discretion, the State has attained the international standard of reasonable efficacy and efficient implementation of the treaty provisions concerned.

&gt;102\. _Particular attention needs to be paid to situations where the system of administration may produce results incompatible with the applicable principle or standard of international law._

&gt;103\. __Refugees are not required to have come directly from their country of origin.__ Article 31 was intended to apply, and has been interpreted to apply, _to persons who have briefly transited other countries,_ who are unable to find protection Article 31 of the 1951 Convention 34 from persecution in the first country or countries to which they flee, or __who have \u2018good cause\u2019 for not applying in such country or countries.__ The drafters only intended that immunity from penalty should not apply to refugees who had settled, temporarily or permanently, in another country.

&gt;104\. To come directly from the country in which the claimant has a well-founded fear of persecution is recognized in itself as \u2018good cause\u2019 for illegal entry. __To \u2018come directly\u2019 from such country via another country or countries in which he or she is at risk or in which generally no protection is available, is also accepted as \u2018good cause\u2019 for illegal entry.__ __Other factual circumstances, such as close family links in the country of refuge, may also constitute \u2018good cause\u2019. The criterion of \u2018good cause\u2019 is flexible enough to allow the elements of individual cases to be taken into account.__

&gt;105\. _\u2018Without delay\u2019 is a matter of fact and degree as well; it depends on the circumstances of the case, including the availability of advice._

&gt;106\. __Although expressed in terms of the \u2018refugee\u2019, Article 31(1) applies also to asylum seekers and \u2018presumptive refugees\u2019.__

&gt;107\. The practice of States as evidenced in their laws and in the decisions of tribunals and courts confirms this interpretation of the 1951 Convention. __States have also formally acknowledged both that refugees will often have good reason for moving on from countries of first refuge, and that circumstances may oblige
them to use False documents.__

&gt;108\. The term \u2018penalties\u2019 is not defined in Article 31, but includes prosecution, fine, imprisonment, and other restrictions on freedom of movement.

&gt;109\. Provisional detention is permitted if necessary for and limited to the purposes of preliminary investigation.

&gt;110\. __Article 31(1) obliges States parties specifically to take account of any claim to be a refugee entitled to its benefit.__ This responsibility can be engaged by voluntary act of the individual in making a claim for asylum/refugee status. It may also be engaged by an act of the State, for example, in asserting jurisdiction over the individual with a view to implementing immigration-related measures of control (such as removal or refusal of entry), or instituting immigration-related criminal proceedings (such as prosecution for the use of False travel documents).

&gt;111\. Where a State leaves compliance with international obligations within the realm of executive discretion, a policy and practice inconsistent with those obligations involves the international responsibility of the State. _The policy of prosecuting or otherwise penalizing illegal entrants, those present illegally, or those who use False travel documentation, without regard to the_ __circumstances of flight in individual cases, and the refusal to consider the merits of an applicant\u2019s claim, amount to a breach of a State\u2019s obligations in international law.__

&gt;112\. As a matter of principle, also, it should follow that a carrier should not be penalized for bringing in an \u2018undocumented\u2019 passenger, where that person is subsequently determined to be a refugee.

[highlighting by me]

http://www.unhcr.org/3bcfdf164.pdf

^1: https://www.law.ox.ac.uk/people/guy-s-goodwin-gill ; https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Guy_Goodwin-Gill&gt; F\u00fcr den Umgang mit Kriegsfl\u00fcchtlingen, der nicht auf dem GG sondern auf der Genfer Fl\u00fcchtlingskonvention basiert, gilt im Grunde das gleiche. Wer aus einem sicheren Drittstaat anreist, den kann man ohne \u00dcberpr\u00fcfung an der Landesgrenze abweisen.

Nein, dass kann man nicht. Man muss jeden Fall individuell pr\u00fcfen. Ich will nicht noch mal das ganze Zitat aus dem Kommentar zu Art.31 kopieren, also siehe: https://www.reddit.com/r/de/comments/3ok7ct/ausland_kopfsch%C3%BCtteln_%C3%BCber_merkel/cvy44v5Nicht nur das deutsche Recht hat G\u00fcltigkeit, sondern alle ratifizierten Vertr\u00e4ge sind g\u00fcltiges deutsches Recht und haben eingehalten zu werden. Und das internationale Vertragswerk / Recht ist vernetzt - ein Versto\u00df gegen die UN-Charter oder die Genfer Konvention w\u00e4re z.B. automatisch auch ein Versto\u00df gegen den EU-Vertrag.

Edit: Nat\u00fcrlich kann man Vertr\u00e4ge \u00e4ndern - dazu muss man aber recht oft alle Signatoren hinter sich haben - einfach so k\u00fcndigen kann man internationale Vertr\u00e4ge in sehr vielen F\u00e4llen nicht.Nur hat Merkel diese Leute \u00fcberhaupt nicht nach Europa gelockt. Im September kamen 40.000 mehr als im August nach Europa, die ungef\u00e4hr gleiche Steigerungsrate, wie wir sie seit dem Fr\u00fchjahr sehen. Es gibt schlicht keinen Merkel-Knick in der Statistik f\u00fcr Ankunften im Mittelmeerraum: http://data.unhcr.org/mediterranean/regional.phpGib den Hut doch mal in Reparatur - der scheint etwas undicht zu sein.Ist etwas \u00e4lter, und nur f\u00fcr wenige L\u00e4nder, aber f\u00fcr einen ersten Eindruck reicht es immer noch: http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/europe/chart-putins-popularity-reaches-86-but-how-does-it-compare-to-other-world-leaders-10075063.htmlEs ist auch nicht so, als ob die Mehrheit der Kriegfl\u00fcchtlinge \u00fcberhaupt dauerhaft bleiben will. Von den syrischen Fl\u00fcchtlingen wollen 68% nach Hause sobald der Krieg vorbei ist, und 90% irgendwann. 1 Million im Jahr = 10 Millionen w\u00fcrde bedeuten, dass Deutschland &gt;50% aller externen Fl\u00fcchtlinge weltweit aufnimmt.&gt;Die Kanzlerin h\u00e4tte das ja anfahren k\u00f6nnen. Das \u00e4ndert nichts an der Tatsache, dass man vom gleichen Geld ca. 20 mal mehr Leuten einfacher h\u00e4tte helfen k\u00f6nnen, wenn man sie in Lagern im Norden Syriens versorgt h\u00e4tte anstatt hier. Sie wollen doch m\u00f6glichst vielen Leuten helfen, oder?

Wir haben diese Lager unterst\u00fctzt und seit 4 Jahren zehntausende von dort nach Auswahl durch die UNHCR als Kontigentfl\u00fcchtlinge in Deutschland aufgenommen. Desweiteren vertritt Merkel - vermutlich aus moralischen aber auch geopolitischen Gr\u00fcnden - schon ein Weile eine Politik die wesentlich mehr auf Aussenpolitik im Interesse der Deutschlands und der EU, diplomatische Interventionspolitik und Entwicklungshilfe setzt. Da ich mich prim\u00e4r f\u00fcr internationale Politik interessiere, sehe ich von dieser Merkel vermutlich mehr - und in den letzten zwei Jahren hat das Team Merkel/Steinmeier viel geleistet. Ja, Deutschland wird dann verklagt werden, u.a. beim Europ\u00e4ischen Gerichtshof f\u00fcr Menschenrechte. Nat\u00fcrlich k\u00f6nnte man das dann auch einfach missachten... Man k\u00f6nnte dann auch gleich aus der UN, der OSZE, dem Europarat und der EU austreten.

Deutschland als Exportnation ist vermutlich das Land weltweit, das am meisten auf die Einhaltung von Vertr\u00e4gen angewiesen ist. Wenn wird uns nicht mehr an die Regeln halten, dann k\u00f6nnen wir es auch von anderen nicht fordern. Liberalismus im internationalen Raum, das Vertrauen auf die Einhaltung von Vertr\u00e4gen, ist etwas auf das Deutschland wirtschaftlich aber auch geopolitisch angewiesen ist. Wenn man dieses Vertrauen zerst\u00f6rt, kehrt man zur\u00fcck in eine Zeit der reinen Machtpolitik, der Anarchie im internationalen Raum und wirft damit auch alle Ideale Deutschlands oder der EU \u00fcber Bord.&gt;Da frag mal alle anderen Europ\u00e4er. 

Alle anderen? Ein paar L\u00e4nder haben in Relation mehr Fl\u00fcchtlinge aufgenommen als Deutschland.

&gt;Und internationales Recht wird von denen auch nicht gebrochen.

Ungarn bricht selbstverst\u00e4ndlich internationales und Europ\u00e4isches Recht.

Und nein, ein Wettbewerb, wer Fl\u00fcchtlinge am besten abschreckt, ist allein noch nicht immer ein Versto\u00df gegen internationales Recht, wenn man sie dann doch angemessen behandelt (f\u00fcr Ungarn k\u00f6nnten man durchaus einen Versto\u00df gegen Art.2 EU-Vertrag sehen, der nach Art. 7 sanktioniert werden kann). Dennoch ist es in einer Union, die auf Solidarit\u00e4t beruht und sich den Menschenrechten verschrieben hat, einfach nur sch\u00e4big. Die allermeisten dieser Fl\u00fcchtlinge waren bereits in Europa und m\u00fcssen irgendwo versorgt werden. Der Balkan kann dies nicht, also muss es jemand anders machen. Daf\u00fcr gibt es selbstverst\u00e4ndlich auch eine Regelung im zweiten EU-Vertrag, die bereits angewendet wurde f\u00fcr die Quote f\u00fcr die 160.000. Die Kommission beschlie\u00dft, wie in einem Fall einen gro\u00dfen Zustroms von Fl\u00fcchtlingen in ein EU-Land, dieses durch die anderen L\u00e4nder entlastet wird.&gt;Auch die Diskussion \u00fcber die Quote zur Fl\u00fcchtlingsverteilung war ziemlich eindeutig.

Und? Solch eine Ma\u00dfnahme / Quote ist Teil des FEU-Vertrages. Diese L\u00e4nder wurden demokratisch mit einer qualifizierten Mehrheit \u00fcberstimmt.Solange sich diese in Griechenland nicht niedergelassen haben, muss Ungarn alle Antr\u00e4ge individuell bearbeiten und pr\u00fcfen, ob diese einen guten Grund ("good cause") beinhalten weiter zu fliehen. Da die Umst\u00e4nde in Griechenland nach Urteilen des Europ\u00e4ischen Gerichtshofes nicht geeignet sind f\u00fcr Dublin Abschiebungen, ist eine solche Weiterflucht, zumindest im Rahmen der Genfer Konvention, legitimiert. Siehe auch den Kommentar zur Genfer Konvention den ich hier: https://www.reddit.com/r/de/comments/3ok7ct/ausland_kopfsch%C3%BCtteln_%C3%BCber_merkel/cvy44v5 in diesem thread zitiert habe.

Nun, die Alternative w\u00e4re eine humanit\u00e4re Katastrophe an der Ungarisch-Serbischen Grenzen, wahrscheinlich bald darauf an den kroatisch-serbischen, an der kroatisch slovenischen Grenze und auch tiefer im Balkan und in der Ukraine, gefolgt von Spannungen und vermutlich einer schwerwiegenden politischen Krise in diesem Teil Europas gewesen.

Was Merkel hier gemacht hat, ist die "kleinere Katastrophe" zu akzeptieren um eine sehr viel gr\u00f6\u00dfere menschliche, wirtschaftliche und geopolitische zu vermeiden. 

Nat\u00fcrlich war es ein grober Fehler f\u00fcr fast ein Jahr dem Druckaufbau in der Region, und f\u00fcr Jahre dem in Griechenland und Italien einfach zuzusehen, aber immerhin hat sie gerade noch rechtzeitig den St\u00f6psel gezogen. &gt;Auch wenn man den die Unmittelbarkeit freiz\u00fcgig auslegenden Standpunkt des UNHCR anwendet, liegt eine Unmittelbarkeit nicht vor, wenn es eine M\u00f6glichkeit gegeben h\u00e4tte, in einem Drittstaat zu bleiben. 

Hm, der etwas kurz geratene Kommentar (Guy S. Goodwin-Gill hat 30 Seiten Erl\u00e4uterungen vor der Conclusio und Zusammenfassung) sagt grunds\u00e4tzlich genau dasselbe in Bezug auf diesen Punkt, wie der von mir zitierte auch - nur eine Beendigung der Flucht - eine Niederlassung in einem anderen Land, oder eine tats\u00e4chliche Asylgew\u00e4hrung steht der straffreien irregul\u00e4ren Einreise in ein weiteres Land entgegen.

&gt;&gt;&gt;Auch der vor\u00fcbergehende Aufenthalt in einem \u201csicheren Drittstaat\u201d iSd Art. 16a Abs. 2 Grundgesetz unterbricht nicht notwendigerweise die Unmittelbarkeit der Einreise in das Zufluchtsland. _Die Verfasser der GFK f\u00fchrten den Begriff \u201cunmittelbar kommen\u201d nicht ein, um diejenigen, die durch ein anderes Land gereist waren, von dem Anwendungsbereich der Vorschrift auszuschlie\u00dfen,_ __sondern diejenigen, die sich in
einem anderen Land bereits vor\u00fcbergehend niedergelassen hatten__. __Das hei\u00dft, entscheidend ist nicht, ob der Asylsuchende in dem Drittland h\u00e4tte Schutz finden k\u00f6nnen, sondern, ob seine Flucht in dem Drittstaat eine gewisse Beendigung gefunden hat.__ _Denn dann ist dem Schutzsuchenden zuzumuten, bei der Einreise in einen weiteren Staat die entsprechenden Einreisevorschriften zu beachten._ __Die
Auffassung, einem Fl\u00fcchtling k\u00f6nne schon die blo\u00dfe M\u00f6glichkeit, in einem Drittland Schutz zu suchen, entgegengehalten werden, fand in den Verhandlungen zur Annahme der GFK keine Mehrheit.__ Die Staatenbevollm\u00e4chtigten waren der Ansicht, dass eine derartige Behauptung jeder Staat erheben k\u00f6nne und bef\u00fcrchteten, dass
Art. 31 GFK auf diese Weise ausgehebelt werden k\u00f6nnte. _Es liegt daher nahe, zur Auslegung des Begriffes der \u201cUnmittelbarkeit\u201d der Einreise analog die Grunds\u00e4tze heranzuziehen, die das BVerwG zur Fluchtbeendigung im Rahmen der Pr\u00fcfung des anderweitigen Verfolgungsschutzes (\u00a7 27 AsylVfG) entwickelt hat. Hiernach kommt es darauf an, dass die Flucht in einen Drittstaat_ __\u201cstation\u00e4ren Charakter\u201d__ _angenommen hat_. Hat der Fl\u00fcchtling jedoch den Aufenthalt im Drittland allerdings grundlos verz\u00f6gert, ist der Fl\u00fcchtling nicht mehr \u201cunmittelbar\u201d iSd Art. 31 Abs. 1 GFK eingereist. Ob eine grundlose Verz\u00f6gerung des Aufenthalts im Drittland vorlag, sollte angesichts der Vielzahl von m\u00f6glichen Fluchtschicksalen __einzelfallbezogen beurteilt werden__. Eine strenge zeitliche Limitierung ist daher nach Auffassung des UNHCR nicht angebracht. 

oder aus der Zusammenfassung:

&gt;&gt;&gt;Art. 31 Abs. 1 GFK ist nur anwendbar, wenn der Fl\u00fcchtling unmittelbar aus dem Verfolgerstaat eingereist ist. __Die Einreise aus einem sicheren Drittstaat unterbricht allerdings nicht notwendigerweise die Unmittelbarkeit der Einreise, solange die Flucht dort nicht bereits beendet wurde oder der Fl\u00fcchtling den Aufenthalt im Drittland nicht
grundlos verz\u00f6gert hat.__ Die illegale Einreise unter Mithilfe von Schleusern schlie\u00dft die Anwendbarkeit der Vorschrift nicht aus. Art. 31 Abs. 1 GFK erfordert weiterhin, dass der Fl\u00fcchtling sich unverz\u00fcglich bei den Beh\u00f6rden meldet. Ob eine unverz\u00fcgliche Meldung vorliegt, kann nur einzelfallbezogen beurteilt werden. Entscheidend ist, dass der Fl\u00fcchtling die Meldung nicht schuldhaft verz\u00f6gert hat. 

.

Also:

&gt;Auch wenn man den die Unmittelbarkeit freiz\u00fcgig auslegenden Standpunkt des UNHCR anwendet, liegt eine Unmittelbarkeit nicht vor, wenn es eine M\u00f6glichkeit gegeben h\u00e4tte, in einem Drittstaat zu bleiben.


Der Text sagt genau das Gegenteil: "Die Auffassung, einem Fl\u00fcchtling k\u00f6nne schon die blo\u00dfe M\u00f6glichkeit, in einem Drittland Schutz zu suchen, entgegengehalten werden, fand in den Verhandlungen zur Annahme der GFK keine Mehrheit."

Somit ist es nicht: die M\u00f6glichkeit hatten, sondern: die M\u00f6glichkeit wahrgenommen hatten als - zumindest tempor\u00e4re - Niederlassung (die \u00fcber das zur Fl\u00fcchtfortsetzung notwendige hinausgeht), oder als Asylantrag und Gew\u00e4hrung. 

Und das ist nicht der einzige Grund - da ist auch noch der "good cause", darunter f\u00e4llt z.B. auch der Wunsch im selben Land wie Verwandte Zuflucht zu finden, darunter fallen aber auch sehr viele andere Gr\u00fcnde.

Und nur das keine Missverst\u00e4ndnisse aufkommen - ich habe auf: "Artikel 31 der Genfer Fl\u00fcchtlingskonvention erlaubt nur den Grenz\u00fcbertritt zur Flucht vor unmittelbarer Verfolgung. Sp\u00e4testens in der T\u00fcrkei ist diese nicht mehr gegeben." geantwortet. Nat\u00fcrlich sagt Art.31(1) nichts dar\u00fcber aus, ob z.B. Dublin-III Abschiebungen m\u00f6glich sind, es sagt nur etwas \u00fcber die Straffreiheit der illegalen Grenz\u00fcbertritte. Und diese liegt f\u00fcr einen Fl\u00fcchtling i.d.R. vor, bis er seine Flucht zu einem gewissen Grade beendet hat.&gt;Ja wir sind Teil von Europa. Aber Europa ist kein einheitliches Wirtschaftssystem. Wir sind finanziell alle voneinander getrennt. Die T\u00fcrkei geh\u00f6rt nebenbei gesagt nicht einmal zu Europa.

Der Gro\u00dfteil der Fl\u00fcchtlinge, war bereits in Europa - auf dem Balkan, entweder in Griechenland oder Bulgarien, oder in einem Bereich, der komplett von der EU umgeben ist. Und nat\u00fcrlich ist Europa kein vollst\u00e4ndig einheitlicher Wirtschaftsraum, aber insbesondere die EU ist ein eng vernetzter Wirtschaftsraum voller Abh\u00e4ngigkeiten auch in die umgebende Region und dar\u00fcberhinaus, gibt es unz\u00e4hlige Obligationen zur Hilfe der EU Staaten untereinander.

&gt;Wirtschaftlich und geopolitisch. Mit Wirtschaftlich bringst du es auf den Punkt. Warum tun wir uns das wirtschaftlich an?

Weil es ganz klar billiger ist, als eine humanit\u00e4re oder politische Katastrophe auf dem Balkan. Gerade verglichen mit dem zweiten sind die Kosten f\u00fcr "die paar" Fl\u00fcchtlinge peanuts.

&gt;Warum machen wir leichtfertig Fehler, f\u00fcr die noch unsere Enkel bezahlen m\u00fcssen?

Warum sollten unsere Enkel daf\u00fcr bezahlen sollen? Wer jetzt kommt, kommt erstmal als Fl\u00fcchting, und die tendieren dazu, zur Mehrheit das Land auch wieder zu verlassen (von den Syrern wollen 68% gleich wenn der Krieg vorbei ist nach Hause und 90% irgendwann). Ich zahle heute nichts mehr f\u00fcr Bosnien-Fl\u00fcchtlinge, davon hatten wir auch 350.000 in Deutschland (abgesehen davon, dass diese, zumindest in meinem Bundesland, ingesamt wirtschaftsf\u00f6rderlich waren).

Mit den jetztigen Zahlen rechne ich f\u00fcr die Zukunft nicht mit mehr als einer syrischen (und afghanischen) Diapora von wenigen hunderttausend in Deutschland.

Wenn es Dir um unsere Enkel geht, dann solltest Du lieber z.B. auf die Durchsetzung z.B. der Agenda 2030 pochen, und auf die Einhaltung und St\u00e4rkung auch des internationalen, auch humanit\u00e4ren, Rechts. Die Fl\u00fcchtlingsstr\u00f6me die wir jetzt sehen sind l\u00e4cherlich gegen das, was wir ansonsten in den kommenden Jahrzehnten sehen werden.Ah gut, wunderbar, lasst uns politische Gegner doch mal wieder in die Gulacks [sic] oder in KZs stecken, das war doch so sch\u00f6n. Aber w\u00e4re es nicht regional passender die "Volksverr\u00e4ter" und das "Lumpenpack" nach Bautzen zu w\u00fcnschen? Aber wer findet da jetzt 'nen guten Reim mit 'autzen?Oder auch nicht. Ich denke hier wird die falsche Unterscheidung zwischen rechts &lt;&gt; links gemacht und nicht zwischen Autorit\u00e4r/Totalit\u00e4r/Kollektivistisch &lt;&gt; Liberal/Anarchistisch. Die Autorit\u00e4ren sind heute meistens in der Lage recht gut miteinander auszukommen, und vertreten oft dieselben abstrusen Theorien und haben viele gemeinsame Freund- und Feindbilder. Noch wichtiger ist aber - die Fu\u00dfv\u00f6lker dieser Gruppen haben alle die gleiche sentimentale/emotionale Grundhaltung, wenn man die ganzen ideologischen Dekorationen entfernt. Sie wollen gemeinsame gegen oder f\u00fcr irgend jemand br\u00fcllen, irgendwen am n\u00e4chsten Baum aufh\u00e4ngen, in einem Kollektiv aufgehen, anderen vorschreiben wie und ob sie zu leben haben, ...  Ob die jetzt Kulacken, Langnasen, Sozialisten oder Demokraten an den Galgen w\u00fcnschen, ob das Kollektiv das deutsche Volk oder die Kommunisten sind, macht keinen gro\u00dfen Unterschied.

Ich vermute viele dieser Menschen w\u00e4ren recht schnell aktive Unterst\u00fctzer der autorit\u00e4ren, kollektivistischen Regimes gewesen, und zwar v\u00f6llig egal von welchem.Oh, ich vermisse das. In meiner Kindheit durften wir noch sch\u00f6ne Packerl aus dem Altpapier schn\u00fcren. Und jetzt? Einfach ungeordnet ab in die Tonne. Hin und wieder mache ich immer noch Packerl bevor ich sie in die Tonne werfe, das hat etwas sehr befriedigendes an sich - dann erkenne ich aber doch wie unsinnig das eigentlich ist...Ich fand es sch\u00f6n, wie wir als Kinder mit dem Leiterwagen, die ganzen Packerl die wir geschn\u00fcrt hatten, und auch ein paar geschenkte von den Nachbarn zum Altpapierh\u00e4ndler bringen und uns dann ein Eis oder S\u00fc\u00dfigkeiten kaufen konnten. 

Und wenn es keine Kinder wie uns in der Nachbarschaft gab, gemeinn\u00fctzige Organisationen haben die Packerl auch alle paar Wochen abgeholt.In Germany &gt;&gt;5% of the flats and houses are currently unused. If only a fraction of them is used for refugees, not many new ones have to be built.

http://de.statista.com/statistik/daten/studie/258767/umfrage/totale-leerstandsquote-von-wohnungen-nach-bundeslaendern/

https://www.destatis.de/DE/ZahlenFakten/GesellschaftStaat/EinkommenKonsumLebensbedingungen/Wohnen/Tabellen/Leerstandsquote.htmlWhich are those German indigenous peoples? Germany has been the melting pot of Europe for millenniums...Yeah, this is a Erstaufnahmeeinrichtung = reception center, the refugees are not meant to stay there for longer as 3-6 months.The Reception center will only be there, as long as it is needed. And it is not connected to settling refugees there, but to temporarily house them for 3-6 months.Temporary means in the context of a reception center 3-6 months.&gt; I don't listen to those they are all generally crap

Our public news radio stations are amongst the best ones world wide,  - in particular Deutschlandfunk and Deutschlandradio, but also the many regional ones."in doubt left" (im zweifel links) is a regular op-ed in the Spiegel, and clearly not the Spiegel's agenda, but only Jacob Augstein's.Yeah, it's temporary for the refugees, because it is only a reception center, they'll only stay there for 3-6 months. And it's temporary for the village, because of the unsuitable location, if it's not needed anymore, there won't be a reception center in this village anymore.Using an else abandoned building for an emergency measure as a reception center to house the refugees over the winter, instead of leaving them out in the cold in tents, is no fascism.&gt;changing the demographic face \u00f6f a place extremely like this irreversible then call it humanism. 

A temporary emergency measure to house refugees is an irreversible change of the demography? Neither individual refugees will stay there for longer than 6 months, nor will this _reception center_ exist there for a long time, it's in an completely unsuitable location.The law violation can't be persecuted, because the Geneva convention forbids to prosecute or threaten refugees for illegally crossing the border, if they are still on the flight (it doesn't matter how many countries they crossed before) or if they have another good cause for doing so. The only thing that makes it clearly punishable is if they _settled_ in another safe country before.I don't see that Merkel now supports multiculturalism. Did she say anything new about that? In the past she was clearly opposed to that idea and I don't think that changed.Man sollte nicht vergessen, dass wir gleichzeitig bei Wohngeb\u00e4uden und Wohnungen eine Leerstandsquote von &gt;&gt;5% haben.Well no - in all three cases:

are people protesting against it: Yes, fringe groups do for some time, they are related to right wing and far right parties. Those are no mass protests and they are also regional.

are opposition parties fighting against said policy: Yes, but none of the parties in the parliament, but the CSU, which is the party having a Union with Merkels party - so you can't really call that opposition.

Is the acceptance of merkel and her party from the voters crashing down?: Hers was going down, the one of the party didn't much. And crashing, well clearly no. She is now down from 64% to 54% approval rate, still one of the highest ones of any democratic leader. In Britain e.g. Cameron's rate at 41% is still called high, How long it is needed is a completely different question. Now it is needed for the winter, everybody knows that this is a bad location, but a necessary decision in an emergency situation. It's very unlikely that it is used for very long.

The 3-6 months are in my second sentence, this is about how long individual refugees will stay there - and that's 3-6 months - it's only a reception center. 

&gt;when there is no indication that the flow of refugees is stopping anytime soon?

Stopping - probably no. Getting much smaller - yes, pretty sure, pretty soon. The laws are currently getting changed, regulations on the EU and international level also, the countries taking the highest burden now finally have the chance to get more support. You may have a wrong impression of German politics and of Merkel, what she does in difference to others, is finally viewing the refugee crisis as a European and not a Greek, Serbian, Hungarian, German problem, and she liked to take pressure in particular out of the Balkan region and prevent a humanitarian and political catastrophe there - this was about people who are already in Europe, and about a pragmatic and humane solution for a common problem, that only would get worse by doing nothing (what she also did for much to long). About closing the entry points into the EU and Europe she is just another conservative, she also isn't opposed to the idea of transit zones or of having places of refuge outside the EU. About viewing problems more on a European and global scale than on a national one, she is likely not very conservative, but well, correct. The world has gotten much smaller in the last few decades, and if we don't put much effort into programs like the Agenda 2030, we'll probably will see refugee flow some orders of magnitude above what we see now. No, they are no immigrants but refugees, which either want to transit or ask for asylum in a country, and their staying in the country is legal if they soon after crossing the border report themselves to the authorities. Only the border crossing itself is formally illegal, but not allowed to be punished, or be threatened for with punishment.Reading the first half of the headline, I thought, wtf. did these assholes now really put 190 buildings in Berlin on fire :DWulff said this sentence, Merkel said about the same some time later and in another context. None of both said "True".

And well, sure the Islam is a part of Germany, &gt;4 million Muslims are living in Germany, 1-1.8 million of them are German citizens - do you think they are not a part of Germany, and that Merkel is not also the Chancellor of those citizens? At the same time she demanded integration, obeying to the laws and fundamental values, and clearly no multiculturalism or cultural relativism.Was ich so an Leerstand sehe (das ist nat\u00fcrlich \u00fcberhaupt nicht repr\u00e4sentativ) selbst selbst hier im reichen Teil des Westens sind gro\u00dfteils altere H\u00e4user oder Mietwohnungen, durchaus im mittleren oder unteren Segment einzuordnen und oft renovierungsbed\u00fcrftig. Ein Grund f\u00fcr den Leerstand sind oft auch teilweise \u00fcberzogene Anforderungen an die energetische Sanierung^1, die eine Renovierung f\u00fcr viele Vermieter, gerade im unteren Preissegment, wenig lukrativ scheinen lassen und die deshalb Renovierung und Vermietung auf die lange Bank geschoben haben. In dem Bereich ist man gerade dabei die Regeln etwas zu lockern - da k\u00f6nnte es also bald einen gr\u00f6\u00dferen Markt geben.

^1: ich halte das grunds\u00e4tzlich durchaus f\u00fcr sinnvoll - wenn man aber die Anforderung so hoch ansetzt, und sie im Falle jeder relevanten Renovierung oder Sanierung strikt einzuhalten sind und damit viel mehr gemacht werden muss, als man eigentlich wollte, dann f\u00fchrt das oft auch dazu, dass \u00fcberhaupt nicht mehr saniert wird.Niedersachsen is not some region in rural eastern Germany.&gt;Step 1: Only take a number of migrants that you can actually house and integrate.

For immigrants - yes. For refugees this is just not possible. We have to shelter as many as need shelter and didn't get it somewhere else. Also not all refugees can or want to be integrated - we still have to shelter them as long as they need. 

&gt;Step 2: Spend the money it takes for language courses and education to make sure these people do integrate

There are strong efforts to do that.

&gt;Or we can just take everybody and have them live in nice, ethnic gethos without learning German. Thats Merkels current plan.

No, Merkel's plan - in opposite like it was done ever before in Germany - is to integrate refugees from very early on, no matter if they want to stay or go home again. In the past we isolated refugees pretty much from the society, and clearly said, we don't want to integrate them, because that may build too many ties for people who are meant to leave Germany as soon as possible again.

So what you ask for, is more like "Merkel's plan", than any policy about refugees in Germany ever was.&gt;How do you think is the integration and language training going to work here?: 

&gt;https://www.reddit.com/r/europe/comments/3oomkj/german_village_of_100_to_house_1000_refugees/[1]

&gt;And if you think this is an isolated case, why arent these people brought to one of the nice, urban areas with better infrastructure and better education possibilities then?

This article is about a reception center, not a long term refugee shelter, integration starts after people leave these centers in not more than 3-6 months.We had 284,000 people without a home in 2012, but only 24,000 really slept rough.

&gt;Shouldn't they be used for homeless Germans before they are given to homeless foreigners?

Everybody in Germany who has no home, and has a right to stay here (what is not the case for illegal immigrants or some EU immigrants staying too long without financial means), can get a place by his city to live in, either in a shelter, a pension or a flat. The cities are obliged by the law to provide a shelter or home for every involuntary homeless, and they do. It's Germany, not the US.&gt;Dont prosecute or threaten. Get finger prints or DNA or retna scan and then explain the rules that they have to register in another country.

About this was done? For Hungary and Greece we can't anymore because the legal and humanitarian conditions there are too bad (this was ruled in numerous cases by the ECHR and the German courts), but in principle this is exactly Dublin-III. It has no direct relation to punishment for illegal border crossing of refugees - if they didn't settle in another country and are still fleeing, they can't be punished for that according to the Geneva Convention Art. 31(1).&gt;die gesetzliche Gleichberechtigung/-behandlung der Geschlechter

Das gibt es soweit ich wei\u00df nicht. 

&gt;Schutz von Minderheiten

Das ist durchaus der Fall in vielen L\u00e4ndern, die die Scharia als Grundlage verwenden, z.B. im Iran, Syrien und Israel.

&gt;Freiheit in der Partnerwahl 

Das garantiert soviel ich wei\u00df sogar der klar unantastbare Teil der Sharia, der sich direkt aus dem Koran ableitet - eine Ehe ist kann nur legal mit Einverst\u00e4ndnis beider Partner geschlossen werden. Das schlie\u00dft arrangierte Ehen nicht aus, Zwangsverheiratungen sind aber klar verboten und mehr einem Traditionalismus in manchen L\u00e4ndern, als dem Islam zuzuorden (wir hatten/haben ja das gleiche im Christentum, und dort ist es, nach dem Buch, genau so wenig erlaubt).Why? She is an elected chancellor in a democracy by proxy. As such she has the competence to set guidelines and also ask much from the people. The job of a sovereign-by-proxy is not to act always according to the polls, but to act how she thinks it is in the best interest of the complete people.You shouldn't forget that Merkel always has a bad double role is such negotiations - she is a proxy for Germany, but as the leader of the strongest country in Europe, she also has a moderating role, which must strife for a compromise and for getting a solution that can in the end be accepted by everybody. So it is very difficult to see her personal position in such questions.

I think in this particular case, she just wasn't sure what the less bad possible solution is, but she knew that there must be one. And so she didn't do that much at all.

Merkel is often opposed to Sch\u00e4uble - but they don't really show that in public. For Greece - Varoufakis just tried to play games with Sch\u00e4uble - that's pretty stupid, in particular for a game theorist, who should recognize, which whom he can play such nasty games, and with whom it will just lead to a hardening for the positions and to a worse solution for both parties, but in particular the weaker one. Sch\u00e4uble is a typical person from a small city in my region - these people are pretty grounded and pragmatic and you can talk with them and find a solution together. But one thing they hate, is playing such games, in reaction they'll just get sturdy like some old donkey. For somebody like Sch\u00e4uble, you have to deliver, not to demand, but then you can also get much from him. In the end we got the bad solution from Sch\u00e4uble, mostly because Greece never presented a good solution, never really negotiated, and even just left the negotiations in the middle.

(This is not only because of Sch\u00e4uble, but has also some realist fundamentals - the EU can only interfere in a few parameters in Greece from the outside, and those are pretty harming and restrictive. If Greece wants another solution, the proposals must come from Greece, the EU e.g. can't force deep structural reforms and changes on Greece)She is the German chancellor and a European politician, not a proxy of Eastern Europe. But from a realist (literal, not IR-theory) point of view, she did as much as possible, with what we were ready to invest, to keep the conflict small and to make clear, that Europe won't accept the breaches of international law by Russia.

Neither Eastern Europe, nor the US are ready to really invest - also with the military in this conflict. What she stopped is probably some lukewarm weapon deliveries by the US and a further Russian advance. She calmed the conflict down. That all she could do. It was clear all the time, that nobody was ready to invest so much in the conflict, that Russia is not able to counter-balance it anymore.

I think it's again one of her double roles, which makes it difficult to see her own position, in particular from outside of Germany. She was once again a proxy for Germany and Europe and thus a party of the conflict, but at the same time, the only possible negotiator and moderator, which both sides accepted.

edit: Let me add - I would give as much credit to Steinmeier for that as to Merkel. He is a more intellectual person, often staying in the background, but I think he is one of the best and most successful diplomats we ever had.&gt;She hasn't been anything really, she barely has an opinion on things.

She had pretty clear opinions on some things, e.g. conscription, nuclear energy, refugees. In many other little points she also went against her party line. For many other things, I am pretty sure, that Merkel is a pretty strong leader and moderator from the behind.

&gt;Time magazine may praise her for handling the financial crisis but how has any of her involvement really helped?

She helped to find a preliminary solution and doesn't have Greece falling out of the Euro-Zone or the EU. For how bad the solution is, I blame both sides, but in particular Greece. To come to a solution with people like Sch\u00e4uble, but also the huge block supporting him or even demanding harder measures than him in the EU, Greece had to deliver a solution for the internal problems themselves - the EU is so far no federation and can't solve or directly address those problems. Greece never did that, and the Greek proposals were also bad for the Greek population, in particular the poor. In the end Greece didn't really negotiate at all, and threw away the chance for a much better solution by hardening the positions so far, that they just had to accept the Sch\u00e4uble proposals (which probably never were meant to be accepted unnegotiated, but contained as such proposals always do, many point which were not only negotiable, but were clearly meant to be negotiated and changed, but in the very beginning of that process, Greece just ran away from the negotiation table and made their referendum, breaking another deadline).I see all those problems also, and hell, don't get me wrong, I don't like Sch\u00e4uble at all. I just think Varoufakis and Tsipras played the game with him nearly as bad as possible. And idk. how much interest Sch\u00e4uble has in Greece, but I know he had a high interest in getting rid of "the problem", and that he didn't personally care that much for the way it is solved, until the Greek government started to harden the fronts.

And yeah, I read many of the papers - I didn't see much really addressing fundamental problems in Greece, like "buying" voters with clientilism politics, like a completely overblown public sector, like not having clear distinct responsibility of administration bodies (something that leads to huge problems with investments), not having a fair tax and social system for the poor and so on. 

What I had demanded from Tsipras (in whom I really put some hope) is not the papers with just watered down EU-proposals and some sole reform proposals, but a solid and comprehensive, well calculated extensive reform program for Greece, also if it hurts many people, and many would complain, but could bare the burden. And with that he had also impressed Sch\u00e4uble, and would've been able to demand much more at the negotiation table.Beside that being a weird comparision because the systems are pretty different, I wrote:

_The job of a sovereign-by-proxy is not to act always according to the polls, but to act how she thinks it is in the best interest of the complete people._

Hitler did what he thought is best - but clearly not what he thought is in the best interest of __the complete__ people and I am even not sure if he did, what he thought is the best for the people, like he redefined it.&gt;None of you cared about the energy issues this is about

Which "energy issues" do you mean? This conflict is not about energy issues, at least not on a more than marginal level.We always had immigration, since 1950 on average about 400,000 more immigrants than emigrants a year. The number of Syrians coming now, will even if most of them stay, just triple the amount for one single average year.&gt;Die Anzahl der aktuell verf\u00fcgbaren, unqualifizierten Stellen in Relation zu den Arbeitslosenzahlen widerspricht deiner Theorie aber.

Vielleicht sind diese Jobs auch einfach nicht angemessen bezahlt, insbesondere wenn das Einkommen auch noch auf Hartz 4 etc. angerechnet wird?

&gt;Menschen sind produktiv wenn sie produktiv sein wollen (weil ihnen das T\u00e4tigkeitsfeld gef\u00e4llt) oder m\u00fcssen (weil sie ihren Lebensunterhalt verdienen m\u00fcssen).

Das zweite ist meistens nicht nur "m\u00fcssen" - die allermeisten Leute arbeiten wesentlich mehr als sie "m\u00fcssen", da sie einen h\u00f6heren Lebensstandard wollen.&gt;H\u00e4tten wir ein BGE w\u00fcrden wir die Grenze zur Massensklaverei in dem Moment \u00fcberschreiten indem wir von einer Minderheit erwarten das n\u00f6tige Einkommen f\u00fcr eine Mehrheit zu generieren.

Nun, dass w\u00e4re der Fall, wenn Du erwartest, dass nur eine Minderheit arbeitet. 

&gt;Wir sind aber nicht daf\u00fcr verantwortlich jedem den Lebensstandard zu erm\u00f6glichen, den er gerne h\u00e4tte, selbst wenn dieser seine M\u00f6glichkeiten \u00fcbersteigt.

Das ist auch nicht die Idee des Grundeinkommens - es soll ja nur ein Grundeinkommen sein - nicht mehr. Wenn jemand einen erh\u00f6hten Lebensstandard will, muss er immer noch arbeiten.Richtig - aber die ist grade mal genug dass Du "Fressen und Schei\u00dfen" kannst (zumindest wenn Du wirklich die Grundsicherung meinst, die z.B. ein geduldeter Ausl\u00e4nder bekommt). Ein BGE w\u00fcrde ein w\u00fcrdiges Leben erm\u00f6glichen - aber eben keinen Luxus.Wenn Du vielleicht 500 bis maximal 1000 Euro im Monat zum Leben h\u00e4ttest (nach Grundausgaben - ein h\u00f6heres BGE wollen ja die meisten nicht) - w\u00e4rst Du dann z.B. nicht bereit, einen Tag in der Woche einige Stunden M\u00fcll zu sortieren (wobei man das automatisieren kann), um Dein verf\u00fcgbares Geld zu verdoppeln? Wenn niemand mehr solche Jobs machen _muss_, w\u00fcrde der Preis/Lohn ja auch wirklich wieder von Angebot und Nachfrage bestimmt und die Entlohnung (und der Anreiz zur Automatisierung) w\u00e4re entsprechend.Ich hatte die Gelegenheit "white collar jobs" und "Werkstattarbeit" zu machen. Ich ziehe eine Kombination von beidem vor - zumindest wenn die Arbeitsbedingungen (und evtl. auch die Entlohnung) in dem "Drecksjob" stimmen.
Ich w\u00fcrde die viele dieser miesen Jobs f\u00fcr eine angemessene Bezahlung und bei guten Arbeitsbedingungen (das w\u00e4re bei einem Grundeinkommen m\u00f6glich, da dann wieder Angebot und Nachfrage den Preis/Lohn bestimmt) f\u00fcr einige Stunden die Woche zu machen - bei den meisten davon, w\u00fcrde es mir vermutlich sogar Spa\u00df machen.&gt;Aber das bedeutet nicht, dass wir den Drang nach h\u00f6herer Bildung durch ein Grundeinkommen abschw\u00e4chen sollten, ganz im Gegenteil.

Bei vielen bremst nicht ein Grundeinkommen den Drang nach h\u00f6herer Bildung - sondern das Gegenteil - dass sie w\u00e4hrend sie sich Bilden, momentan grunds\u00e4tzlich gar kein Einkommen haben.&gt;Es gibt Unmengen von Aufgaben, die theoretisch automatisiert werden k\u00f6nnen, aber aus verschiedensten Gr\u00fcnden nicht automatisiert werden. Der Kapitalismus ist ziemlich gut darin, Dinge umzusetzen, wenn sie tats\u00e4chlich f\u00fcr die Firma Geld sparen - deswegen w\u00fcrde ich davon ausgehen, dass das bei aktuellem Stand wesentlich teurer wird, es zu automatisieren.

Nun, mit einem BGE w\u00e4re man dann eben wieder bei echtem Angebot und Nachfrage - es w\u00e4re niemand mehr gezwungen diese Arbeit zu machen. Und dann gilt Dein Prinzip - man muss eben sehen, was billiger ist - jemand angemessen zu entlohnen und die Bedingungen schaffen, damit er den Job machen will oder Automatisieren.

edit (sorry, zu fr\u00fch gedr\u00fcckt):

&gt;Dazu vielleicht eine etwas realpolitischere (und latent menschenverachtende) Betrachtung: Wenn wir in Deutschland f\u00fcr den normalen Menschen paradiesische Zust\u00e4nde schaffen, wird es nicht bei 80 Millionen Deutschen bleiben. F\u00fcr 800 Millionen oder 8 Milliarden Menschen zweifele ich aber daran, dass wir das auf absehbare Zeit in Deutschland realisiert bekommen. Dementsprechend m\u00fcssen wir entweder die anderen Leute drau\u00dfen halten oder diese Weiterentwicklung als globale Aufgabe betrachten, die wir nicht isoliert in Deutschland abziehen k\u00f6nnen.

Da sehe auch ich das Hauptproblem mit dem Grundeinkommen. Die meisten anderen Gegenargumente halte ich f\u00fcr schwach.&gt; Ich wei\u00df ja nicht, wie die Umsetzung eines BGE in einer kapitalistischen Gesellschaft real funktionieren soll, finde als Kommunist den Grundgedanken aber nat\u00fcrlich ansprechend. Letztenendes ist eine Form bedingungsloser Lebenssicherung Teil meiner Vorstellung einer idealen Gesellschaft.

Nun, ich sehe mich weder als Kommunist - noch Kapitalist - sondern eher als ultra-liberal. Ich m\u00f6chte einen freien Markt - auch Arbeitsmarkt. Aber gerade um diesen Markt zu befreien, muss man auch die Machtstruktur entfernen, die bedingt, dass man Arbeiten muss, um zu leben. F\u00fcr mich ist, zumindest ein relativ hohes, Grundeinkommen auch immer damit verbunden, dass man gleichzeitig viele Arbeitsmarkrestriktionen entfernt oder reduziert, weil man sie nicht mehr ben\u00f6tigt, um diese Machtstruktur auszugleichen - vom Mindestlohn, bis hin zu einem gesetzlichen K\u00fcndigungsschutz. Danke.

1. Richtig - ich betrachte hier die Gesamtproduktivit\u00e4t einer Gesellschaft. Wie man das, was diese generiert aufteilt ist ziemlich willk\u00fcrlich - das ist auch jetzt schon so.

2. Jein - aber ich kann mir durchaus vorstellen, dass sowas Spa\u00df machen kann, wenn man es freiwillig mit entsprechenden Anreizen und nicht unter Zwang tut. Nat\u00fcrlich nicht 8 Stunden am Tag, 5 Tage die Woche und nur f\u00fcr einen angemessenen Lohn und guten Arbeitsbedingungen (und vielleicht auch mal Anerkennung, statt Stigma). Das w\u00fcrde sich dann eben wirklich aus Angebot und Nachfrage ergeben, und nicht mehr, weil jemand gezwungen ist, diesen Job zu machen (abgesehen davon, ist das ein voll oder semi-automatisierbarer Job - bis auf die Vorsortierung ist das heute auch durchaus schon \u00fcblich)

3. Ja, die Lohnstrukturen w\u00fcrden sich dadurch \u00e4ndern, dass man einen freien Markt h\u00e4tte. Und niemand erwartet, dass man nur aus Berufung arbeitet - aber wenn es nicht genug gibt, die eine Arbeit zu den jetzigen Bedingungen zu erledigen, dann muss man eben entsprechende Anreize schaffen - die k\u00f6nnen in Entlohnung, guten Arbeitsbedingungen oder auch ganz anderen Dingen stecken.

&gt;Und mir hat noch niemand erkl\u00e4ren k\u00f6nnen, wo pro Monat 61.500.000.000 (8,2*107 * 750\u20ac1 ) Euro herkommen sollen. Aufs Jahr gerechnet entspricht das, 738.000.000.000 \u20ac - den 2,45-fachen Einnahmen des Bundes.

Wir haben jetzt eine Staatsquote von knapp unter 50% des BSP - das ist die Zahl, die man sich eher ansehen m\u00fcsste - das ist der Anteil der jetzt schon vom Staat irgendwie (um)verteilt wird, wenn man staatliche Einfl\u00fcsse auf den Arbeitsmarkt einbezieht ist es sogar noch mehr. Und wie schon in Punkt (1) geschrieben - momentan haben wir eine willk\u00fcrliche Verteilung dessen, was wir alle zusammen generieren, und dann h\u00e4tten wir eben eine andere, meiner Ansicht bessere und produktivere, weil man auch den Wert der Arbeit wieder angemessen darstellen w\u00fcrde. Du musst einfach mal out-of-the-box denken und das System unvoreingenommen und auch von au\u00dfen betrachten. Ein Grundeinkommen w\u00e4re nicht einfach eine Erg\u00e4nzung f\u00fcr unser System, sondern w\u00fcrde es grundlegend umkrempeln.&gt;Wieso sollte ich als jemand, der f\u00fcr sein Geld hart arbeitet, und der offenbar keinen Vorteil durch das BGE erh\u00e4lt, eine solche Idee bef\u00fcrworten?

Schon alleine weil es mich ankotzt, dass andere in Armut leben m\u00fcssen oder f\u00fcr ein unangemessenes Gehalt gezwungen werden irgendwelche Schei\u00dfjobs zu machen, obwohl wir so reich sind, dass dies absolut nicht n\u00f6tig w\u00e4re. Das wirkt sich ganz deutlich auf meine Lebensqualit\u00e4t aus und macht mich unzufrieden.&gt;Und selbst f\u00fcr jene, die am Verlieren keine Spa\u00df haben, ist Spielen in keinster Weise mit Realit\u00e4tsflucht gleichzusetzen.

F\u00fcr viele - die, die man meiner Ansicht nach f\u00e4lschlicherweise als s\u00fcchtig bezeichnet - ist das durchaus oft Flucht vor irgendwas. Nat\u00fcrlich trifft das auf die meisten Spieler, auch die, die es weil es ihnen einfach Spa\u00df macht mal eine zeitlang \u00fcbertreiben, nicht zu. Und es ist auch nicht auf Spiele beschr\u00e4nkt. Und die, die es betrifft, wissen meistens ganz genau, dass sie ein Problem haben.&gt;Das Argument zieht vielleicht wenn es um ein Studium geht, es ist aber keineswegs anwendbar wenn jemand nur einen Hauptschulabschluss hat.

Ich sagte ja, viele - nicht alle. Viele Leute lernen gerne neue Dinge - sowohl theoretisch als auch praktisch - insbesondere, wenn es nicht unter Zwang geschieht. Oder sie wollen etwas anderes machen - dass jemand nichts machen will, sich selbst nicht ver\u00e4ndern will, nichts f\u00fcr andere tun will, ist die absolute Ausnahme.

&gt;Ich hab mich auch mit meiner eigenen H\u00e4nde Arbeit durchs Studium gebracht. War nicht lustig, keineswegs, aber machbar.

H\u00e4ttest Du nicht vielleicht was anderes oder l\u00e4nger studiert - wenn Dich die Kosten nicht abgehalten h\u00e4tten? Oder auch einfach mehr Zeit in Dein Studium investiert? Oder vielleicht mitten in Deinem Leben noch mal einen Break gemacht, was anderes, neues studiert?1. Nein - wir verteilen das Geld jetzt schon nicht an die, die den Wohlstand verursachen (ich w\u00fcsste noch nicht mal, wie man das bestimmen soll), sondern ziemlich willk\u00fcrlich auf einem hoch regulierten Markt. Meiner Ansicht nach w\u00fcrde ein Grundeinkommen hier sogar zur Deregulierung f\u00fchren.

2. Ganz einfach - weil er auf einem dann wirklich freien Markt Mitarbeiter zu den f\u00fcr ihn besten Konditionen finden will. Wenn niemand den Job Vollzeit machen will, oder nur f\u00fcr wesentlich mehr Entlohnung, dann wird er Teilzeit anbieten. Das wird einfach von Angebot und Nachfrage reguliert.

3. Wir haben alles andere als einen freien Arbeitsmarkt, sondern einen der ganz grunds\u00e4tzlich dadurch gepr\u00e4gt ist, dass man Arbeiten muss um in W\u00fcrde leben zu k\u00f6nnen und man deshalb manche Arbeit auch unangemessen niedrig entlohnen kann. Und mit Mindestlohn und vielen anderen Ma\u00dfnahmen bis hin zu gesetzlichem K\u00fcndigungsschutz regulieren wir dann wieder dagegen an.

&gt;(etwa, weil die Arbeitskraft nicht mehr Umsatz generiert -&gt; Altenpflege).

Wieviel "Umsatz" Altenpflege generiert ist eine vollkommen willk\u00fcrlich Annahme. Oder wie willst Du das bemessen? Ist bessere Pflege, die die Alten etwas gl\u00fccklicher macht oder ihr Leben etwas verl\u00e4ngert, ein h\u00f6herer Umsatz? Oder gar ein Schaden?

&gt;Die Arbeitgeber haben ein wundervolles Argument, wie sie L\u00f6hne dr\u00fccken k\u00f6nnen.

Erstmal - mit einem Mindesteinkommen und einem angemessenen Freibetrag halte ich das f\u00fcr keinerlei Problem - L\u00f6hne k\u00f6nnen dann frei nach Angebot und Nachfrage verhandelt werden - ein Lohn von 1 Euro die Stunde ist dann auch ok - nur wird der Arbeitgeber, je nach Arbeit - Probleme haben, jemanden zu finden, der daf\u00fcr die Arbeit erledigen will...

&gt;4. Staatsquote von knapp unter 50% hei\u00dft, da\u00df der durchschnittliche Deutsche die H\u00c4LFTE seines Einkommens an den Staat abdr\u00fccken muss.

Nein, dass hei\u00dft es nicht. Das hei\u00dft, dass ca. 50% von allem was erwirtschaftet wird, mindestens einmal durch Staats- oder staatsregulierte Haushalte flie\u00dft und der Staat \u00fcber dessen Verwendung entscheidet - es verteilt. Dieses Geld verschwindet nicht - irgendjemand bekommt es.

&gt;Mehr als 100% geht nicht (und dann h\u00e4tten wir das BGE immer noch nicht finanziert).

Irgendwie passt das nicht mit Deiner eignen Rechnung (die aber auch vieles ausl\u00e4sst...). Wir haben ein BIP von ca. 3000 Milliarden und eine inl\u00e4ndische Verwendung von ca. 2700 Milliarden Euro, damit eine Staatsquote von ca. 1300-1400 Milliarden Euro. Deine Kostenrechnung landet da weit drunter.

&gt;Wenn aber durch Arbeit meine Lebensqualit\u00e4t nicht mehr steigt (etwa: weil meine Steuerlast den Gro\u00dfteil meines Mehrverdienstes auffrisst), wieso arbeite ich dann \u00fcberhaupt?

Das fordert ja \u00fcberhaupt niemand - Du wirst die Arbeit nur machen, wenn Du sie f\u00fcr notwenig h\u00e4lst (z.B. Pflege von Angeh\u00f6rigen und Freunden, andere ehrenamtliche T\u00e4tigkeiten) oder weil Du daf\u00fcr etwas bekommst - Spa\u00df, Befriedigung, Anerkennung, Geld. Das wird sich mit dem BGE nicht \u00e4ndern - ich will ja keinen gleiches Einkommen f\u00fcr alle oder ein so hohes BGE, dass es jeden Luxus abdeckt.&gt;Ich habe mit dem viele ein Problem. Das klingt so, als w\u00e4re es auch nur ann\u00e4hernd Standard. In Wirklichkeit trifft das nur auf eine verschwindende Minderheit zu, der Rest ist einfach zu faul oder bequem.

Das halte ich f\u00fcr falsch - die allermeisten Leute sind nicht so faul, dass sie nichts machen wollen - das ist f\u00fcr die meisten h\u00f6chst unbefriedigend. Ich kenne recht viele Rentner und Pension\u00e4re, die durchaus eine gute Rente haben, und bei denen am Rest vom Monat einiges Geld auf dem Konto bleibt - aber von denen, die k\u00f6nnen, gehen dennoch die meisten in gewissem Umfang irgendeiner entgeltlichen oder unentgeltlichen T\u00e4tigkeit nach. Und wir haben auch jetzt schon sehr viele Menschen, die in ihrer Freizeit v\u00f6llig freiwillig einer T\u00e4tigkeit die produktiv ist, nachgehen - vom klassischen Ehrenamt, \u00fcber die politische Aktivit\u00e4t, \u00fcber die Pflege von Angeh\u00f6rigen und Kindererziehung, \u00fcber die Unterhaltung eines Gem\u00fcsegartens, bis hin zur Reparatur und Herstellung von eigenen und fremden Dingen. All das beinhaltet eine gesellschaftliche Wertsch\u00f6pfung und passiert sogar ganz ohne Entlohnung, einfach weil es Menschen tun wollen und weil sie unbefriedigt sind, wenn sie nicht produktiv sein k\u00f6nnen. Und nat\u00fcrlich gibt es da auch Ausnahmen - die halte ich bei entsprechenden Anreizen aber f\u00fcr vernachl\u00e4ssigbar.

&gt;Ja, aber, so d\u00e4mlich das auch klingt: Das Leben ist kein Ponnyhof. Wir haben nicht das Recht, uns von der Gesellschaft unsere W\u00fcnsche erf\u00fcllen zu lassen ohne selbst daf\u00fcr zu arbeiten.

Das sollte man erst gar nicht zu Ende denken. Zumindest wenn der Wunsch einfach nur in einem w\u00fcrdigen Leben und nicht z.B. in einer Luxusjacht, besteht.&gt;Du glaubst also, Flie\u00dfbandarbeiter Harald tr\u00e4gt mehr zum Wohlstand bei als Firmenlenker Karl oder Ingenieur Peter. Das gleitet jetzt in die Ideologie ab, \u00fcber die man sich trefflich streiten kann. Lassen wir diese Diskussion?

Ich wollte diese Diskussion auch nicht starten, weil ich eine solche Bemessung f\u00fcr nicht m\u00f6glich und auch nicht w\u00fcnschenswert halte.

&gt;Betonung auf "f\u00fcr ihn" im Sinne von Arbeitgeber. Deine Skizze ist ein Gefangenenszenario, das so lange funktioniert, bis der erste umf\u00e4llt. D.h. das Teilzeitdiktat funktioniert so lange, bis einer der potentiellen Arbeitnehmer ein teures Hobby hat und mehr Geld braucht, d.h. den Job braucht, und sich zur Vollzeit bereiterkl\u00e4rt.

Ja - dann hat der Markt auch funktioniert - ich sehe Dein Problem nicht? Wenn jemand z.B. Vollzeit M\u00fcll sortieren (weil dieses Beispiel hier so beliebt ist) will und das f\u00fcr ein niedriges Einkommen, um sich damit ein Luxushobby zu finanzieren, dann ist das doch ok und viel besser, als wenn er das tun muss, damit er seine Familie einigerma\u00dfen anst\u00e4ndig \u00fcber die Runden bringen kann? Auch wenn das viele wollen w\u00fcrden, und damit die Entlohnung sinkt, sehe ich das Problem nicht.

&gt;Du musst nicht (f\u00fcr andere) arbeiten, um in W\u00fcrde leben zu k\u00f6nnen. Du kannst dich selbstst\u00e4ndig machen, oder einen Garten bestellen. Du kannst Homesteaden. Du kannst dir Gedanken dar\u00fcber machen, ob Dinge wie "Urlaub auf Malle" oder "Smartphone" wirklich f\u00fcr deine Definition von "W\u00fcrde" n\u00f6tig sind.

Naja, man braucht auch eine Wohnung und etwas Geld um an der Gesellschaft partizipieren zu k\u00f6nnen. Das sehen selbst die Macher von Hartz 4 so. Und ja - Selbstst\u00e4ndigkeit ist ein sch\u00f6nes Modell, dass auch durch ein BGE gef\u00f6rdert w\u00fcrde - man kann dann n\u00e4mlich auch ohne eigenes Einkommen starten, und man fliegt nicht besonders hart auf die Schnauze, wenn es schief geht.

&gt;Im Gegenteil, das l\u00e4sst sich genau beziffern: Einnahmen - Ausgaben - Steuern.

Richtig, sorry.

&gt;Man k\u00f6nnte hier gasp den Markt agieren lassen: Mindeststandards definieren. Wer bessere Pflege leistet, der kann daf\u00fcr auch mehr verlangen. Und die kann sich dann leisten, wer gespart hat. Oder man kann Pflege wieder dorthin verorten, wo sie hin geh\u00f6rt: In die Familie. Aber das ist ja hoch unsozial /s.

Nun, f\u00fcr das erste muss man erstmal bessere Pflege und den Nutzen von Pflege definieren. F\u00fcr das zweite - ja, die M\u00f6glichkeit m\u00f6chte ich auch - und auch deshalb m\u00f6chte ich ein Grundeinkommen - damit kann man dann n\u00e4mlich auch einfach mal einige Zeit nicht oder weniger arbeiten und sich um die Pflege von Angeh\u00f6rigen oder Freunden k\u00fcmmern.

&gt;Keine Sorge, es wird Leute geben, die das machen werden. Im Osten hat neulich ein Anwalt noch B\u00fcrohilfen f\u00fcr 1,54 Cent besch\u00e4ftigt.

Es sind 1,54 Euro. Und mit einem BGE halte ich das f\u00fcr akzeptabel, wenn denn jemand daf\u00fcr arbeiten will.

&gt;Richtig. Aber erstmal ist es auf meinem und deinem Lohnzettel weg. Und in Hamburg am anderen Ende der Republik bauen sie dann eine sch\u00f6ne Philharmonie davon. Na danke.

Das meiste davon flie\u00dft in Sozialausgaben und Geh\u00e4lter. Dieses Geld bekommt jemand und lebt davon (und zahlt oft dann auch wieder Steuern und Abgaben und der Kreislauf beginnt von neuem...). Manchmal auch jemand, der eine Philharmonie baut, oder sp\u00e4ter dort als K\u00fcnstler t\u00e4tig ist.

&gt;sigh Nochmal. Der BIP ist absolut irrelevant. Relevant sind die Einnahmen des Bundes.

Der Bundeshaushalt ist nur ein Teil des Geldes das vom Staat umverteilt wird, warum willst Du nur darauf sehen? Ein BGE wird an anderen Stellen Kosten erzeugen, und Kosten vermeiden - wenn Du diese Systeme nicht einbeziehst, landest Du bei einem v\u00f6llig falschen Ergebnis. Die Einf\u00fchrung eines BGE w\u00fcrde ja eine Umkremplung des Gesamt-Systems bedingen.

&gt;Der Bundeshaushalt rechnet mit Einnahmen von 301.600.000.000 \u20ac - die Ausgaben d\u00fcrfen nicht langfristig wesentlich dar\u00fcber liegen, sonst kippt das System (--&gt; Griechenlandkrise).

Das ist aber kein Problem des Bundeshaushaltes sondern des gesamten Staates.

&gt;Wird der Bundeshaushalt mit einer Staatsquote von 50% erreicht, dann kann man ihn bei 100% maximal auf 603.200.000.000 steigern. Dir wird auffallen, das das weniger ist als die erwartenden Kosten aus dem BGE.

Nein. Nehmen wir mal an Deine Ergebnis w\u00e4re richtig und man m\u00fcsste den Bundeshaushalt verdoppeln: 

Um ihn zu verdoppeln m\u00fcsste man eine Staatsquote von ca. 1300 Milliarden um 300 Milliarden erh\u00f6hen, das sind ~20%, wenn man es auf die Gesamtproduktivit\u00e4t bezieht, etwa ~10% mehr davon aufwenden. Es verdopplen sich ja nicht alle anderen Haushalte gleichm\u00e4ssig mit. Wir haben jetzt eine Staatsquote von ~44% - dann h\u00e4tten wir eine von ~53% - das w\u00e4re auf dem Niveau von Belgien und immernoch 4% unter Frankreich oder Finland, die beide bei ca. 58% liegen. 

&gt;Und dann hast Du noch keinen Euro in Infrastruktur gesteckt, oder Gesundheitswesen... Und Du hast noch nicht gesagt, wie die L\u00e4nder und Kommunen finanziert werden sollen.

All das ist in der Staatsquote jetzt schon drin, und wird auch drin bleiben - deshalb verwende ich ja diese Zahl.

&gt;&gt;Spa\u00df, Befriedigung, Anerkennung, Geld.

&gt;Das hei\u00dft, wenn sich niemand findet, dem es Spa\u00df macht, der sich auch nicht mit einem Bundesverdienstkreuz davon \u00fcberzeugen l\u00e4sst, der keine sexuelle Affinit\u00e4t zeigt, Kan\u00e4le zu reinigen, ersticken wir in unserer eigenen Schei\u00dfe? Super.

Das ist arg verdreht. Und ich w\u00fcrde durchaus ein paar Wochen im Jahr Kan\u00e4le reinigen, wenn man mich entsprechend daf\u00fcr bezahlt und ich w\u00fcrde vermutlich auch Spa\u00df dabei haben - warum nicht (ja, ich kenne den Job, ich habe sowohl viele Kl\u00e4ranlagen besucht, bin durch Kan\u00e4le gelaufen und habe auch mit Abwasser mit Labor gearbeitet)? Das ist ein interessanter Job und die Leute die es heute machen sind durchaus stolz auf ihre Arbeit und m\u00f6gen diese grunds\u00e4tzlich auch (btw. das ist kein Job f\u00fcr komplett ungelernte, sondern in den meisten F\u00e4llen recht anspruchsvoll, er hat nur ein erb\u00e4rmlich schlechtes Ansehen). Ich w\u00fcrde es aber nicht ausschlie\u00dflich machen wollen.

Und wtf. sexuelle Affinit\u00e4t - es ist auch einfach sehr befriedigend am Ende vom Tag zu sehen, dass der Kanal wieder sauber ist, und man was geleistet hat, auch f\u00fcr die Gesellschaft. Und Anerkennung ist kein Bundesverdienstkreuz, sondern einfach dass andere Menschen sehen das man etwas geleistet hat und das w\u00fcrdigen.

&gt;&gt;ich will ja keinen gleiches Einkommen f\u00fcr alle oder ein so hohes BGE, dass es jeden Luxus abdeckt.

&gt;Nenn doch mal ne Zahl.

Das kann ich aus dem Stegreif nicht. Da m\u00fcsste ich lange rumrechnen, und es h\u00e4ngt von vielen Randbedingungen ab. Ohne Miete und verwandte Kosten und weiteren Staatsabgaben vielleicht irgendwo zwischen 500-1000 Euro - darauf m\u00f6chte ich mich aber nicht festlegen - es geht hier erstmal um eine grunds\u00e4tzliche Frage.&gt; Der Mensch geht den Weg des geringsten Widerstandes, das liegt in unserer Natur. Wenn wir ein Erfolgserlebnis bekommen ohne viel daf\u00fcr zu tun, wird die Mehrheit der Menschen damit zufrieden sein.

Ich teile dieses Menschenbild nicht. Und die Wirklichkeit best\u00e4tigt mich - Menschen suchen st\u00e4ndig Herausforderungen und Erfolgserlebnisse - und das normalerweise eben gerade nicht auf dem einfachsten und bequemsten Weg - schau Dir einfach mal Bergsteiger an, die w\u00e4hlen meistens eher gerade den schwierigsten Weg, den sie gerade noch schaffen k\u00f6nnen. Und auch ein Computerspiel spielt doch keiner auf der einfachsten Stufe, weil es dann bequemer ist und man einfacher zum "Erfolgserlebnis" kommt? 

Einfach nur ein Einkommen zu haben, bietet aber erstmal gar kein Erfolgerlebnis.

&gt;&gt;Das sollte man erst gar nicht zu Ende denken. Zumindest wenn der Wunsch einfach nur in einem w\u00fcrdigen Leben und nicht z.B. in einer Luxusjacht, besteht.

&gt;Aber f\u00fcr ein w\u00fcrdiges Leben brauchen wir kein BGE, Harz4 reicht daf\u00fcr locker aus.

Hartz 4 ist erstmal kein grunds\u00e4tzliches Recht von jedem, das antragslos existiert (das ist ein gro\u00dfer Unterschied zur alten Sozialhilfe - diese war ein Recht, das auch ohne Antrag, einfach aus den Tatsachen, bestand) und es ist an Bedingungen gekn\u00fcpft, und wird bei Einkommen und Missverhalten gek\u00fcrzt. Selbst ein Grundeinkommen auf Hartz 4 Niveau, w\u00e4re ein komplett anderes System als Hartz 4.

Und die W\u00fcrde - nun, darum betteln zu m\u00fcssen und Anspr\u00fcche erf\u00fcllen zu m\u00fcssen damit man was zu Essen hat, ist nicht w\u00fcrdig. Und der Betrag ist es f\u00fcr viele auch nicht, weil es zumindest je nach Region und Geschick eben nicht reicht - sonst w\u00fcrden wir  keine langen Schlangen z.B. bei den Tafeln sehen.&gt;Ein BGE w\u00fcrde das Angebot reduzieren. 

Sehe ich nicht so. Es w\u00fcrde das Angebot ver\u00e4ndern - es w\u00fcrde aber gerade das Angebot im Niedriglohnsektor erh\u00f6hen, da man dann keinen Mindestlohn und weitere Restriktionen mehr braucht. Und auch die Arbeitsbedingungen w\u00fcrden eine wesentlich h\u00f6here Rolle spielen. Das erste w\u00fcrde nat\u00fcrlich auch die Konkurrenzf\u00e4higkeit auf dem internationalen Markt erh\u00f6hen.

Es w\u00fcrde es aber z.B. auch wieder m\u00f6glich machen, dass man Dinge repariert und erh\u00e4lt anstatt produziert, weil es ja eben den abh\u00e4ngigen Lohnanteil senken w\u00fcrde, und damit auch den Wert der Dinge (der Rohstoffe und der daf\u00fcr bereits geleisteten Arbeit) relativ erh\u00f6ht.

&gt;Letztlich muss man sich eben \u00fcberlegen, ob diese Freiheit f\u00fcr die Menschen einem diese Geldmenge wert ist.

Nun, ich sehe das eingebettet in einen gesellschaftlichen Wandel - der mehr Freiheitsgrade f\u00fcr jeden Einzelnen bietet - aber auch das quantitative Wachstum beschr\u00e4nkt, weil er Arbeit wieder zum einem normalen Gut macht, wie auch Dinge. 

&gt;Wir sind auch jetzt bei echtem Angebot und Nachfrage - es ist v\u00f6llig normal, dass Angebot und Nachfrage von diversen Sachen beeinflusst werden.

Ein Mindestlohn, Hartz 4 Aufstockung, Arbeitsf\u00f6rderung,... macht einen Markt in diesem Bereich v\u00f6llig unm\u00f6glich. Das ist alles andere als ein selbstregulierter Markt, gerade ein Mindestlohn schlie\u00dft ja ein komplettes Marktsegment komplett aus.

Das ist richtig. Und die Gesamtkosten f\u00fcr die Ausbildung/Einarbeitung w\u00fcrden sich nat\u00fcrlich erh\u00f6hen. 

Aber Deinen Job meinte ich vermutlich nicht (nun, je nach dem was du genau meinst) - und andere vermutlich auch nicht - "dienstleisten" in der Gastronomie ist kein mieser Job, sondern nur ein mies entlohnter Job.&gt;Nur um das klar zu stellen - ich arbeite gerne, aber wenn das Grundeinkommen gesichert ist wird kaum einer sagen "Ach ja, h\u00e4tte gerne etwas mehr, ich mach jetzt M\u00fcllabfuhr / Kanalreinigung / Gastronomie / Personalsachbearbeiter der Stadt Castrop-Rauxel"

Die ersten zwei k\u00f6nnten mir durchaus Sp\u00e1\u00df machen, wenn ich sie nur ein paar Wochen/Monate im Jahren machen w\u00fcrde und die Arbeitsbedingungen nicht gesundheitssch\u00e4dlich sind, Gastronomie mag ich nicht so - aber dann, Personalsachbearbeiter - da graust es mir wirklich.

&gt;Es w\u00e4re vielleicht zu allgemein gesagt, dass nur eine Minderheit arbeiten w\u00fcrde, aber wir h\u00e4tten warscheinlich einen massiven \u00dcberschuss bei popul\u00e4ren Berufen und einen erheblichen Mangel in Jobs, die die Leute eben nicht so gerne machen.

Dann m\u00fcssen diese Job eben besser bezahlt werden, die Arbeitsbedingungen verbessert werden, oder anders Anreize geschaffen werden oder man automatisiert sie weg, wenn das billiger ist. Das ist eben einfach der Markt - diesmal aber ohne Zwang f\u00fcr eine Seite.It's not similar, but still pretty close - hot food at ~90\u00b0C has a temperature difference of ~80 K to a fridge and ~70 K to my kitchen. At ~50\u00b0C it's still only ~40 K to ~30 K. Just too add some info - as far as I understand it (IANAL), you are not the suspect, and you won't have to pay, you are just asked as a witness. The suspect is the so far not known driver - and they'll get the second letter and have to pay, because they committed the offense.&gt;Addiction to junk food is not 'a little weaker' than addiction to heroin. People will not beg, steal and kill to afford McDonalds, but they will do that and more to fuel their drug addictions.

That's correct, but only for some very addictive drugs, in particular heroin. For most illegal drugs it is not.

&gt;The magnitude of the issue is of a different order, and pretending that it's just like any other industry would be dangerous and wrong.

I think for most illegal drugs it is, in reference to this issue, comparable to a part of the pharmaceutical, to the alcohol or coffee industry.Well, I tried opiates decades ago - and I didn't like it. I understood back then, that somebody who likes this state of mind, prefers it to the regular state and gets addicted to it, probably had some serious emotional problems before.

That's also my experience with all people I knew in my life which got addicted to heroin. So at least many of these people tried to cope with mental, neurological or social problems they already had before with the wrong means.

(this is in particular for heroin, other drugs are different animals)&gt; I just said that hard drug users are a legitimate concern for public safety.

I think this is wrong for opiates - the use of opiates - as long as the users don't drive - doesn't pose any risk to the public safety - only the - in particular psychological - effects of the withdrawal do. The morphine addicts of the wars didn't get criminal or dangerous as long as they got their morphine. That's very different for other drugs like e.g. alcohol, crack or crystal. Correct - with a real market price for heroin (which is as such a very cheap drug) or prescribed opiates this won't happen. This is as much a social problem as a problem of the drug use.&gt;Most of the illegal drugs market is made up of cocaine, heroin and meth, all of them very addictive drugs.

First this is for the US, which is very different from Europe, then the market for Cannabis is according to that bigger, that for any of those drugs. Also for cocaine more than half of the money is spent by users which are not typical addicts (use less than "near daily/daily"). Also this study only looked at those 4 drugs - that's far from being the complete market. Of those 4 drugs, 3 added up make the biggest share - while one alone is more than any single of them.

&gt;And in fact both pharmaceuticals with an addictive potential and alcohol are regulated. Caffeine, as far as I can find, is not addictive and coffee 'addiction' is certainly not an issue of comparable gravity to cocaine, heroin or meth addiction.

Sure they are partially regulated. But e.g. nasal sprays and laxatives are only very loosely - but they pose a particular high risk of physical addiction and of damages. Coffeine has an even physical addiction potential, but it doesn't cause any strong craving, because we don't directly relate the withdrawal symptoms with coffeine products and it starts long after the last intake (typical symptom is headache on the morning after a day without coffee). 

I didn't compare coffeine "addiction" with e.g. heroin or crack addiction, but with e.g. the typical recreational hallucinogenic drugs, like e.g. LSD - which is much more dangerous, but has an even lower addiction potential.&gt;&gt;First this is for the US, which is very different from Europe

&gt;Please show that's the case. I would have happily brought out numbers for the whole European drug market if I could find them.

I don't have such numbers for Europe, in the end they are also just guessed - but you can just look up any graphs for drug use waves in the US and Europe and see that we use different drugs in different amounts at different times. Even inside the US or Europe there are very different trends.

&gt;&gt;Then the market for Cannabis is according to that bigger, that for any of those drugs

&gt;Cannabis has a plurality, not majority market share. Other drugs still out-trade it.

All others added up do, yes. As such cannabis has the biggest market share - with prices not disturbed by the illegality it would probably be clearly the majority of the market - cocaine, heroine, meth, amphetamines, ... are very cheap drugs if they are produced on an industrial scale, their "real value" is somewhere in the region of aspirin.

&gt;Who says that addicts are only people who use daily? do you seriously consider people in the "use more than weekly" category not addicts?

Yes, I consider them mostly just as regular users, not as addicts. That's not the same. Even of the daily users not all have to be addicts. We can debate what addiction is - but the typical crack or cocaine addict, isn't making regular day long breaks in his consumption scheme and e.g. the weekend or work user is typically not an addict.

The addictive potential of illegal drugs is often highly overestimated - e.g. this study found: http://stopthedrugwar.org/chronicle/2008/apr/18/addiction_small_percentage_drug :

_The research report from the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA) found that only 1% of first-time users of inhalants and tranquilizers were dependent a year later. For hallucinogens and sedatives, the figure was 2%; for pain relievers and alcohol, 3%. The drug with the highest number of dependent users a year after first use was heroin (13%), followed by crack cocaine (9%), marijuana (6%), stimulants (5%), and powder cocaine (4%)._

_When it came to any use of the drug within a year after first use, only alcohol and marijuana broke the 50% barrier, with 71% and 52%, respectively. Less than 20% of first-time heroin or crack users were still using after a year without being considered dependent, while slightly more than one-third of stimulant and powder cocaine users were._

So more than 30% still use powder-cocaine after one year, without being addicted.

The UN and other numbers for the problematic drug use fits with that, they also find typically ~10% of the illicit drug users having a problematic usage scheme.

&gt;Which other illegal drug beside cannabis, cocaine, heroin and 
methamphetamines represents such a large trade that only considering those four is "far" from being the complete market?

I don't know, what they count as meth - if they take it as a chemical or a scene term. The UN e.g. differentiated Meth (Pervitin, Crystal), Ecstasy / MDMA and ATS - Amphetamine Type Stimulants, a few years ago they changed it to Cannabis, Opioids, 
Opiates, Cocaine, Amphetamines, \u201cEcstasy\u201d so I don't know at all what is missing there. For cocaine, I just guess that they include derivates. Hallucinogenics/Psychoactive are missing nearly completely, illegal research drugs also. Then the big group of illegal doping drugs and enhancers  is missing. Without them showing the complete market and explaining how they got to their numbers, in particular the prices, it's pretty useless stats.Did you misunderstand my sentence? I meant to compare LSD with coffeine. I think you we can agree that LSD is a much more dangerous drug than e.g. coffee.Apple is addressing a global market. If apple does this in Britain, what will they do in China, Russia, Saudi Arabia, ... ? Will they give everybody backdoors? Will the products have different backdoors on every single market? Will they restrict the access to foreign websites allowing strong encryption? And most important - how should any of this work inside the EU?

This legislation is either useless (because you could still buy at least everything licensed anywhere in the EU and any foreign service) or extremely damaging to the British economy and in violation of EU law.Probably we have this already - and I think restricting the market for products using strong encryption is a violation of the European market rules. It would restrict licensed products from other EU countries to be sold to Britain. I think the only thing Britain could really do, is demand this for data stored inside the UK - but then - what's the use of that...It's pretty blunt to tell only the leading country is to blame. You could've stayed out of this awful war like many other European countries did. Bush's position would've been much weaker without this opportunist "coalition of the willing".It's in the human rights declarations that humans have the right to leave any country, including their own. Entering a country is what can be prohibited.Erstmal: Die Bundesregierung hat bis jetzt weder Schengen noch Dublin ausgesetzt oder gebrochen - Schengen erlaubt vor\u00fcbergehende Grenzkontrollen und Dublin erlaubt schon immer aufzunehmen, wen und wieviele man will, es stellt nur die Anforderung an die Eintrittsl\u00e4nder, auf Anfrage Fl\u00fcchtlinge zur\u00fcckzunehmen.

Und Platz haben wir genug, damit niemand draussen frieren muss - das ist eine Frage des Wollens - nicht des K\u00f6nnens. Wir haben weit mehr leerstehenden Raum, als Bedarf - mit entsprechenden Anreizen und mehr Flexibilit\u00e4t k\u00f6nnte der Bruchteil der ben\u00f6tigt wird sicherlich auch kurzfristig aktiviert werden. Aber 6000 Leute k\u00f6nnte man in Berlin auch problemlos in \u00f6ffentlichen Geb\u00e4uden unterbringen._Grundgesetz:_

_Artikel 14_

_(1) Das Eigentum und das Erbrecht werden gew\u00e4hrleistet. Inhalt und_ __Schranken__ _werden durch die Gesetze bestimmt._

_(2)_ __Eigentum verpflichtet. Sein Gebrauch soll zugleich dem Wohle der Allgemeinheit dienen.__

_(3)_ __Eine Enteignung ist nur zum Wohle der Allgemeinheit zul\u00e4ssig.__ _Sie darf nur durch Gesetz oder auf Grund eines Gesetzes erfolgen, das Art und Ausma\u00df der Entsch\u00e4digung regelt. Die Entsch\u00e4digung ist unter gerechter Abw\u00e4gung der Interessen der Allgemeinheit und der Beteiligten zu bestimmen. Wegen der H\u00f6he der Entsch\u00e4digung steht im Streitfalle der Rechtsweg vor den ordentlichen Gerichten offen._

---

_Artikel 20_

_(1) Die Bundesrepublik Deutschland ist ein demokratischer und_ __sozialer__ _Bundesstaat._

---

_Lisbon Treaty:_

_Article 3_

_3. The Union shall establish an internal market. It shall work for the sustainable development of Europe based on balanced economic growth and price stability,_ __a highly competitive social market economy, aiming at full employment and social progress__ _, and a high level of protection and improvement of the quality of the environment. It shall promote scientific and technological advance._

_It shall_ __combat social exclusion and discrimination, and shall promote social justice and protection__ _, equality between women and men, solidarity between generations and protection of the rights of the child._

_It shall promote economic, social and territorial cohesion, and solidarity among Member States._

_It shall respect its rich cultural and linguistic diversity, and shall ensure that Europe's cultural heritage is safeguarded and enhanced._

---

Eingriffe in das Eigentum und Regulierungen betreffend des Eigentums sind sehr weitreichend m\u00f6glich.

&gt;Ja, darum ist Deutschland ein Sozialstaat. Daraus l\u00e4sst sich aber keine weitreichende Pflicht des Einzelnen ableiten immer zuerst sozial zu handeln.

Das ist richtig. Aber der Staat kann durchaus Einzelene - grunds\u00e4tzlich in allgemeiner Form - dazu verpflichten sozial zu handeln. 

&gt;Was du scheinbar m\u00f6chtest w\u00e4re ein vom Staat diktierte, Soziale Planwirtschaft. Eine Gesellschaft, in der es erst erlaubt ist Luxusg\u00fcter zu produzieren wenn die gesamte Bev\u00f6lkerung mit Basisg\u00fctern versorgt ist. Das hat nichts mehr mit Freiheit (der Wirtschaft) zu tun sondern ist einfach nur Zwang und von daher strikt abzulehnen.

Es gibt durchaus auch einiges zwischendrin. Man k\u00f6nnte z.B. durchaus Einkommen aus Vermietungen f\u00fcr Wohnungen anhand des Quadratmeterpreises und anhand der Position im Mietspiegel unterschiedlich besteuern, oder auch die Grundsteuer auf die Art der Wohnung beziehen. All das ist weder Planwirtschaft noch Enteignung. Positive Anreize halte ich aber auch f\u00fcr besser als negative.

&gt;\u00a7 1601 ff BGB[1] schreiben vor wem wir zu helfen verpflichtet sind.

Das betrifft direkte Hilfsverpflichtungen - nicht solche, die indirekt \u00fcber den Staat geleistet werden. Was Wikipedia da schreibt ist mir relativ wurst (die Quellen sind \u00fcbrigens nicht die Bundesregierung, sondern FAZ, Spiegel online und Zeit online) - beides ist Teil der jeweiligen Abkommen und die wurden selbstverst\u00e4ndlich nicht gebrochen und darauf wurde auch sehr genau geachtet. Vermutlich sind die Justiziare da etwas genauer, als die Pressesprecher und viel genauer als die Presse die es dann noch mal wiederholt... Schau doch einfach in die Texte rein, die stehen alle online bei der EU, auch auf deutsch.

&gt;Gut f\u00fcr diese 6.000.
&gt;Allerdings stehen die n\u00e4chsten schon vor der T\u00fcr:

Insgesamt haben wir momentan ca. 1,7 Millionen leerstehende Wohnungen in einigerma\u00dfen akzeptablem Zustand. Bei der \u00fcblichen Unterbringungspolitik w\u00e4re das genug f\u00fcr zumindest 6-10 Millionen Personen. Dazu kommen renovierungsbed\u00fcrftiger Leerstand, und Leerstand in nicht-Wohngeb\u00e4uden. Und dazu kommen dann noch mal oft nur zeitweise und/oder teilweise genutzte Geb\u00e4ude in staatlichem Eigentum.Erst mal grunds\u00e4tzlich - alles was ich zitiert habe, ist an den Staat gerichtet - nicht an den B\u00fcrger. Sie beschreiben wie der Staat handeln muss. Wenn da steht "Eigentum verpflichtet" - dann hei\u00dft dies, dass der Staat dieses "Motto" bei seiner Gesetzgebung und anderem staatlichen Agieren zu ber\u00fccksichtigen hat.

ad Art 14:

(2) das ist kein Vorschlag, sondern eine recht strikte Richtlinie wie der Staat zu agieren hat. 

(3) richtig, hier wird geregelt/beschr\u00e4nkt, wann Enteignungen m\u00f6glich gemacht werden k\u00f6nnen. F\u00fcr Grund/Boden geht das sogar noch etwas weiter, als f\u00fcr anderes Eigentum.


ad. Artikel 20:

&gt;Sozial bedeutet nicht, dass Personen zu Handlungen die ihnen Sch\u00e4den (k\u00f6rperlich, geistig, finanzielle, ...) zuf\u00fcgen gezwungen werden k\u00f6nnen. Daf\u00fcr braucht es, wie der Rest unserer Gesetze klar definiert, einen erheblichen Grund.

Nun ja, es definiert unseren Staat als demokratisch und sozial. Der Staat hat damit durchaus die Verpflichtung sozial zu agieren, und kann und muss daf\u00fcr nat\u00fcrlich auch Einkommen/Eigentum der B\u00fcrger heranziehen. Nat\u00fcrlich braucht es daf\u00fcr jeweils Grund und Gesetz. Aber f\u00fcr finanzielle "Sch\u00e4den" ist dies sehr einfach - der Staat erlaubt sich bereits jetzt, finanzielle "Sch\u00e4den" von 44% des BIP zu verursachen, um dies nach seinen Interessen umzuverteilen.

&gt;Ja, sie stellen aber immer die letzte und nicht die erste, m\u00f6gliche Ma\u00dfnahme dar. Und, gerade in der aktuellen Situation, gibt es andere Optionen als Enteignung oder Zwang.

Richtig - ich bef\u00fcrworte auch keinesfalls Enteignungen. 

&gt;Der einfachste, wenn vielleicht auch nicht sozialste, Weg w\u00e4re es zun\u00e4chst einmal auf die Einhaltung Europ\u00e4ischer Vertr\u00e4ge zu pochen und keine Fl\u00fcchtlinge mehr nach Deutschland zu lassen.

Das ist alles andere als einfach - momentan ist es vermutlich sogar ziemlich unm\u00f6glich, da Gerichte entschieden haben, dass in Ungarn und Griechenland sowohl systemische M\u00e4ngel im Asylsystem aufgrund von Gesetzen (vor allen Dingen f\u00fcr Ungarn), aber vor allen Dingen momentan einfach aufgrund der \u00dcberlastung vorliegen. Jeder der momentan gegen eine Abschiebung nach Ungarn oder Griechenland klagen w\u00fcrde, w\u00fcrde Recht bekommen und der Staat darf nicht mehr abschieben, da Dublin nur legal ist, weil wir aufgrund von Vertr\u00e4gen __widerlegbar__ glauben d\u00fcrften, dass in den Empf\u00e4ngerl\u00e4ndern die Asylsysteme europ\u00e4ischen und internationalen Standards gen\u00fcgen - im Moment ist dies aber offensichlich - widerlegt. Sonst greift das non-refoulement Verbot und mit einer Abschiebung w\u00fcrde sich der Staat wissentlich ins Unrecht setzen.

&gt;Ja, aber nur im beschr\u00e4nkten Ma\u00dfe und mit entsprechender Kompensation. Will der Staat z.B. dass eine Baufirma Sozial- statt Luxuswohnungen baut muss er diese f\u00fcr den relativen Verlust entsch\u00e4digen.

Das ist richtig. Wenn der Staat aber sagt, wir besteuern Luxuswohnungen oder den Bau von Luxuswohnungen sehr hoch, und lassen die Besteuerung f\u00fcr Sozialwohnungen sein, ist das vermutlich noch v\u00f6llig legal ohne jegliche Kompensation m\u00f6glich. Genauso angepasste Bebauungspl\u00e4ne und F\u00f6rderprogramme.

&gt;Das magische Wort hier ist shall. Es wird in internationalen Vertr\u00e4gen im Sinne von "beabsichtig" oder "sollten" nicht aber im verbindlichen Sinne von "werden" oder "m\u00fcssen" verwendet. Der Vertag legt also all die aufgelisteten Punkte nahe, setzt sie als erstrebenswerte Ziele und definiert damit eine grobe, gemeinsame Richtung der Vertragspartern. Niemand ist aber zu einer konkreten Umsetzung gezwungen.

Da liegst Du (wie viele andere) v\u00f6llig falsch. "Shall" im englischen Rechtsprech ist grunds\u00e4tzlich "mandatory", "defining". In diesem Fall das zweitere... Ich h\u00e4tte es gleich auf deutsch zitieren sollen ;) Hier die deutsche Version:

_(3) Die Union errichtet einen Binnenmarkt. Sie wirkt auf die nachhaltige Entwicklung Europas auf der Grundlage eines ausgewogenen Wirtschaftswachstums und von Preisstabilit\u00e4t, eine in hohem Ma\u00dfe wettbewerbsf\u00e4hige soziale Marktwirtschaft, die auf Vollbesch\u00e4ftigung und sozialen Fortschritt abzielt, sowie ein hohes Ma\u00df an Umweltschutz und Verbesserung der Umweltqualit\u00e4t hin. Sie f\u00f6rdert den wissenschaftlichen und technischen Fortschritt._

_Sie bek\u00e4mpft soziale Ausgrenzung und Diskriminierungen und f\u00f6rdert soziale Gerechtigkeit und sozialen Schutz, die Gleichstellung von Frauen und M\u00e4nnern, die Solidarit\u00e4t zwischen den Generationen und den Schutz der Rechte des Kindes._

_Sie f\u00f6rdert den wirtschaftlichen, sozialen und territorialen Zusammenhalt und die Solidarit\u00e4t zwischen den Mitgliedstaaten._

_Sie wahrt den Reichtum ihrer kulturellen und sprachlichen Vielfalt und sorgt f\u00fcr den Schutz und die Entwicklung des kulturellen Erbes Europas._&gt;Allerdings haben andere Mitgliedsstaaten der EU eine weitaus weniger sonnige Meinung zum Verhalten der Bundesregierung, egal ob man es als Auslegung oder Bruch der EU-Rechtspraxis darstellen will.

&gt;Und dort, wo die Menschen jetzt ankommen, bei den St\u00e4dten und Gemeinden, scheint die Begeisterung ebenfalls enge Grenzen zu kennen.

Was hat diese Begeisterung oder Nicht-Begeisterung damit zu tun, ob nun ein Vertragsbruch vorliegt oder nicht? Schengen und Dublin sehen das vor, und wir haben es genutzt. Wer klar Dublin und auch Schengen gebrochen hat, ist Ungarn. 

&gt;Erinnerst du dich noch an die Diskussion hier \u00fcber die kleine nieders\u00e4chsische Gemeinde Sumte? "1.000 Menschen bei 100 Einwohnern, wie soll das gehen?"

Ja, das ist eine BEA und ein Extremfall (und nat\u00fcrlich ist Sumte auch nur ein Ortsteil - ansonsten w\u00e4re die Verf\u00fcgbarkeit von so viel Raum auch sehr \u00fcberraschend...). Die Leute sollen dort auch nicht dauerhaft Wohnen - sie werden so schnell wie m\u00f6glich zur LEA weitergeleitet und dort registiert und k\u00f6nnen dann dort, oder nach Umverteilung auf andere Landes EAs ihre Antr\u00e4ge stellen. Wir haben hier auch so eine BEA mit 600-850 Fl\u00fcchtlingen (in einer 2500 Seelen Gemeinde) - das klappt bis jetzt recht gut, momentan ist die Belegung schon einmal komplett ausgetauscht worden, und die Erstbelegung von September ist in die LEA umgezogen. Auch der R\u00fcckbau soll baldm\u00f6glichst erfolgen.

&gt;Deine 1,7 Millionen leerstehenden Wohnungen stehen oft nicht ohne Grund leer - sie wurden dort gebaut, wo kaum einer leben kann bzw. will:

Nun, ich kenne jemanden sehr gut, der zwei davon in einer Gro\u00dfstadt besitzt ;) Und ich kenne viele, viele weitere. Aber es muss/will ja auch nicht jeder in einer Gro\u00dfstadt leben - ich tue das ja schlie\u00dflich auch nicht, und will es auch nicht.

Abgesehen davon, halte ich eine Ansiedlung im "Schrumpfraum" oder l\u00e4ndlicherem Raum nicht f\u00fcr nachteilig, sondern f\u00fcr einen gro\u00dfen Vorteil. Dort ist eine Integration f\u00fcr viele leichter m\u00f6glich als in einer Gro\u00dfstadt und dort gibt es nat\u00fcrlich bereits auch Bedarf an Arbeitskr\u00e4ften und der wird mit Neuansiedlungen weiter steigen.

&gt;Und wo Siedlungen aussterben, gibt es wom\u00f6glich weniger Anreiz f\u00fcr Alteingesessene wie Migranten, Kontakt zueinander zu kn\u00fcpfen: keine guten Voraussetzungen f\u00fcr eine gelungene Integration.

Ich denke das Gegenteil ist der Fall. Die "Zur\u00fcckgebliebenen" werden wenige Neuank\u00f6mmlinge viel eher integrieren, und auf dem Dorf herrscht viel mehr Kontakt zu Mitbewohnern als in der Stadt; die M\u00f6glichkeit in der eigenen Parallelkultur unterzutauchen ist auch kaum vorhanden. Dass es dort besser klappt, hat auch die Vergangenheit bisher immer bewiesen - Integrationsprobleme gibt es in Ghettos und in gro\u00dfen St\u00e4dten, auf dem Land ist das ziemlich unbekannt, und auch in den Kleinst\u00e4dten klappt es recht gut.&gt;&gt;Da liegst Du (wie viele andere) v\u00f6llig falsch. "Shall" im englischen Rechtsprech ist grunds\u00e4tzlich "mandatory", "defining". In diesem Fall das zweitere... Ich h\u00e4tte es gleich auf deutsch zitieren sollen ;) Hier die deutsche Version:

&gt;\u00c4hm ... wieder nein. Das wird auch vor allem in der von dir geposteten, deutschen \u00dcbersetzung deutlich:

N\u00f6, da liegst Du ganz klar falsch. Vergleiche mal die beiden Versionen - in der deutschen ist das "shall" einfach weggefallen - es hat n\u00e4mlich nur eine definierende Bedeutung - im Englischen k\u00f6nnte man es auch weglassen, aber dann w\u00e4r's ja kein sch\u00f6nes Rechtssprech mehr :D Shall in Vertr\u00e4gen und Gesetzen verwirrt die meisten nicht-Muttersprachler und viele Muttersprachler...

Beispiel:

Englisch mit "shall":

_It shall combat social exclusion and discrimination, and shall promote social justice and protection , equality between women and men, solidarity between generations and protection of the rights of the child._

Englisch ohne "shall":

It ~~shall~~ combats social exclusion and discrimination, and ~~shall~~ promotes social justice and protection, equality between women and men, solidarity between generations and protection of the rights of the child.

Deutsch:

_Sie bek\u00e4mpft soziale Ausgrenzung und Diskriminierungen und f\u00f6rdert soziale Gerechtigkeit und sozialen Schutz, die Gleichstellung von Frauen und M\u00e4nnern, die Solidarit\u00e4t zwischen den Generationen und den Schutz der Rechte des Kindes._

Das ist einfach englisches Rechtssprech. Und die Bedeutung von "shall" ist da (leider auch nur meistens) klar.

&gt;Hier werden grobe Ziele gesetzt und keine festen Richtlinen verankert. Um beim Deutschen zu bleiben, man "wirkt hin", "f\u00f6rdert" und "bek\u00e4mpft".

Klar, das ist ja auch Artikel 3, da folgt noch der ganze restliche Vertrag und auch der Vetrag \u00fcber das Funktionieren der EU. 

&gt;Der Vertag l\u00e4sst den Unterzeichnern n\u00e4mlich extrem gro\u00dfen Spielraum wie "gef\u00f6rdert" und "bek\u00e4mpft" wird oder wann die nur sehr grob gesteckten Ziele erreicht sind.

Richtig, kl\u00e4re Verst\u00f6\u00dfe sind aber durchaus durchsetzbar, und weiter unten in Artikel 3 werden ja auch andere Grundrechte direkt einbezogen. Artikel 2 ist aber sogar direkt durch die EU sanktionierbar.

Wir hatten durchaus schon einige (erfolgreiche) Klagen in Deutschland aufgrund der ersten 20 Artikel des Grundgesetzes, die entsprechend auch nur "Richtlinien" f\u00fcr den Staat sind.Ja, das ist fast so schlimm und so geladen wie die Umfrage von Orban:

_Die zw\u00f6lf Fragen:_

_1. Wie bedeutsam ist die Thematik des anwachsenden Terrorisums` f\u00fcr Ihr eigenes Leben?_

_2. K\u00f6nnte Ihrer Meinung nach Ungarn in den kommenden Jahren Ziel des Terrorismus werden?_

_3. Manche sagen, dass die fehlgeleitete Einwanderungspolitik Br\u00fcssels zum Anwachsen des Terrorismus f\u00fchrt. Stimmen Sie damit \u00fcberein?_

_4. Wu\u00dften Sie, dass Wirtschaftsfl\u00fcchtlinge die Grenze illegal \u00fcberqueren und das deren Zahl zuletzt um das 20fache gestiegen ist?_

_5. Stimmen Sie der Meinung zu, dass Wirtschaftsfl\u00fcchtlinge die Jobs und Existenzen der ungarischen Menschen gef\u00e4hrden?_

_6. Manche sagen, dass Br\u00fcssels Politik zu Einwanderung und Terrorismus gescheitert ist. Stimmen Sie dem zu?_

_7. W\u00fcrden Sie die ungarische Regierung bei ihren Bem\u00fchungen zur Einf\u00fchrung strengerer Einwanderungsregeln als sie Br\u00fcssel vor hat, unterst\u00fctzen?_

_8. W\u00fcrden Sie eine neue Gesetzgebung bef\u00fcrworten, die es der ungarischen Regierung erlaubt, Einwanderer, die illegal ins Land eingereist sind, in Haft zu nehmen?_

_9. Sollten Ihrer Meinung nach illegal nach Ungarn Eingewanderte so schnell wie m\u00f6glich in ihre L\u00e4nder zur\u00fcckgeschickt werden?_

_10. Sind Sie einverstanden, dass die Wirtschaftsfl\u00fcchtlinge, die in Ungarn bleiben, die Kosten ihres Aufenthalts decken m\u00fcssen?_

_11. Stimmen Sie damit \u00fcberein, dass die beste Abwehr von Einwanderung in der Wirtschaftshilfe f\u00fcr die Herkunftsl\u00e4nder besteht?_

_12. Stimmen Sie mit der ungarischen Regierung \u00fcberein, anstelle von Mitteln f\u00fcr die Einwanderung bereit zu stellen, wir ungarischen Familien und die Kinder, die noch geboren werden, unterst\u00fctzen sollen?_&gt;Er scheint auch gar nicht zu verstehen was er sagt, einerseits streitet er Verantwortungen f\u00fcr rechte Gewalttaten ab, aber andererseits gibt er Maas die Verantwortung f\u00fcr die anscheinend in seiner Wahrnehmung ebenso zahlreichen Linken Straftaten in letzter Zeit.

Das _scheint_ muss man hier hervorheben - was er macht ist typisch f\u00fcr aufhetzende Propaganda, und entweder er hat schon soviel konsumiert, dass er dies verinnerlicht hat, oder er weiss ganz genau, was er da sagt. Es geht ja um die Wirkung - nicht darum, ob das auch irgendwie koh\u00e4rent oder logisch ist...&gt;Das hei\u00dft, deine Meinung \u00fcber die angebliche Interpretierbarkeit von EU-Bestimmungen wie Dublin wird nicht von anderen EU-L\u00e4ndern geteilt:

Angebliche Interpretierbarkeit? Die ist nicht gegeben. Das ist ganz eindeutig.

EU 604/2013 (http://eur-lex.europa.eu/legal-content/DE/TXT/HTML/?uri=CELEX:32013R0604&amp;from=DE)

_Artikel 17_

__Ermessensklauseln__

_(1)   Abweichend von Artikel 3 Absatz 1_ __kann jeder Mitgliedstaat beschlie\u00dfen, einen bei ihm von einem Drittstaatsangeh\u00f6rigen oder Staatenlosen gestellten Antrag auf internationalen Schutz zu pr\u00fcfen, auch wenn er nach den in dieser Verordnung festgelegten Kriterien nicht f\u00fcr die Pr\u00fcfung zust\u00e4ndig ist.__

__Der Mitgliedstaat, der gem\u00e4\u00df diesem Absatz beschlie\u00dft, einen Antrag auf internationalen Schutz zu pr\u00fcfen, wird dadurch zum zust\u00e4ndigen Mitgliedstaat und \u00fcbernimmt die mit dieser Zust\u00e4ndigkeit einhergehenden Verpflichtungen.__ _[...]_

_[...]_

&gt;Die erste Nation, die damit aufh\u00f6rte, EU-Recht wie vorhergesehen bei Fl\u00fcchtlingen anzuwenden, war Griechenland.

Nun, dass ist schwierig - ich vermute Dublin hat hier eine L\u00fccke. 

Aber ganz abgesehen davon, ging es mir nicht um die Bestimmung der Zust\u00e4ndigkeit, sondern um die Bedingungen in Ungarn (und Griechenland), die eine Abschiebung dort hin unm\u00f6glich machen, f\u00fcr Ungarn sind diese vors\u00e4tzlich und klar rechtswidrig, so z.B. die Inhaftierung (mit weder ausreichend rechtlichen Rat und Geh\u00f6r (incl. Gruppenvorf\u00fchrungen zur Haftpr\u00fcfung etc.), medizinischer und psychologischer Unterst\u00fctzung und z.B. Vorf\u00fchrung zu Arztbesuchen _angeleint_ und in Handschellen) von Dublin-III R\u00fcckgef\u00fchrten unter Bedingungen die weder Dublin, noch der Genfer Fl\u00fcchtlingsconvention, noch den Menschenrechtskonventionen entsprechen. Und das ist seit einiger Zeit so.

Gegen diesen Artikel aus dem TFEU haben fast alle versto\u00dfen - deshalb ist es m\u00fc\u00dfig, solange es nicht um klare Menschenrechtsverletzungen wie in Ungarn geht, zu diskutieren, wer nun der b\u00f6se Bube ist:

_Article 80_

_The policies of the Union set out in this Chapter and their implementation shall be governed by the principle of solidarity and fair sharing of responsibility, including its financial implications, between the Member States. Whenever necessary, the acts of the Union adopted pursuant to this Chapter shall contain appropriate measures to give effect to this principle._

Bez\u00fcglich der Umsetzung von Artikel 78 und 79 sieht es nicht viel besser aus.

(http://www.lisbon-treaty.org/wcm/the-lisbon-treaty/treaty-on-the-functioning-of-the-european-union-and-comments/part-3-union-policies-and-internal-actions/title-v-area-of-freedom-security-and-justice/chapter-2-policies-on-border-checks-asylum-and-immigration/346-article-78.html)This was in particular about Iraq. And there Poland wasn't just one of many countries - but one of the four countries which participated in the invasion (together with the US, Australia and the UK), and it was later a part of the 37 Coalition of the Willing countries which contributed troops after the invasion. 

&gt;Well I think my country should pay for the countries that it invaded on orders of USA, and I can only hope in future shitty democracy process will not lead us to again be mercenaries for USA.

The US can't give Poland orders - and well, you might call the Polish and eastern European opportunism back then mercenarism. But in the end it was a sovereign decision, as it was a sovereign decision of most of the European countries to not participate. This is a map of the early Coalition of the Willing: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Coalition_of_the_willing#/media/File:Coalition_of_the_willing.svg 

If you have to take immigrants, or whatever, are completely different questions - I don't want to connect that - I just get a bit angry if you talk about orders or being a dog on a leash. Even if Poland behaved a bit like that - it was still a completely sovereign decision - and Poland has the full responsibility for this decision.You should add, that driving in groups is absolutely legal in Austria and Germany - above 14 people you can drive aside with two bikes and the whole group is to be treated as one vehicle (e.g. if the start of the group passes a traffic light, they can completely pass, no matter how long they are). Other drivers also must treat them as one vehicle - e.g. by only passing the whole group - for a longer group this means, they have to stay behind. If the group is very long, it has to establish gaps to let other traffic cross.&gt;Die Anzahl der aktuell verf\u00fcgbaren, unqualifizierten Stellen in Relation zu den Arbeitslosenzahlen widerspricht deiner Theorie aber.

Vielleicht sind diese Jobs auch einfach nicht angemessen bezahlt, insbesondere wenn das Einkommen auch noch auf Hartz 4 etc. angerechnet wird?

&gt;Menschen sind produktiv wenn sie produktiv sein wollen (weil ihnen das T\u00e4tigkeitsfeld gef\u00e4llt) oder m\u00fcssen (weil sie ihren Lebensunterhalt verdienen m\u00fcssen).

Das zweite ist meistens nicht nur "m\u00fcssen" - die allermeisten Leute arbeiten wesentlich mehr als sie "m\u00fcssen", da sie einen h\u00f6heren Lebensstandard wollen.&gt;H\u00e4tten wir ein BGE w\u00fcrden wir die Grenze zur Massensklaverei in dem Moment \u00fcberschreiten indem wir von einer Minderheit erwarten das n\u00f6tige Einkommen f\u00fcr eine Mehrheit zu generieren.

Nun, dass w\u00e4re der Fall, wenn Du erwartest, dass nur eine Minderheit arbeitet. 

&gt;Wir sind aber nicht daf\u00fcr verantwortlich jedem den Lebensstandard zu erm\u00f6glichen, den er gerne h\u00e4tte, selbst wenn dieser seine M\u00f6glichkeiten \u00fcbersteigt.

Das ist auch nicht die Idee des Grundeinkommens - es soll ja nur ein Grundeinkommen sein - nicht mehr. Wenn jemand einen erh\u00f6hten Lebensstandard will, muss er immer noch arbeiten.Richtig - aber die ist grade mal genug dass Du "Fressen und Schei\u00dfen" kannst (zumindest wenn Du wirklich die Grundsicherung meinst, die z.B. ein geduldeter Ausl\u00e4nder bekommt). Ein BGE w\u00fcrde ein w\u00fcrdiges Leben erm\u00f6glichen - aber eben keinen Luxus.Wenn Du vielleicht 500 bis maximal 1000 Euro im Monat zum Leben h\u00e4ttest (nach Grundausgaben - ein h\u00f6heres BGE wollen ja die meisten nicht) - w\u00e4rst Du dann z.B. nicht bereit, einen Tag in der Woche einige Stunden M\u00fcll zu sortieren (wobei man das automatisieren kann), um Dein verf\u00fcgbares Geld zu verdoppeln? Wenn niemand mehr solche Jobs machen _muss_, w\u00fcrde der Preis/Lohn ja auch wirklich wieder von Angebot und Nachfrage bestimmt und die Entlohnung (und der Anreiz zur Automatisierung) w\u00e4re entsprechend.Ich hatte die Gelegenheit "white collar jobs" und "Werkstattarbeit" zu machen. Ich ziehe eine Kombination von beidem vor - zumindest wenn die Arbeitsbedingungen (und evtl. auch die Entlohnung) in dem "Drecksjob" stimmen.
Ich w\u00fcrde die viele dieser miesen Jobs f\u00fcr eine angemessene Bezahlung und bei guten Arbeitsbedingungen (das w\u00e4re bei einem Grundeinkommen m\u00f6glich, da dann wieder Angebot und Nachfrage den Preis/Lohn bestimmt) f\u00fcr einige Stunden die Woche zu machen - bei den meisten davon, w\u00fcrde es mir vermutlich sogar Spa\u00df machen.&gt;Aber das bedeutet nicht, dass wir den Drang nach h\u00f6herer Bildung durch ein Grundeinkommen abschw\u00e4chen sollten, ganz im Gegenteil.

Bei vielen bremst nicht ein Grundeinkommen den Drang nach h\u00f6herer Bildung - sondern das Gegenteil - dass sie w\u00e4hrend sie sich Bilden, momentan grunds\u00e4tzlich gar kein Einkommen haben.&gt;Es gibt Unmengen von Aufgaben, die theoretisch automatisiert werden k\u00f6nnen, aber aus verschiedensten Gr\u00fcnden nicht automatisiert werden. Der Kapitalismus ist ziemlich gut darin, Dinge umzusetzen, wenn sie tats\u00e4chlich f\u00fcr die Firma Geld sparen - deswegen w\u00fcrde ich davon ausgehen, dass das bei aktuellem Stand wesentlich teurer wird, es zu automatisieren.

Nun, mit einem BGE w\u00e4re man dann eben wieder bei echtem Angebot und Nachfrage - es w\u00e4re niemand mehr gezwungen diese Arbeit zu machen. Und dann gilt Dein Prinzip - man muss eben sehen, was billiger ist - jemand angemessen zu entlohnen und die Bedingungen schaffen, damit er den Job machen will oder Automatisieren.

edit (sorry, zu fr\u00fch gedr\u00fcckt):

&gt;Dazu vielleicht eine etwas realpolitischere (und latent menschenverachtende) Betrachtung: Wenn wir in Deutschland f\u00fcr den normalen Menschen paradiesische Zust\u00e4nde schaffen, wird es nicht bei 80 Millionen Deutschen bleiben. F\u00fcr 800 Millionen oder 8 Milliarden Menschen zweifele ich aber daran, dass wir das auf absehbare Zeit in Deutschland realisiert bekommen. Dementsprechend m\u00fcssen wir entweder die anderen Leute drau\u00dfen halten oder diese Weiterentwicklung als globale Aufgabe betrachten, die wir nicht isoliert in Deutschland abziehen k\u00f6nnen.

Da sehe auch ich das Hauptproblem mit dem Grundeinkommen. Die meisten anderen Gegenargumente halte ich f\u00fcr schwach.&gt; Ich wei\u00df ja nicht, wie die Umsetzung eines BGE in einer kapitalistischen Gesellschaft real funktionieren soll, finde als Kommunist den Grundgedanken aber nat\u00fcrlich ansprechend. Letztenendes ist eine Form bedingungsloser Lebenssicherung Teil meiner Vorstellung einer idealen Gesellschaft.

Nun, ich sehe mich weder als Kommunist - noch Kapitalist - sondern eher als ultra-liberal. Ich m\u00f6chte einen freien Markt - auch Arbeitsmarkt. Aber gerade um diesen Markt zu befreien, muss man auch die Machtstruktur entfernen, die bedingt, dass man Arbeiten muss, um zu leben. F\u00fcr mich ist, zumindest ein relativ hohes, Grundeinkommen auch immer damit verbunden, dass man gleichzeitig viele Arbeitsmarkrestriktionen entfernt oder reduziert, weil man sie nicht mehr ben\u00f6tigt, um diese Machtstruktur auszugleichen - vom Mindestlohn, bis hin zu einem gesetzlichen K\u00fcndigungsschutz. Danke.

1. Richtig - ich betrachte hier die Gesamtproduktivit\u00e4t einer Gesellschaft. Wie man das, was diese generiert aufteilt ist ziemlich willk\u00fcrlich - das ist auch jetzt schon so.

2. Jein - aber ich kann mir durchaus vorstellen, dass sowas Spa\u00df machen kann, wenn man es freiwillig mit entsprechenden Anreizen und nicht unter Zwang tut. Nat\u00fcrlich nicht 8 Stunden am Tag, 5 Tage die Woche und nur f\u00fcr einen angemessenen Lohn und guten Arbeitsbedingungen (und vielleicht auch mal Anerkennung, statt Stigma). Das w\u00fcrde sich dann eben wirklich aus Angebot und Nachfrage ergeben, und nicht mehr, weil jemand gezwungen ist, diesen Job zu machen (abgesehen davon, ist das ein voll oder semi-automatisierbarer Job - bis auf die Vorsortierung ist das heute auch durchaus schon \u00fcblich)

3. Ja, die Lohnstrukturen w\u00fcrden sich dadurch \u00e4ndern, dass man einen freien Markt h\u00e4tte. Und niemand erwartet, dass man nur aus Berufung arbeitet - aber wenn es nicht genug gibt, die eine Arbeit zu den jetzigen Bedingungen zu erledigen, dann muss man eben entsprechende Anreize schaffen - die k\u00f6nnen in Entlohnung, guten Arbeitsbedingungen oder auch ganz anderen Dingen stecken.

&gt;Und mir hat noch niemand erkl\u00e4ren k\u00f6nnen, wo pro Monat 61.500.000.000 (8,2*107 * 750\u20ac1 ) Euro herkommen sollen. Aufs Jahr gerechnet entspricht das, 738.000.000.000 \u20ac - den 2,45-fachen Einnahmen des Bundes.

Wir haben jetzt eine Staatsquote von knapp unter 50% des BSP - das ist die Zahl, die man sich eher ansehen m\u00fcsste - das ist der Anteil der jetzt schon vom Staat irgendwie (um)verteilt wird, wenn man staatliche Einfl\u00fcsse auf den Arbeitsmarkt einbezieht ist es sogar noch mehr. Und wie schon in Punkt (1) geschrieben - momentan haben wir eine willk\u00fcrliche Verteilung dessen, was wir alle zusammen generieren, und dann h\u00e4tten wir eben eine andere, meiner Ansicht bessere und produktivere, weil man auch den Wert der Arbeit wieder angemessen darstellen w\u00fcrde. Du musst einfach mal out-of-the-box denken und das System unvoreingenommen und auch von au\u00dfen betrachten. Ein Grundeinkommen w\u00e4re nicht einfach eine Erg\u00e4nzung f\u00fcr unser System, sondern w\u00fcrde es grundlegend umkrempeln.&gt;Wieso sollte ich als jemand, der f\u00fcr sein Geld hart arbeitet, und der offenbar keinen Vorteil durch das BGE erh\u00e4lt, eine solche Idee bef\u00fcrworten?

Schon alleine weil es mich ankotzt, dass andere in Armut leben m\u00fcssen oder f\u00fcr ein unangemessenes Gehalt gezwungen werden irgendwelche Schei\u00dfjobs zu machen, obwohl wir so reich sind, dass dies absolut nicht n\u00f6tig w\u00e4re. Das wirkt sich ganz deutlich auf meine Lebensqualit\u00e4t aus und macht mich unzufrieden.&gt;Und selbst f\u00fcr jene, die am Verlieren keine Spa\u00df haben, ist Spielen in keinster Weise mit Realit\u00e4tsflucht gleichzusetzen.

F\u00fcr viele - die, die man meiner Ansicht nach f\u00e4lschlicherweise als s\u00fcchtig bezeichnet - ist das durchaus oft Flucht vor irgendwas. Nat\u00fcrlich trifft das auf die meisten Spieler, auch die, die es weil es ihnen einfach Spa\u00df macht mal eine zeitlang \u00fcbertreiben, nicht zu. Und es ist auch nicht auf Spiele beschr\u00e4nkt. Und die, die es betrifft, wissen meistens ganz genau, dass sie ein Problem haben.&gt;Das Argument zieht vielleicht wenn es um ein Studium geht, es ist aber keineswegs anwendbar wenn jemand nur einen Hauptschulabschluss hat.

Ich sagte ja, viele - nicht alle. Viele Leute lernen gerne neue Dinge - sowohl theoretisch als auch praktisch - insbesondere, wenn es nicht unter Zwang geschieht. Oder sie wollen etwas anderes machen - dass jemand nichts machen will, sich selbst nicht ver\u00e4ndern will, nichts f\u00fcr andere tun will, ist die absolute Ausnahme.

&gt;Ich hab mich auch mit meiner eigenen H\u00e4nde Arbeit durchs Studium gebracht. War nicht lustig, keineswegs, aber machbar.

H\u00e4ttest Du nicht vielleicht was anderes oder l\u00e4nger studiert - wenn Dich die Kosten nicht abgehalten h\u00e4tten? Oder auch einfach mehr Zeit in Dein Studium investiert? Oder vielleicht mitten in Deinem Leben noch mal einen Break gemacht, was anderes, neues studiert?1. Nein - wir verteilen das Geld jetzt schon nicht an die, die den Wohlstand verursachen (ich w\u00fcsste noch nicht mal, wie man das bestimmen soll), sondern ziemlich willk\u00fcrlich auf einem hoch regulierten Markt. Meiner Ansicht nach w\u00fcrde ein Grundeinkommen hier sogar zur Deregulierung f\u00fchren.

2. Ganz einfach - weil er auf einem dann wirklich freien Markt Mitarbeiter zu den f\u00fcr ihn besten Konditionen finden will. Wenn niemand den Job Vollzeit machen will, oder nur f\u00fcr wesentlich mehr Entlohnung, dann wird er Teilzeit anbieten. Das wird einfach von Angebot und Nachfrage reguliert.

3. Wir haben alles andere als einen freien Arbeitsmarkt, sondern einen der ganz grunds\u00e4tzlich dadurch gepr\u00e4gt ist, dass man Arbeiten muss um in W\u00fcrde leben zu k\u00f6nnen und man deshalb manche Arbeit auch unangemessen niedrig entlohnen kann. Und mit Mindestlohn und vielen anderen Ma\u00dfnahmen bis hin zu gesetzlichem K\u00fcndigungsschutz regulieren wir dann wieder dagegen an.

&gt;(etwa, weil die Arbeitskraft nicht mehr Umsatz generiert -&gt; Altenpflege).

Wieviel "Umsatz" Altenpflege generiert ist eine vollkommen willk\u00fcrlich Annahme. Oder wie willst Du das bemessen? Ist bessere Pflege, die die Alten etwas gl\u00fccklicher macht oder ihr Leben etwas verl\u00e4ngert, ein h\u00f6herer Umsatz? Oder gar ein Schaden?

&gt;Die Arbeitgeber haben ein wundervolles Argument, wie sie L\u00f6hne dr\u00fccken k\u00f6nnen.

Erstmal - mit einem Mindesteinkommen und einem angemessenen Freibetrag halte ich das f\u00fcr keinerlei Problem - L\u00f6hne k\u00f6nnen dann frei nach Angebot und Nachfrage verhandelt werden - ein Lohn von 1 Euro die Stunde ist dann auch ok - nur wird der Arbeitgeber, je nach Arbeit - Probleme haben, jemanden zu finden, der daf\u00fcr die Arbeit erledigen will...

&gt;4. Staatsquote von knapp unter 50% hei\u00dft, da\u00df der durchschnittliche Deutsche die H\u00c4LFTE seines Einkommens an den Staat abdr\u00fccken muss.

Nein, dass hei\u00dft es nicht. Das hei\u00dft, dass ca. 50% von allem was erwirtschaftet wird, mindestens einmal durch Staats- oder staatsregulierte Haushalte flie\u00dft und der Staat \u00fcber dessen Verwendung entscheidet - es verteilt. Dieses Geld verschwindet nicht - irgendjemand bekommt es.

&gt;Mehr als 100% geht nicht (und dann h\u00e4tten wir das BGE immer noch nicht finanziert).

Irgendwie passt das nicht mit Deiner eignen Rechnung (die aber auch vieles ausl\u00e4sst...). Wir haben ein BIP von ca. 3000 Milliarden und eine inl\u00e4ndische Verwendung von ca. 2700 Milliarden Euro, damit eine Staatsquote von ca. 1300-1400 Milliarden Euro. Deine Kostenrechnung landet da weit drunter.

&gt;Wenn aber durch Arbeit meine Lebensqualit\u00e4t nicht mehr steigt (etwa: weil meine Steuerlast den Gro\u00dfteil meines Mehrverdienstes auffrisst), wieso arbeite ich dann \u00fcberhaupt?

Das fordert ja \u00fcberhaupt niemand - Du wirst die Arbeit nur machen, wenn Du sie f\u00fcr notwenig h\u00e4lst (z.B. Pflege von Angeh\u00f6rigen und Freunden, andere ehrenamtliche T\u00e4tigkeiten) oder weil Du daf\u00fcr etwas bekommst - Spa\u00df, Befriedigung, Anerkennung, Geld. Das wird sich mit dem BGE nicht \u00e4ndern - ich will ja keinen gleiches Einkommen f\u00fcr alle oder ein so hohes BGE, dass es jeden Luxus abdeckt.&gt;Ich habe mit dem viele ein Problem. Das klingt so, als w\u00e4re es auch nur ann\u00e4hernd Standard. In Wirklichkeit trifft das nur auf eine verschwindende Minderheit zu, der Rest ist einfach zu faul oder bequem.

Das halte ich f\u00fcr falsch - die allermeisten Leute sind nicht so faul, dass sie nichts machen wollen - das ist f\u00fcr die meisten h\u00f6chst unbefriedigend. Ich kenne recht viele Rentner und Pension\u00e4re, die durchaus eine gute Rente haben, und bei denen am Rest vom Monat einiges Geld auf dem Konto bleibt - aber von denen, die k\u00f6nnen, gehen dennoch die meisten in gewissem Umfang irgendeiner entgeltlichen oder unentgeltlichen T\u00e4tigkeit nach. Und wir haben auch jetzt schon sehr viele Menschen, die in ihrer Freizeit v\u00f6llig freiwillig einer T\u00e4tigkeit die produktiv ist, nachgehen - vom klassischen Ehrenamt, \u00fcber die politische Aktivit\u00e4t, \u00fcber die Pflege von Angeh\u00f6rigen und Kindererziehung, \u00fcber die Unterhaltung eines Gem\u00fcsegartens, bis hin zur Reparatur und Herstellung von eigenen und fremden Dingen. All das beinhaltet eine gesellschaftliche Wertsch\u00f6pfung und passiert sogar ganz ohne Entlohnung, einfach weil es Menschen tun wollen und weil sie unbefriedigt sind, wenn sie nicht produktiv sein k\u00f6nnen. Und nat\u00fcrlich gibt es da auch Ausnahmen - die halte ich bei entsprechenden Anreizen aber f\u00fcr vernachl\u00e4ssigbar.

&gt;Ja, aber, so d\u00e4mlich das auch klingt: Das Leben ist kein Ponnyhof. Wir haben nicht das Recht, uns von der Gesellschaft unsere W\u00fcnsche erf\u00fcllen zu lassen ohne selbst daf\u00fcr zu arbeiten.

Das sollte man erst gar nicht zu Ende denken. Zumindest wenn der Wunsch einfach nur in einem w\u00fcrdigen Leben und nicht z.B. in einer Luxusjacht, besteht.&gt;Du glaubst also, Flie\u00dfbandarbeiter Harald tr\u00e4gt mehr zum Wohlstand bei als Firmenlenker Karl oder Ingenieur Peter. Das gleitet jetzt in die Ideologie ab, \u00fcber die man sich trefflich streiten kann. Lassen wir diese Diskussion?

Ich wollte diese Diskussion auch nicht starten, weil ich eine solche Bemessung f\u00fcr nicht m\u00f6glich und auch nicht w\u00fcnschenswert halte.

&gt;Betonung auf "f\u00fcr ihn" im Sinne von Arbeitgeber. Deine Skizze ist ein Gefangenenszenario, das so lange funktioniert, bis der erste umf\u00e4llt. D.h. das Teilzeitdiktat funktioniert so lange, bis einer der potentiellen Arbeitnehmer ein teures Hobby hat und mehr Geld braucht, d.h. den Job braucht, und sich zur Vollzeit bereiterkl\u00e4rt.

Ja - dann hat der Markt auch funktioniert - ich sehe Dein Problem nicht? Wenn jemand z.B. Vollzeit M\u00fcll sortieren (weil dieses Beispiel hier so beliebt ist) will und das f\u00fcr ein niedriges Einkommen, um sich damit ein Luxushobby zu finanzieren, dann ist das doch ok und viel besser, als wenn er das tun muss, damit er seine Familie einigerma\u00dfen anst\u00e4ndig \u00fcber die Runden bringen kann? Auch wenn das viele wollen w\u00fcrden, und damit die Entlohnung sinkt, sehe ich das Problem nicht.

&gt;Du musst nicht (f\u00fcr andere) arbeiten, um in W\u00fcrde leben zu k\u00f6nnen. Du kannst dich selbstst\u00e4ndig machen, oder einen Garten bestellen. Du kannst Homesteaden. Du kannst dir Gedanken dar\u00fcber machen, ob Dinge wie "Urlaub auf Malle" oder "Smartphone" wirklich f\u00fcr deine Definition von "W\u00fcrde" n\u00f6tig sind.

Naja, man braucht auch eine Wohnung und etwas Geld um an der Gesellschaft partizipieren zu k\u00f6nnen. Das sehen selbst die Macher von Hartz 4 so. Und ja - Selbstst\u00e4ndigkeit ist ein sch\u00f6nes Modell, dass auch durch ein BGE gef\u00f6rdert w\u00fcrde - man kann dann n\u00e4mlich auch ohne eigenes Einkommen starten, und man fliegt nicht besonders hart auf die Schnauze, wenn es schief geht.

&gt;Im Gegenteil, das l\u00e4sst sich genau beziffern: Einnahmen - Ausgaben - Steuern.

Richtig, sorry.

&gt;Man k\u00f6nnte hier gasp den Markt agieren lassen: Mindeststandards definieren. Wer bessere Pflege leistet, der kann daf\u00fcr auch mehr verlangen. Und die kann sich dann leisten, wer gespart hat. Oder man kann Pflege wieder dorthin verorten, wo sie hin geh\u00f6rt: In die Familie. Aber das ist ja hoch unsozial /s.

Nun, f\u00fcr das erste muss man erstmal bessere Pflege und den Nutzen von Pflege definieren. F\u00fcr das zweite - ja, die M\u00f6glichkeit m\u00f6chte ich auch - und auch deshalb m\u00f6chte ich ein Grundeinkommen - damit kann man dann n\u00e4mlich auch einfach mal einige Zeit nicht oder weniger arbeiten und sich um die Pflege von Angeh\u00f6rigen oder Freunden k\u00fcmmern.

&gt;Keine Sorge, es wird Leute geben, die das machen werden. Im Osten hat neulich ein Anwalt noch B\u00fcrohilfen f\u00fcr 1,54 Cent besch\u00e4ftigt.

Es sind 1,54 Euro. Und mit einem BGE halte ich das f\u00fcr akzeptabel, wenn denn jemand daf\u00fcr arbeiten will.

&gt;Richtig. Aber erstmal ist es auf meinem und deinem Lohnzettel weg. Und in Hamburg am anderen Ende der Republik bauen sie dann eine sch\u00f6ne Philharmonie davon. Na danke.

Das meiste davon flie\u00dft in Sozialausgaben und Geh\u00e4lter. Dieses Geld bekommt jemand und lebt davon (und zahlt oft dann auch wieder Steuern und Abgaben und der Kreislauf beginnt von neuem...). Manchmal auch jemand, der eine Philharmonie baut, oder sp\u00e4ter dort als K\u00fcnstler t\u00e4tig ist.

&gt;sigh Nochmal. Der BIP ist absolut irrelevant. Relevant sind die Einnahmen des Bundes.

Der Bundeshaushalt ist nur ein Teil des Geldes das vom Staat umverteilt wird, warum willst Du nur darauf sehen? Ein BGE wird an anderen Stellen Kosten erzeugen, und Kosten vermeiden - wenn Du diese Systeme nicht einbeziehst, landest Du bei einem v\u00f6llig falschen Ergebnis. Die Einf\u00fchrung eines BGE w\u00fcrde ja eine Umkremplung des Gesamt-Systems bedingen.

&gt;Der Bundeshaushalt rechnet mit Einnahmen von 301.600.000.000 \u20ac - die Ausgaben d\u00fcrfen nicht langfristig wesentlich dar\u00fcber liegen, sonst kippt das System (--&gt; Griechenlandkrise).

Das ist aber kein Problem des Bundeshaushaltes sondern des gesamten Staates.

&gt;Wird der Bundeshaushalt mit einer Staatsquote von 50% erreicht, dann kann man ihn bei 100% maximal auf 603.200.000.000 steigern. Dir wird auffallen, das das weniger ist als die erwartenden Kosten aus dem BGE.

Nein. Nehmen wir mal an Deine Ergebnis w\u00e4re richtig und man m\u00fcsste den Bundeshaushalt verdoppeln: 

Um ihn zu verdoppeln m\u00fcsste man eine Staatsquote von ca. 1300 Milliarden um 300 Milliarden erh\u00f6hen, das sind ~20%, wenn man es auf die Gesamtproduktivit\u00e4t bezieht, etwa ~10% mehr davon aufwenden. Es verdopplen sich ja nicht alle anderen Haushalte gleichm\u00e4ssig mit. Wir haben jetzt eine Staatsquote von ~44% - dann h\u00e4tten wir eine von ~53% - das w\u00e4re auf dem Niveau von Belgien und immernoch 4% unter Frankreich oder Finland, die beide bei ca. 58% liegen. 

&gt;Und dann hast Du noch keinen Euro in Infrastruktur gesteckt, oder Gesundheitswesen... Und Du hast noch nicht gesagt, wie die L\u00e4nder und Kommunen finanziert werden sollen.

All das ist in der Staatsquote jetzt schon drin, und wird auch drin bleiben - deshalb verwende ich ja diese Zahl.

&gt;&gt;Spa\u00df, Befriedigung, Anerkennung, Geld.

&gt;Das hei\u00dft, wenn sich niemand findet, dem es Spa\u00df macht, der sich auch nicht mit einem Bundesverdienstkreuz davon \u00fcberzeugen l\u00e4sst, der keine sexuelle Affinit\u00e4t zeigt, Kan\u00e4le zu reinigen, ersticken wir in unserer eigenen Schei\u00dfe? Super.

Das ist arg verdreht. Und ich w\u00fcrde durchaus ein paar Wochen im Jahr Kan\u00e4le reinigen, wenn man mich entsprechend daf\u00fcr bezahlt und ich w\u00fcrde vermutlich auch Spa\u00df dabei haben - warum nicht (ja, ich kenne den Job, ich habe sowohl viele Kl\u00e4ranlagen besucht, bin durch Kan\u00e4le gelaufen und habe auch mit Abwasser mit Labor gearbeitet)? Das ist ein interessanter Job und die Leute die es heute machen sind durchaus stolz auf ihre Arbeit und m\u00f6gen diese grunds\u00e4tzlich auch (btw. das ist kein Job f\u00fcr komplett ungelernte, sondern in den meisten F\u00e4llen recht anspruchsvoll, er hat nur ein erb\u00e4rmlich schlechtes Ansehen). Ich w\u00fcrde es aber nicht ausschlie\u00dflich machen wollen.

Und wtf. sexuelle Affinit\u00e4t - es ist auch einfach sehr befriedigend am Ende vom Tag zu sehen, dass der Kanal wieder sauber ist, und man was geleistet hat, auch f\u00fcr die Gesellschaft. Und Anerkennung ist kein Bundesverdienstkreuz, sondern einfach dass andere Menschen sehen das man etwas geleistet hat und das w\u00fcrdigen.

&gt;&gt;ich will ja keinen gleiches Einkommen f\u00fcr alle oder ein so hohes BGE, dass es jeden Luxus abdeckt.

&gt;Nenn doch mal ne Zahl.

Das kann ich aus dem Stegreif nicht. Da m\u00fcsste ich lange rumrechnen, und es h\u00e4ngt von vielen Randbedingungen ab. Ohne Miete und verwandte Kosten und weiteren Staatsabgaben vielleicht irgendwo zwischen 500-1000 Euro - darauf m\u00f6chte ich mich aber nicht festlegen - es geht hier erstmal um eine grunds\u00e4tzliche Frage.&gt; Der Mensch geht den Weg des geringsten Widerstandes, das liegt in unserer Natur. Wenn wir ein Erfolgserlebnis bekommen ohne viel daf\u00fcr zu tun, wird die Mehrheit der Menschen damit zufrieden sein.

Ich teile dieses Menschenbild nicht. Und die Wirklichkeit best\u00e4tigt mich - Menschen suchen st\u00e4ndig Herausforderungen und Erfolgserlebnisse - und das normalerweise eben gerade nicht auf dem einfachsten und bequemsten Weg - schau Dir einfach mal Bergsteiger an, die w\u00e4hlen meistens eher gerade den schwierigsten Weg, den sie gerade noch schaffen k\u00f6nnen. Und auch ein Computerspiel spielt doch keiner auf der einfachsten Stufe, weil es dann bequemer ist und man einfacher zum "Erfolgserlebnis" kommt? 

Einfach nur ein Einkommen zu haben, bietet aber erstmal gar kein Erfolgerlebnis.

&gt;&gt;Das sollte man erst gar nicht zu Ende denken. Zumindest wenn der Wunsch einfach nur in einem w\u00fcrdigen Leben und nicht z.B. in einer Luxusjacht, besteht.

&gt;Aber f\u00fcr ein w\u00fcrdiges Leben brauchen wir kein BGE, Harz4 reicht daf\u00fcr locker aus.

Hartz 4 ist erstmal kein grunds\u00e4tzliches Recht von jedem, das antragslos existiert (das ist ein gro\u00dfer Unterschied zur alten Sozialhilfe - diese war ein Recht, das auch ohne Antrag, einfach aus den Tatsachen, bestand) und es ist an Bedingungen gekn\u00fcpft, und wird bei Einkommen und Missverhalten gek\u00fcrzt. Selbst ein Grundeinkommen auf Hartz 4 Niveau, w\u00e4re ein komplett anderes System als Hartz 4.

Und die W\u00fcrde - nun, darum betteln zu m\u00fcssen und Anspr\u00fcche erf\u00fcllen zu m\u00fcssen damit man was zu Essen hat, ist nicht w\u00fcrdig. Und der Betrag ist es f\u00fcr viele auch nicht, weil es zumindest je nach Region und Geschick eben nicht reicht - sonst w\u00fcrden wir  keine langen Schlangen z.B. bei den Tafeln sehen.&gt;Ein BGE w\u00fcrde das Angebot reduzieren. 

Sehe ich nicht so. Es w\u00fcrde das Angebot ver\u00e4ndern - es w\u00fcrde aber gerade das Angebot im Niedriglohnsektor erh\u00f6hen, da man dann keinen Mindestlohn und weitere Restriktionen mehr braucht. Und auch die Arbeitsbedingungen w\u00fcrden eine wesentlich h\u00f6here Rolle spielen. Das erste w\u00fcrde nat\u00fcrlich auch die Konkurrenzf\u00e4higkeit auf dem internationalen Markt erh\u00f6hen.

Es w\u00fcrde es aber z.B. auch wieder m\u00f6glich machen, dass man Dinge repariert und erh\u00e4lt anstatt produziert, weil es ja eben den abh\u00e4ngigen Lohnanteil senken w\u00fcrde, und damit auch den Wert der Dinge (der Rohstoffe und der daf\u00fcr bereits geleisteten Arbeit) relativ erh\u00f6ht.

&gt;Letztlich muss man sich eben \u00fcberlegen, ob diese Freiheit f\u00fcr die Menschen einem diese Geldmenge wert ist.

Nun, ich sehe das eingebettet in einen gesellschaftlichen Wandel - der mehr Freiheitsgrade f\u00fcr jeden Einzelnen bietet - aber auch das quantitative Wachstum beschr\u00e4nkt, weil er Arbeit wieder zum einem normalen Gut macht, wie auch Dinge. 

&gt;Wir sind auch jetzt bei echtem Angebot und Nachfrage - es ist v\u00f6llig normal, dass Angebot und Nachfrage von diversen Sachen beeinflusst werden.

Ein Mindestlohn, Hartz 4 Aufstockung, Arbeitsf\u00f6rderung,... macht einen Markt in diesem Bereich v\u00f6llig unm\u00f6glich. Das ist alles andere als ein selbstregulierter Markt, gerade ein Mindestlohn schlie\u00dft ja ein komplettes Marktsegment komplett aus.

Das ist richtig. Und die Gesamtkosten f\u00fcr die Ausbildung/Einarbeitung w\u00fcrden sich nat\u00fcrlich erh\u00f6hen. 

Aber Deinen Job meinte ich vermutlich nicht (nun, je nach dem was du genau meinst) - und andere vermutlich auch nicht - "dienstleisten" in der Gastronomie ist kein mieser Job, sondern nur ein mies entlohnter Job.&gt;Nur um das klar zu stellen - ich arbeite gerne, aber wenn das Grundeinkommen gesichert ist wird kaum einer sagen "Ach ja, h\u00e4tte gerne etwas mehr, ich mach jetzt M\u00fcllabfuhr / Kanalreinigung / Gastronomie / Personalsachbearbeiter der Stadt Castrop-Rauxel"

Die ersten zwei k\u00f6nnten mir durchaus Sp\u00e1\u00df machen, wenn ich sie nur ein paar Wochen/Monate im Jahren machen w\u00fcrde und die Arbeitsbedingungen nicht gesundheitssch\u00e4dlich sind, Gastronomie mag ich nicht so - aber dann, Personalsachbearbeiter - da graust es mir wirklich.

&gt;Es w\u00e4re vielleicht zu allgemein gesagt, dass nur eine Minderheit arbeiten w\u00fcrde, aber wir h\u00e4tten warscheinlich einen massiven \u00dcberschuss bei popul\u00e4ren Berufen und einen erheblichen Mangel in Jobs, die die Leute eben nicht so gerne machen.

Dann m\u00fcssen diese Job eben besser bezahlt werden, die Arbeitsbedingungen verbessert werden, oder anders Anreize geschaffen werden oder man automatisiert sie weg, wenn das billiger ist. Das ist eben einfach der Markt - diesmal aber ohne Zwang f\u00fcr eine Seite.It's not similar, but still pretty close - hot food at ~90\u00b0C has a temperature difference of ~80 K to a fridge and ~70 K to my kitchen. At ~50\u00b0C it's still only ~40 K to ~30 K. Just too add some info - as far as I understand it (IANAL), you are not the suspect, and you won't have to pay, you are just asked as a witness. The suspect is the so far not known driver - and they'll get the second letter and have to pay, because they committed the offense.&gt;Addiction to junk food is not 'a little weaker' than addiction to heroin. People will not beg, steal and kill to afford McDonalds, but they will do that and more to fuel their drug addictions.

That's correct, but only for some very addictive drugs, in particular heroin. For most illegal drugs it is not.

&gt;The magnitude of the issue is of a different order, and pretending that it's just like any other industry would be dangerous and wrong.

I think for most illegal drugs it is, in reference to this issue, comparable to a part of the pharmaceutical, to the alcohol or coffee industry.Well, I tried opiates decades ago - and I didn't like it. I understood back then, that somebody who likes this state of mind, prefers it to the regular state and gets addicted to it, probably had some serious emotional problems before.

That's also my experience with all people I knew in my life which got addicted to heroin. So at least many of these people tried to cope with mental, neurological or social problems they already had before with the wrong means.

(this is in particular for heroin, other drugs are different animals)&gt; I just said that hard drug users are a legitimate concern for public safety.

I think this is wrong for opiates - the use of opiates - as long as the users don't drive - doesn't pose any risk to the public safety - only the - in particular psychological - effects of the withdrawal do. The morphine addicts of the wars didn't get criminal or dangerous as long as they got their morphine. That's very different for other drugs like e.g. alcohol, crack or crystal. Correct - with a real market price for heroin (which is as such a very cheap drug) or prescribed opiates this won't happen. This is as much a social problem as a problem of the drug use.&gt;Most of the illegal drugs market is made up of cocaine, heroin and meth, all of them very addictive drugs.

First this is for the US, which is very different from Europe, then the market for Cannabis is according to that bigger, that for any of those drugs. Also for cocaine more than half of the money is spent by users which are not typical addicts (use less than "near daily/daily"). Also this study only looked at those 4 drugs - that's far from being the complete market. Of those 4 drugs, 3 added up make the biggest share - while one alone is more than any single of them.

&gt;And in fact both pharmaceuticals with an addictive potential and alcohol are regulated. Caffeine, as far as I can find, is not addictive and coffee 'addiction' is certainly not an issue of comparable gravity to cocaine, heroin or meth addiction.

Sure they are partially regulated. But e.g. nasal sprays and laxatives are only very loosely - but they pose a particular high risk of physical addiction and of damages. Coffeine has an even physical addiction potential, but it doesn't cause any strong craving, because we don't directly relate the withdrawal symptoms with coffeine products and it starts long after the last intake (typical symptom is headache on the morning after a day without coffee). 

I didn't compare coffeine "addiction" with e.g. heroin or crack addiction, but with e.g. the typical recreational hallucinogenic drugs, like e.g. LSD - which is much more dangerous, but has an even lower addiction potential.&gt;&gt;First this is for the US, which is very different from Europe

&gt;Please show that's the case. I would have happily brought out numbers for the whole European drug market if I could find them.

I don't have such numbers for Europe, in the end they are also just guessed - but you can just look up any graphs for drug use waves in the US and Europe and see that we use different drugs in different amounts at different times. Even inside the US or Europe there are very different trends.

&gt;&gt;Then the market for Cannabis is according to that bigger, that for any of those drugs

&gt;Cannabis has a plurality, not majority market share. Other drugs still out-trade it.

All others added up do, yes. As such cannabis has the biggest market share - with prices not disturbed by the illegality it would probably be clearly the majority of the market - cocaine, heroine, meth, amphetamines, ... are very cheap drugs if they are produced on an industrial scale, their "real value" is somewhere in the region of aspirin.

&gt;Who says that addicts are only people who use daily? do you seriously consider people in the "use more than weekly" category not addicts?

Yes, I consider them mostly just as regular users, not as addicts. That's not the same. Even of the daily users not all have to be addicts. We can debate what addiction is - but the typical crack or cocaine addict, isn't making regular day long breaks in his consumption scheme and e.g. the weekend or work user is typically not an addict.

The addictive potential of illegal drugs is often highly overestimated - e.g. this study found: http://stopthedrugwar.org/chronicle/2008/apr/18/addiction_small_percentage_drug :

_The research report from the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA) found that only 1% of first-time users of inhalants and tranquilizers were dependent a year later. For hallucinogens and sedatives, the figure was 2%; for pain relievers and alcohol, 3%. The drug with the highest number of dependent users a year after first use was heroin (13%), followed by crack cocaine (9%), marijuana (6%), stimulants (5%), and powder cocaine (4%)._

_When it came to any use of the drug within a year after first use, only alcohol and marijuana broke the 50% barrier, with 71% and 52%, respectively. Less than 20% of first-time heroin or crack users were still using after a year without being considered dependent, while slightly more than one-third of stimulant and powder cocaine users were._

So more than 30% still use powder-cocaine after one year, without being addicted.

The UN and other numbers for the problematic drug use fits with that, they also find typically ~10% of the illicit drug users having a problematic usage scheme.

&gt;Which other illegal drug beside cannabis, cocaine, heroin and 
methamphetamines represents such a large trade that only considering those four is "far" from being the complete market?

I don't know, what they count as meth - if they take it as a chemical or a scene term. The UN e.g. differentiated Meth (Pervitin, Crystal), Ecstasy / MDMA and ATS - Amphetamine Type Stimulants, a few years ago they changed it to Cannabis, Opioids, 
Opiates, Cocaine, Amphetamines, \u201cEcstasy\u201d so I don't know at all what is missing there. For cocaine, I just guess that they include derivates. Hallucinogenics/Psychoactive are missing nearly completely, illegal research drugs also. Then the big group of illegal doping drugs and enhancers  is missing. Without them showing the complete market and explaining how they got to their numbers, in particular the prices, it's pretty useless stats.Did you misunderstand my sentence? I meant to compare LSD with coffeine. I think you we can agree that LSD is a much more dangerous drug than e.g. coffee.Apple is addressing a global market. If apple does this in Britain, what will they do in China, Russia, Saudi Arabia, ... ? Will they give everybody backdoors? Will the products have different backdoors on every single market? Will they restrict the access to foreign websites allowing strong encryption? And most important - how should any of this work inside the EU?

This legislation is either useless (because you could still buy at least everything licensed anywhere in the EU and any foreign service) or extremely damaging to the British economy and in violation of EU law.Probably we have this already - and I think restricting the market for products using strong encryption is a violation of the European market rules. It would restrict licensed products from other EU countries to be sold to Britain. I think the only thing Britain could really do, is demand this for data stored inside the UK - but then - what's the use of that...It's pretty blunt to tell only the leading country is to blame. You could've stayed out of this awful war like many other European countries did. Bush's position would've been much weaker without this opportunist "coalition of the willing".It's in the human rights declarations that humans have the right to leave any country, including their own. Entering a country is what can be prohibited.Erstmal: Die Bundesregierung hat bis jetzt weder Schengen noch Dublin ausgesetzt oder gebrochen - Schengen erlaubt vor\u00fcbergehende Grenzkontrollen und Dublin erlaubt schon immer aufzunehmen, wen und wieviele man will, es stellt nur die Anforderung an die Eintrittsl\u00e4nder, auf Anfrage Fl\u00fcchtlinge zur\u00fcckzunehmen.

Und Platz haben wir genug, damit niemand draussen frieren muss - das ist eine Frage des Wollens - nicht des K\u00f6nnens. Wir haben weit mehr leerstehenden Raum, als Bedarf - mit entsprechenden Anreizen und mehr Flexibilit\u00e4t k\u00f6nnte der Bruchteil der ben\u00f6tigt wird sicherlich auch kurzfristig aktiviert werden. Aber 6000 Leute k\u00f6nnte man in Berlin auch problemlos in \u00f6ffentlichen Geb\u00e4uden unterbringen._Grundgesetz:_

_Artikel 14_

_(1) Das Eigentum und das Erbrecht werden gew\u00e4hrleistet. Inhalt und_ __Schranken__ _werden durch die Gesetze bestimmt._

_(2)_ __Eigentum verpflichtet. Sein Gebrauch soll zugleich dem Wohle der Allgemeinheit dienen.__

_(3)_ __Eine Enteignung ist nur zum Wohle der Allgemeinheit zul\u00e4ssig.__ _Sie darf nur durch Gesetz oder auf Grund eines Gesetzes erfolgen, das Art und Ausma\u00df der Entsch\u00e4digung regelt. Die Entsch\u00e4digung ist unter gerechter Abw\u00e4gung der Interessen der Allgemeinheit und der Beteiligten zu bestimmen. Wegen der H\u00f6he der Entsch\u00e4digung steht im Streitfalle der Rechtsweg vor den ordentlichen Gerichten offen._

---

_Artikel 20_

_(1) Die Bundesrepublik Deutschland ist ein demokratischer und_ __sozialer__ _Bundesstaat._

---

_Lisbon Treaty:_

_Article 3_

_3. The Union shall establish an internal market. It shall work for the sustainable development of Europe based on balanced economic growth and price stability,_ __a highly competitive social market economy, aiming at full employment and social progress__ _, and a high level of protection and improvement of the quality of the environment. It shall promote scientific and technological advance._

_It shall_ __combat social exclusion and discrimination, and shall promote social justice and protection__ _, equality between women and men, solidarity between generations and protection of the rights of the child._

_It shall promote economic, social and territorial cohesion, and solidarity among Member States._

_It shall respect its rich cultural and linguistic diversity, and shall ensure that Europe's cultural heritage is safeguarded and enhanced._

---

Eingriffe in das Eigentum und Regulierungen betreffend des Eigentums sind sehr weitreichend m\u00f6glich.

&gt;Ja, darum ist Deutschland ein Sozialstaat. Daraus l\u00e4sst sich aber keine weitreichende Pflicht des Einzelnen ableiten immer zuerst sozial zu handeln.

Das ist richtig. Aber der Staat kann durchaus Einzelene - grunds\u00e4tzlich in allgemeiner Form - dazu verpflichten sozial zu handeln. 

&gt;Was du scheinbar m\u00f6chtest w\u00e4re ein vom Staat diktierte, Soziale Planwirtschaft. Eine Gesellschaft, in der es erst erlaubt ist Luxusg\u00fcter zu produzieren wenn die gesamte Bev\u00f6lkerung mit Basisg\u00fctern versorgt ist. Das hat nichts mehr mit Freiheit (der Wirtschaft) zu tun sondern ist einfach nur Zwang und von daher strikt abzulehnen.

Es gibt durchaus auch einiges zwischendrin. Man k\u00f6nnte z.B. durchaus Einkommen aus Vermietungen f\u00fcr Wohnungen anhand des Quadratmeterpreises und anhand der Position im Mietspiegel unterschiedlich besteuern, oder auch die Grundsteuer auf die Art der Wohnung beziehen. All das ist weder Planwirtschaft noch Enteignung. Positive Anreize halte ich aber auch f\u00fcr besser als negative.

&gt;\u00a7 1601 ff BGB[1] schreiben vor wem wir zu helfen verpflichtet sind.

Das betrifft direkte Hilfsverpflichtungen - nicht solche, die indirekt \u00fcber den Staat geleistet werden. Was Wikipedia da schreibt ist mir relativ wurst (die Quellen sind \u00fcbrigens nicht die Bundesregierung, sondern FAZ, Spiegel online und Zeit online) - beides ist Teil der jeweiligen Abkommen und die wurden selbstverst\u00e4ndlich nicht gebrochen und darauf wurde auch sehr genau geachtet. Vermutlich sind die Justiziare da etwas genauer, als die Pressesprecher und viel genauer als die Presse die es dann noch mal wiederholt... Schau doch einfach in die Texte rein, die stehen alle online bei der EU, auch auf deutsch.

&gt;Gut f\u00fcr diese 6.000.
&gt;Allerdings stehen die n\u00e4chsten schon vor der T\u00fcr:

Insgesamt haben wir momentan ca. 1,7 Millionen leerstehende Wohnungen in einigerma\u00dfen akzeptablem Zustand. Bei der \u00fcblichen Unterbringungspolitik w\u00e4re das genug f\u00fcr zumindest 6-10 Millionen Personen. Dazu kommen renovierungsbed\u00fcrftiger Leerstand, und Leerstand in nicht-Wohngeb\u00e4uden. Und dazu kommen dann noch mal oft nur zeitweise und/oder teilweise genutzte Geb\u00e4ude in staatlichem Eigentum.Erst mal grunds\u00e4tzlich - alles was ich zitiert habe, ist an den Staat gerichtet - nicht an den B\u00fcrger. Sie beschreiben wie der Staat handeln muss. Wenn da steht "Eigentum verpflichtet" - dann hei\u00dft dies, dass der Staat dieses "Motto" bei seiner Gesetzgebung und anderem staatlichen Agieren zu ber\u00fccksichtigen hat.

ad Art 14:

(2) das ist kein Vorschlag, sondern eine recht strikte Richtlinie wie der Staat zu agieren hat. 

(3) richtig, hier wird geregelt/beschr\u00e4nkt, wann Enteignungen m\u00f6glich gemacht werden k\u00f6nnen. F\u00fcr Grund/Boden geht das sogar noch etwas weiter, als f\u00fcr anderes Eigentum.


ad. Artikel 20:

&gt;Sozial bedeutet nicht, dass Personen zu Handlungen die ihnen Sch\u00e4den (k\u00f6rperlich, geistig, finanzielle, ...) zuf\u00fcgen gezwungen werden k\u00f6nnen. Daf\u00fcr braucht es, wie der Rest unserer Gesetze klar definiert, einen erheblichen Grund.

Nun ja, es definiert unseren Staat als demokratisch und sozial. Der Staat hat damit durchaus die Verpflichtung sozial zu agieren, und kann und muss daf\u00fcr nat\u00fcrlich auch Einkommen/Eigentum der B\u00fcrger heranziehen. Nat\u00fcrlich braucht es daf\u00fcr jeweils Grund und Gesetz. Aber f\u00fcr finanzielle "Sch\u00e4den" ist dies sehr einfach - der Staat erlaubt sich bereits jetzt, finanzielle "Sch\u00e4den" von 44% des BIP zu verursachen, um dies nach seinen Interessen umzuverteilen.

&gt;Ja, sie stellen aber immer die letzte und nicht die erste, m\u00f6gliche Ma\u00dfnahme dar. Und, gerade in der aktuellen Situation, gibt es andere Optionen als Enteignung oder Zwang.

Richtig - ich bef\u00fcrworte auch keinesfalls Enteignungen. 

&gt;Der einfachste, wenn vielleicht auch nicht sozialste, Weg w\u00e4re es zun\u00e4chst einmal auf die Einhaltung Europ\u00e4ischer Vertr\u00e4ge zu pochen und keine Fl\u00fcchtlinge mehr nach Deutschland zu lassen.

Das ist alles andere als einfach - momentan ist es vermutlich sogar ziemlich unm\u00f6glich, da Gerichte entschieden haben, dass in Ungarn und Griechenland sowohl systemische M\u00e4ngel im Asylsystem aufgrund von Gesetzen (vor allen Dingen f\u00fcr Ungarn), aber vor allen Dingen momentan einfach aufgrund der \u00dcberlastung vorliegen. Jeder der momentan gegen eine Abschiebung nach Ungarn oder Griechenland klagen w\u00fcrde, w\u00fcrde Recht bekommen und der Staat darf nicht mehr abschieben, da Dublin nur legal ist, weil wir aufgrund von Vertr\u00e4gen __widerlegbar__ glauben d\u00fcrften, dass in den Empf\u00e4ngerl\u00e4ndern die Asylsysteme europ\u00e4ischen und internationalen Standards gen\u00fcgen - im Moment ist dies aber offensichlich - widerlegt. Sonst greift das non-refoulement Verbot und mit einer Abschiebung w\u00fcrde sich der Staat wissentlich ins Unrecht setzen.

&gt;Ja, aber nur im beschr\u00e4nkten Ma\u00dfe und mit entsprechender Kompensation. Will der Staat z.B. dass eine Baufirma Sozial- statt Luxuswohnungen baut muss er diese f\u00fcr den relativen Verlust entsch\u00e4digen.

Das ist richtig. Wenn der Staat aber sagt, wir besteuern Luxuswohnungen oder den Bau von Luxuswohnungen sehr hoch, und lassen die Besteuerung f\u00fcr Sozialwohnungen sein, ist das vermutlich noch v\u00f6llig legal ohne jegliche Kompensation m\u00f6glich. Genauso angepasste Bebauungspl\u00e4ne und F\u00f6rderprogramme.

&gt;Das magische Wort hier ist shall. Es wird in internationalen Vertr\u00e4gen im Sinne von "beabsichtig" oder "sollten" nicht aber im verbindlichen Sinne von "werden" oder "m\u00fcssen" verwendet. Der Vertag legt also all die aufgelisteten Punkte nahe, setzt sie als erstrebenswerte Ziele und definiert damit eine grobe, gemeinsame Richtung der Vertragspartern. Niemand ist aber zu einer konkreten Umsetzung gezwungen.

Da liegst Du (wie viele andere) v\u00f6llig falsch. "Shall" im englischen Rechtsprech ist grunds\u00e4tzlich "mandatory", "defining". In diesem Fall das zweitere... Ich h\u00e4tte es gleich auf deutsch zitieren sollen ;) Hier die deutsche Version:

_(3) Die Union errichtet einen Binnenmarkt. Sie wirkt auf die nachhaltige Entwicklung Europas auf der Grundlage eines ausgewogenen Wirtschaftswachstums und von Preisstabilit\u00e4t, eine in hohem Ma\u00dfe wettbewerbsf\u00e4hige soziale Marktwirtschaft, die auf Vollbesch\u00e4ftigung und sozialen Fortschritt abzielt, sowie ein hohes Ma\u00df an Umweltschutz und Verbesserung der Umweltqualit\u00e4t hin. Sie f\u00f6rdert den wissenschaftlichen und technischen Fortschritt._

_Sie bek\u00e4mpft soziale Ausgrenzung und Diskriminierungen und f\u00f6rdert soziale Gerechtigkeit und sozialen Schutz, die Gleichstellung von Frauen und M\u00e4nnern, die Solidarit\u00e4t zwischen den Generationen und den Schutz der Rechte des Kindes._

_Sie f\u00f6rdert den wirtschaftlichen, sozialen und territorialen Zusammenhalt und die Solidarit\u00e4t zwischen den Mitgliedstaaten._

_Sie wahrt den Reichtum ihrer kulturellen und sprachlichen Vielfalt und sorgt f\u00fcr den Schutz und die Entwicklung des kulturellen Erbes Europas._&gt;Allerdings haben andere Mitgliedsstaaten der EU eine weitaus weniger sonnige Meinung zum Verhalten der Bundesregierung, egal ob man es als Auslegung oder Bruch der EU-Rechtspraxis darstellen will.

&gt;Und dort, wo die Menschen jetzt ankommen, bei den St\u00e4dten und Gemeinden, scheint die Begeisterung ebenfalls enge Grenzen zu kennen.

Was hat diese Begeisterung oder Nicht-Begeisterung damit zu tun, ob nun ein Vertragsbruch vorliegt oder nicht? Schengen und Dublin sehen das vor, und wir haben es genutzt. Wer klar Dublin und auch Schengen gebrochen hat, ist Ungarn. 

&gt;Erinnerst du dich noch an die Diskussion hier \u00fcber die kleine nieders\u00e4chsische Gemeinde Sumte? "1.000 Menschen bei 100 Einwohnern, wie soll das gehen?"

Ja, das ist eine BEA und ein Extremfall (und nat\u00fcrlich ist Sumte auch nur ein Ortsteil - ansonsten w\u00e4re die Verf\u00fcgbarkeit von so viel Raum auch sehr \u00fcberraschend...). Die Leute sollen dort auch nicht dauerhaft Wohnen - sie werden so schnell wie m\u00f6glich zur LEA weitergeleitet und dort registiert und k\u00f6nnen dann dort, oder nach Umverteilung auf andere Landes EAs ihre Antr\u00e4ge stellen. Wir haben hier auch so eine BEA mit 600-850 Fl\u00fcchtlingen (in einer 2500 Seelen Gemeinde) - das klappt bis jetzt recht gut, momentan ist die Belegung schon einmal komplett ausgetauscht worden, und die Erstbelegung von September ist in die LEA umgezogen. Auch der R\u00fcckbau soll baldm\u00f6glichst erfolgen.

&gt;Deine 1,7 Millionen leerstehenden Wohnungen stehen oft nicht ohne Grund leer - sie wurden dort gebaut, wo kaum einer leben kann bzw. will:

Nun, ich kenne jemanden sehr gut, der zwei davon in einer Gro\u00dfstadt besitzt ;) Und ich kenne viele, viele weitere. Aber es muss/will ja auch nicht jeder in einer Gro\u00dfstadt leben - ich tue das ja schlie\u00dflich auch nicht, und will es auch nicht.

Abgesehen davon, halte ich eine Ansiedlung im "Schrumpfraum" oder l\u00e4ndlicherem Raum nicht f\u00fcr nachteilig, sondern f\u00fcr einen gro\u00dfen Vorteil. Dort ist eine Integration f\u00fcr viele leichter m\u00f6glich als in einer Gro\u00dfstadt und dort gibt es nat\u00fcrlich bereits auch Bedarf an Arbeitskr\u00e4ften und der wird mit Neuansiedlungen weiter steigen.

&gt;Und wo Siedlungen aussterben, gibt es wom\u00f6glich weniger Anreiz f\u00fcr Alteingesessene wie Migranten, Kontakt zueinander zu kn\u00fcpfen: keine guten Voraussetzungen f\u00fcr eine gelungene Integration.

Ich denke das Gegenteil ist der Fall. Die "Zur\u00fcckgebliebenen" werden wenige Neuank\u00f6mmlinge viel eher integrieren, und auf dem Dorf herrscht viel mehr Kontakt zu Mitbewohnern als in der Stadt; die M\u00f6glichkeit in der eigenen Parallelkultur unterzutauchen ist auch kaum vorhanden. Dass es dort besser klappt, hat auch die Vergangenheit bisher immer bewiesen - Integrationsprobleme gibt es in Ghettos und in gro\u00dfen St\u00e4dten, auf dem Land ist das ziemlich unbekannt, und auch in den Kleinst\u00e4dten klappt es recht gut.&gt;&gt;Da liegst Du (wie viele andere) v\u00f6llig falsch. "Shall" im englischen Rechtsprech ist grunds\u00e4tzlich "mandatory", "defining". In diesem Fall das zweitere... Ich h\u00e4tte es gleich auf deutsch zitieren sollen ;) Hier die deutsche Version:

&gt;\u00c4hm ... wieder nein. Das wird auch vor allem in der von dir geposteten, deutschen \u00dcbersetzung deutlich:

N\u00f6, da liegst Du ganz klar falsch. Vergleiche mal die beiden Versionen - in der deutschen ist das "shall" einfach weggefallen - es hat n\u00e4mlich nur eine definierende Bedeutung - im Englischen k\u00f6nnte man es auch weglassen, aber dann w\u00e4r's ja kein sch\u00f6nes Rechtssprech mehr :D Shall in Vertr\u00e4gen und Gesetzen verwirrt die meisten nicht-Muttersprachler und viele Muttersprachler...

Beispiel:

Englisch mit "shall":

_It shall combat social exclusion and discrimination, and shall promote social justice and protection , equality between women and men, solidarity between generations and protection of the rights of the child._

Englisch ohne "shall":

It ~~shall~~ combats social exclusion and discrimination, and ~~shall~~ promotes social justice and protection, equality between women and men, solidarity between generations and protection of the rights of the child.

Deutsch:

_Sie bek\u00e4mpft soziale Ausgrenzung und Diskriminierungen und f\u00f6rdert soziale Gerechtigkeit und sozialen Schutz, die Gleichstellung von Frauen und M\u00e4nnern, die Solidarit\u00e4t zwischen den Generationen und den Schutz der Rechte des Kindes._

Das ist einfach englisches Rechtssprech. Und die Bedeutung von "shall" ist da (leider auch nur meistens) klar.

&gt;Hier werden grobe Ziele gesetzt und keine festen Richtlinen verankert. Um beim Deutschen zu bleiben, man "wirkt hin", "f\u00f6rdert" und "bek\u00e4mpft".

Klar, das ist ja auch Artikel 3, da folgt noch der ganze restliche Vertrag und auch der Vetrag \u00fcber das Funktionieren der EU. 

&gt;Der Vertag l\u00e4sst den Unterzeichnern n\u00e4mlich extrem gro\u00dfen Spielraum wie "gef\u00f6rdert" und "bek\u00e4mpft" wird oder wann die nur sehr grob gesteckten Ziele erreicht sind.

Richtig, kl\u00e4re Verst\u00f6\u00dfe sind aber durchaus durchsetzbar, und weiter unten in Artikel 3 werden ja auch andere Grundrechte direkt einbezogen. Artikel 2 ist aber sogar direkt durch die EU sanktionierbar.

Wir hatten durchaus schon einige (erfolgreiche) Klagen in Deutschland aufgrund der ersten 20 Artikel des Grundgesetzes, die entsprechend auch nur "Richtlinien" f\u00fcr den Staat sind.Ja, das ist fast so schlimm und so geladen wie die Umfrage von Orban:

_Die zw\u00f6lf Fragen:_

_1. Wie bedeutsam ist die Thematik des anwachsenden Terrorisums` f\u00fcr Ihr eigenes Leben?_

_2. K\u00f6nnte Ihrer Meinung nach Ungarn in den kommenden Jahren Ziel des Terrorismus werden?_

_3. Manche sagen, dass die fehlgeleitete Einwanderungspolitik Br\u00fcssels zum Anwachsen des Terrorismus f\u00fchrt. Stimmen Sie damit \u00fcberein?_

_4. Wu\u00dften Sie, dass Wirtschaftsfl\u00fcchtlinge die Grenze illegal \u00fcberqueren und das deren Zahl zuletzt um das 20fache gestiegen ist?_

_5. Stimmen Sie der Meinung zu, dass Wirtschaftsfl\u00fcchtlinge die Jobs und Existenzen der ungarischen Menschen gef\u00e4hrden?_

_6. Manche sagen, dass Br\u00fcssels Politik zu Einwanderung und Terrorismus gescheitert ist. Stimmen Sie dem zu?_

_7. W\u00fcrden Sie die ungarische Regierung bei ihren Bem\u00fchungen zur Einf\u00fchrung strengerer Einwanderungsregeln als sie Br\u00fcssel vor hat, unterst\u00fctzen?_

_8. W\u00fcrden Sie eine neue Gesetzgebung bef\u00fcrworten, die es der ungarischen Regierung erlaubt, Einwanderer, die illegal ins Land eingereist sind, in Haft zu nehmen?_

_9. Sollten Ihrer Meinung nach illegal nach Ungarn Eingewanderte so schnell wie m\u00f6glich in ihre L\u00e4nder zur\u00fcckgeschickt werden?_

_10. Sind Sie einverstanden, dass die Wirtschaftsfl\u00fcchtlinge, die in Ungarn bleiben, die Kosten ihres Aufenthalts decken m\u00fcssen?_

_11. Stimmen Sie damit \u00fcberein, dass die beste Abwehr von Einwanderung in der Wirtschaftshilfe f\u00fcr die Herkunftsl\u00e4nder besteht?_

_12. Stimmen Sie mit der ungarischen Regierung \u00fcberein, anstelle von Mitteln f\u00fcr die Einwanderung bereit zu stellen, wir ungarischen Familien und die Kinder, die noch geboren werden, unterst\u00fctzen sollen?_&gt;Er scheint auch gar nicht zu verstehen was er sagt, einerseits streitet er Verantwortungen f\u00fcr rechte Gewalttaten ab, aber andererseits gibt er Maas die Verantwortung f\u00fcr die anscheinend in seiner Wahrnehmung ebenso zahlreichen Linken Straftaten in letzter Zeit.

Das _scheint_ muss man hier hervorheben - was er macht ist typisch f\u00fcr aufhetzende Propaganda, und entweder er hat schon soviel konsumiert, dass er dies verinnerlicht hat, oder er weiss ganz genau, was er da sagt. Es geht ja um die Wirkung - nicht darum, ob das auch irgendwie koh\u00e4rent oder logisch ist...&gt;Das hei\u00dft, deine Meinung \u00fcber die angebliche Interpretierbarkeit von EU-Bestimmungen wie Dublin wird nicht von anderen EU-L\u00e4ndern geteilt:

Angebliche Interpretierbarkeit? Die ist nicht gegeben. Das ist ganz eindeutig.

EU 604/2013 (http://eur-lex.europa.eu/legal-content/DE/TXT/HTML/?uri=CELEX:32013R0604&amp;from=DE)

_Artikel 17_

__Ermessensklauseln__

_(1)   Abweichend von Artikel 3 Absatz 1_ __kann jeder Mitgliedstaat beschlie\u00dfen, einen bei ihm von einem Drittstaatsangeh\u00f6rigen oder Staatenlosen gestellten Antrag auf internationalen Schutz zu pr\u00fcfen, auch wenn er nach den in dieser Verordnung festgelegten Kriterien nicht f\u00fcr die Pr\u00fcfung zust\u00e4ndig ist.__

__Der Mitgliedstaat, der gem\u00e4\u00df diesem Absatz beschlie\u00dft, einen Antrag auf internationalen Schutz zu pr\u00fcfen, wird dadurch zum zust\u00e4ndigen Mitgliedstaat und \u00fcbernimmt die mit dieser Zust\u00e4ndigkeit einhergehenden Verpflichtungen.__ _[...]_

_[...]_

&gt;Die erste Nation, die damit aufh\u00f6rte, EU-Recht wie vorhergesehen bei Fl\u00fcchtlingen anzuwenden, war Griechenland.

Nun, dass ist schwierig - ich vermute Dublin hat hier eine L\u00fccke. 

Aber ganz abgesehen davon, ging es mir nicht um die Bestimmung der Zust\u00e4ndigkeit, sondern um die Bedingungen in Ungarn (und Griechenland), die eine Abschiebung dort hin unm\u00f6glich machen, f\u00fcr Ungarn sind diese vors\u00e4tzlich und klar rechtswidrig, so z.B. die Inhaftierung (mit weder ausreichend rechtlichen Rat und Geh\u00f6r (incl. Gruppenvorf\u00fchrungen zur Haftpr\u00fcfung etc.), medizinischer und psychologischer Unterst\u00fctzung und z.B. Vorf\u00fchrung zu Arztbesuchen _angeleint_ und in Handschellen) von Dublin-III R\u00fcckgef\u00fchrten unter Bedingungen die weder Dublin, noch der Genfer Fl\u00fcchtlingsconvention, noch den Menschenrechtskonventionen entsprechen. Und das ist seit einiger Zeit so.

Gegen diesen Artikel aus dem TFEU haben fast alle versto\u00dfen - deshalb ist es m\u00fc\u00dfig, solange es nicht um klare Menschenrechtsverletzungen wie in Ungarn geht, zu diskutieren, wer nun der b\u00f6se Bube ist:

_Article 80_

_The policies of the Union set out in this Chapter and their implementation shall be governed by the principle of solidarity and fair sharing of responsibility, including its financial implications, between the Member States. Whenever necessary, the acts of the Union adopted pursuant to this Chapter shall contain appropriate measures to give effect to this principle._

Bez\u00fcglich der Umsetzung von Artikel 78 und 79 sieht es nicht viel besser aus.

(http://www.lisbon-treaty.org/wcm/the-lisbon-treaty/treaty-on-the-functioning-of-the-european-union-and-comments/part-3-union-policies-and-internal-actions/title-v-area-of-freedom-security-and-justice/chapter-2-policies-on-border-checks-asylum-and-immigration/346-article-78.html)This was in particular about Iraq. And there Poland wasn't just one of many countries - but one of the four countries which participated in the invasion (together with the US, Australia and the UK), and it was later a part of the 37 Coalition of the Willing countries which contributed troops after the invasion. 

&gt;Well I think my country should pay for the countries that it invaded on orders of USA, and I can only hope in future shitty democracy process will not lead us to again be mercenaries for USA.

The US can't give Poland orders - and well, you might call the Polish and eastern European opportunism back then mercenarism. But in the end it was a sovereign decision, as it was a sovereign decision of most of the European countries to not participate. This is a map of the early Coalition of the Willing: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Coalition_of_the_willing#/media/File:Coalition_of_the_willing.svg 

If you have to take immigrants, or whatever, are completely different questions - I don't want to connect that - I just get a bit angry if you talk about orders or being a dog on a leash. Even if Poland behaved a bit like that - it was still a completely sovereign decision - and Poland has the full responsibility for this decision.You should add, that driving in groups is absolutely legal in Austria and Germany - above 14 people you can drive aside with two bikes and the whole group is to be treated as one vehicle (e.g. if the start of the group passes a traffic light, they can completely pass, no matter how long they are). Other drivers also must treat them as one vehicle - e.g. by only passing the whole group - for a longer group this means, they have to stay behind. If the group is very long, it has to establish gaps to let other traffic cross.We also do in German - and the people is called "Esten".But do you pronounce it "Est-honia" or "Es-thonia" or "Esth-onia"?&gt;"Europa ist eine Wertegemeinschaft" can mean anything, it really depends on the speaker.

Well, it also means in this context, that the EU is a union with common values and not (just) an economic union - no matter how you define the values.As the plane still transmitted data after the catastrophic event (whatever it was), at least one recorder should've also worked.&gt;So really, the whole thing was Germany's and Britain's fault. At that stage we were just listening to our allies.

Well, no, you were not listening to the "ally": https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eE_rnZRtzjY

&gt;Programmiere ein _einfaches_ Spiel (Schach)Nun, reddit kann man per rss abfragen. Reddit indiziert leider nur die letzten 1000 Beitr\u00e4ge / user oder sub. Programmiere ein Tool, welches regelm\u00e4\u00dfig die Userseite per rss abfragt, die Beitrage und Links speichert und durchsuchbar zur Verf\u00fcgung stellt: ein komplettes Archiv der eigenen Beitr\u00e4ge und all der Posts die man kommentiert hat. Dasselbe f\u00fcr subs - bitte auch mit einer Volltextsuche oder in einem g\u00e4ngigen Format :)

F\u00fcr den irc-chat ben\u00f6tigen wir ein zuverl\u00e4ssiges, konfigurierbares Tool (das was es momentan gibt ist leider etwas kaputt :(, k\u00f6nnte nat\u00fcrlich auch repariert werden ), welches ebenfalls reddit subs abfragt, und neue Beitr\u00e4ge von dort im irc postet.Vermutlich verstehst Du dann was anderes unter einem Schachspiel als ich (f\u00fcr mich war da immer nur die Theorie interessant.) Ich meine schon mit Stellungsbewertung, search tree pruning, ... Allein ein kleiner Aspekt des tree pruning war mal eine Seminararbeit f\u00fcr mich, f\u00fcr die ich mich lange einlesen musste. 

Aber gut, heut kann ein "d\u00fcmmeres" Spiel nat\u00fcrlich \u00fcberhaupt erst funktionieren, vor 20 Jahren waren die Rechner etwas langsamer ;) Aber allein den search tree brute force abzuarbeiten, oder eine einfache Stellungsbewertung zu implementieren, ist f\u00fcr einen Anf\u00e4nger der von Graphen keine Ahnung hat, eine Riesenaufgabe.

Oder meinst Du ein Schachspiel in dem zwei Menschen gegeneinander spielen?Ach so - das ist nat\u00fcrlich viel eher machbar und mit den heutigen Tools vermutlich sogar relativ komfortabel.Oh, you are correct. For some reason I remembered wrongly that one box is in the front.Maybe she just bought them or got them gifted. Until some years ago many skeletons and skulls were imported from India, and there are also many old specimen available. They are getting a bit more expensive because as far as I know, now nobody sells "new" ones anymore, but there are still many on the market. (and as more fake ones are used in schools, by students and they are not on display in doctors' offices anymore today, there is also some input). 

And then there are also ones from historical cemeteries which "are not needed" anymore. But this is probably also illegal in Sweden.Nun, damit ist der Student ein Vervielf\u00e4ltigungsger\u00e4t und der Hersteller hat bei in-Verkehrbringung eine Verg\u00fctung an die VG-Wort abzuf\u00fchren.Richtig - aber das sollte doch eine legale Privatkopie sein, und f\u00fcr das Tablet wurde auch schon eine Pauschalabgabe (~15 Euro) erhoben, von der die VG Wort einen Teil erh\u00e4lt.

(https://de.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pauschalabgabe#Verg.C3.BCtungen_durch_Hersteller_von_Ger.C3.A4ten_und_Medien)&gt;Kann man durch die Suchfunktion umgehen indem man eine datums range durchcrawlt

Nat\u00fcrlich - aber damit kann ich nicht weiter als 1000 Beitr\u00e4ge auf einer Userseite zur\u00fcck. Und Inhalte von Kommentaren - um die es mir prim\u00e4r geht - kann man damit \u00fcberhaupt nicht finden.

Oder kennst Du da einen Trick parat? Wie komme ich an alle Kommentare, die ich jemals auf reddit verfasst habe oder wie kann ich diese durchsuchen oder runterladen?

(edit: nat\u00fcrlich kann ich google f\u00fcr die Volltextsuche verwenden - das ist aber sehr l\u00fcckenhaft, insbesondere f\u00fcr kleine subs)

&gt;Edit: Die Aussage ist eh falsch, indiziert wird alles, die API hat halt ein Limit von 1000 posts

Ne, das scheint durchaus die Datenbank zu sein - nat\u00fcrlich sind die Beitr\u00e4ge noch da, aber auf der Userseite oder der Sub-Seite sind die Beitr\u00e4ge nicht mehr indiziert.Beschreibst Du grade Ostdeutschland? Selbst mit viel mehr Fl\u00fcchtlingen kommt der Westen nie auf den dortigen Jungmann\u00fcberschuss...&gt;Junge M\u00e4nner waren schon immer eine Problemgruppe und au\u00dferdem k\u00f6nnen Alte auch nichts mehr rei\u00dfen.

Junge M\u00e4nner sind typischerweise die, die viel bewegen, die risikobereiter und aktiver sind, die Ver\u00e4nderung bringen - positiv wie negativ - damit sind sie noch lange keine Problemgruppe.

&gt;Es gibt n\u00e4mlich bei uns nur 44 Millionen Einwohner, die das Geschehen noch beeinflussen und nicht nur Rente kassieren oder sich den Arsch abwischen lassen m\u00fcssen.

Allein von 20-60 sind es nach Deinen Daten von 45 Millionen - und die anderen sollte man nun auch nicht einfach abschreiben...http://www.bamf.de/SharedDocs/Anlagen/DE/Downloads/Infothek/Statistik/Asyl/statistik-anlage-teil-4-aktuelle-zahlen-zu-asyl.pdf?__blob=publicationFile Seite 7 unten. Ist auch auf der von Dir genannten Seite verlinkt.Z.b. als ganz typische "Warnung" von Rechts vor der "Umvolkung" und "Islamisierung". Das h\u00e4tte nichts mit False flag zu tun, nur mit Angstmache und Hetze.Ich denke Merkel, und insbesondere Leute auf mittlerem Level, k\u00f6nnten diese Buttons durchaus dr\u00fccken.

Stell Dir einfach mal vor in Holland passiert was und wir m\u00fcssten 5 Millionen Niederl\u00e4nder kurzfristig aufnehmen - w\u00fcrden wir da auch so unflexibel und langsam reagieren und denen solche Umst\u00e4nde zumuten? Ich vermute, da w\u00fcrden wir ganz anders reagieren.Ich bin mir da sehr sicher. Und das hat erstmal nichts mit Rassismus, einer besonderen N\u00e4he zu Holland etc. zu tun. Mir fehlt da tats\u00e4chlich das passende Wort daf\u00fcr - es geht hier mehr um sowas wie Armuts- und Elendsstereotypen und eine Abstumpfung diesen gegen\u00fcber.

F\u00fcr die Menschen aus Osteuropa, aus Syrien, aus Afghanistan, ... haben wir einfach das Gef\u00fchl, die sind daran gew\u00f6hnt, die k\u00f6nnen damit umgehen und wir sind an solche Bilder mit diesen Menschen gewohnt. F\u00fcr "reiche" Westler sind wir das nicht. 

Ich habe das selbst in S\u00fcdafrika in zwei Instanzen erlebt - erstens wirken auf mich selbst, wei\u00dfe Arme in den Slums viel st\u00e4rker als Schwarze. Aber dann habe ich mich auch mit einigen Schwarzen unterhalten, auch solchen die selbst unter diesen Umst\u00e4nden leben  m\u00fcssen - und sogar viele von denen haben Mitleid mit den armen Wei\u00dfen, und finden es ganz schrecklich, w\u00e4hrend sie ihre eigene Situation akzeptieren. (Es ist auch richtig, dass die Wei\u00dfen dort tats\u00e4chlich schlechter damit umgehen k\u00f6nnen, aber das ist ein Nebenaspekt, um den es hier nicht gehen soll).like this: http://3.bp.blogspot.com/-40NzXQexnik/VLfe7fhZSUI/AAAAAAAAAWk/aAYXmWkvaSI/s1600/CharlieHebdo%2B9-11%2Bcartoon.jpg ? Oh no, they did that themselves...Der Originalartikel: http://www.phvsa.de/files/gisa/Zeitschrift_03-2015_WEB.pdf (auf Seite 2)In Germany: Depending on the state, fines of up to 6 monthly wages or half a year of prison. (Theoretically the children could also be given to foster parents.) The fines are possible against the parents but also against pupils of at least 14 years age. In addition to that pupils can and are also be brought to school by force by the police.You could also punish the parents and older pupils with detention. Who can't pay a fine has to go to prison for the corresponding time.

Well, you could also try to add positive stimuli - e.g. by giving the kids a free breakfast and lunch at school. Grundeinkommen ist keine Sozialleistung. 

&gt;Das nenne ich mal ordentlich, zumal die Steuereinnahmen insgesamt bei 643 Milliarden sind und davon gehen dann 1 Billionen in Sozialleistungen... wer's glaubt tr\u00e4umt auch vom BGE.

Deutschland hat momentan eine Staatsquote von ca. 1300 Milliarden. Die Steuer ist nur ein Teil davon. Der Teil, der davon in Sozialleistungen flie\u00dft, m\u00fcsste dann dar\u00fcberhinaus auch gro\u00dfteils nicht mehr bezahlt werden.

&gt;So ergibt die schwarze Null im Haushalt auch gleich mehr Sinn - jedenfalls f\u00fcr alle, die nicht rechnen k\u00f6nnen. F\u00fcr alle anderen gilt: BGE =&gt; nicht finanzierbar

Nun, ich glaube auch die BGE Bef\u00fcrworter, k\u00f6nnen durchaus rechnen und wissen auch, was man berechnen muss - insbesondere G\u00f6tz Werner - ohne das h\u00e4tte er niemals sein "Imperium" aufbauen k\u00f6nnen. Wir haben eine Produktivit\u00e4t von ca. 3000 Milliarden im Jahr, von ca. einem Drittel w\u00fcrde das Grundeinkommen die Verteilung neu bestimmen. Bisher wird es eben anders und ebenso willk\u00fcrlich (oder gar noch willk\u00fcrlicher) verteilt.&gt;Eine Quote ist eine Prozentangabe. Die Staatsquote in Deutschland liegt bei etwa 45%. Also keine Ahnung, was Du meinst, bring mal konkrete Fakten (z.B. von destatis.de) damit man wei\u00df, wor\u00fcber Du gerade sprichst.

Ach, h\u00e4ng dich doch nicht an dem Wort auf - dann eben der Staatsanteil = 44% vom BIP, macht rund 1300 Milliarden. Das sind konkrete Fakten. Das ist das Geld, das jedes Jahr direkt durch den Staat umgelenkt wird. 

&gt;Verursacht das eigenst\u00e4ndige Denken eigentlich irgendeine Art von k\u00f6rperlichen Schmerz, oder warum sind so viele BGE Bef\u00fcrworter nicht bereit selbst mal dr\u00fcber nachzudenken?

Das habe ich doch bereits - es geht um eine Anders-Verteilung von ca. einem Drittel des BIP, wenn wir nur die Wertsch\u00f6pfung nehmen, ist es ein klein wenig mehr.

Du kannst es aber auch einfach mit der Wertsch\u00f6pfung pro B\u00fcrger rechnen, die liegt bei etwa 2700 Euro / Monat (incl. Kinder etc.).

Nat\u00fcrlich w\u00fcrde das auch eine grundlegende \u00c4nderung des gesamten Wirtschaftsystems bedingen - und daf\u00fcr ist die Rechnung nat\u00fcrlich viel zu einfach - aber das es nicht an der Wertsch\u00f6pfung / Produktivit\u00e4t / Finanzierbarkeit liegt, ist mit dieser Betrachtung von Au\u00dfen wohl schon recht klar.&gt;Und inwiefern helfen die Einnahmen der Sozialversicherung? Nehmen wir gleich mal ein paar konkrete Fakten[1] : Sozialversicherung insgesamt lagen 2013 bei 538,2 Milliarden Euro.

Die Sozialleistungsquote lag f\u00fcr 2014 bei ca. 849 Milliarden - 29,2%. (http://www.sozialpolitik-aktuell.de/tl_files/sozialpolitik-aktuell/_Politikfelder/Finanzierung/Datensammlung/PDF-Dateien/abbII1a.pdf)

&gt;Jetzt k\u00f6nnte man sagen, Rente wird gestrichen, jeder bekommt das BGE.

Nein, aber der Betrag des BGE muss nat\u00fcrlich - zumindest teilweise - von der Rente abgezogen werden, falls diese dar\u00fcber liegt.

&gt;Wie sieht es mit der Krankenversicherung aus? Wird niemand mehr krank, weil nun alle das BGE haben?

Nein f\u00fcr die Krankenversicherung ist das recht neutral - die wird etwas weniger f\u00fcr Ausfallleistungen brauchen, sollte daf\u00fcr  aber auch entsprechend weniger bekommen. Oder man schafft die gesetzlichen Krankenversicherungen einfach gleich ganz ab, und geht zu einem steuerfinanzierten System \u00fcber.

&gt;Pflegeversicherung? Nein, auch nicht?

Doch, hier f\u00e4llt etwas weg, da h\u00e4usliche Pflege finanziell wieder einfacher m\u00f6glich wird.

Du rechnest hier aber ingesamt viel zu kompliziert - ein BGE w\u00fcrde einen Einfluss auf all diese T\u00f6pfe haben - manche vergr\u00f6\u00dfern, manche verkleinern, und das ganze Wirtschaftsystem und auch die Lohnstrukturen umkrempeln. Deshalb schaut man lieber auf den Gesamttopf:

Sagen wir doch einfach mal, wir verteilen ~~600~~ 500 Euro pro B\u00fcrger mehr um (was sehr hoch gegriffen ist) - das w\u00e4ren dann ca. 500 Milliarden. Packen wir das auf unsere Staatsquote von 1300 Milliarden drauf, dann w\u00e4ren wir bei ca. 1800 Milliarden - das w\u00e4re dann eine Staatsquote von knapp 60% - und damit in etwa so hoch wie jetzt schon in Finnland oder Frankreich.&gt;Wenn man es ganz genau nimmt k\u00f6nnten wir in Deutschland auch 20 Millionen Syrer aufnehmen. W\u00e4r nicht sch\u00f6n, w\u00e4r sehr extrem, aber es w\u00e4re m\u00f6glich.

Dann w\u00e4re der Krieg auch auf einen Schlag beendet und wir k\u00f6nnten alle sofort wieder heimschicken. (scnr)Der Begriff umfasst ein wenig mehr (https://de.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rechtsstaat#Begriff) - er grenzt sich auch vom Unrechtsstaat ab, der sich auch strikt an die "rule-of-law" halten k\u00f6nnte. Minderheiten k\u00f6nnte man durchaus mit auch mit Demokratie und "Rule-of-law" ausrotten - in einem Rechtsstaat geht dies aber nicht. Was Du meinst ist vermutlich sowas wie ein "Gesetzesstaat" (im nicht abwertenden Sinne). (https://de.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gesetzesstaat)

Aber richtig - mit Landesgrenzen etc. hat das \u00fcberhaupt nichts zu tun, und ich kann auch nicht sehen, womit Merkel gerade gegen das Rechtsstaatsprinzip versto\u00dfen haben soll.&gt;Und inwiefern haben r\u00f6mische Rechtsgrunds\u00e4tze in der BRD G\u00fcltigkeit?

https://de.wikipedia.org/wiki/Impossibilium_Nonea_est_obligatio

findet sich durchaus auch in unserem Recht wieder und ist ein Grundsatz den man auch auf Verfassungsrechte anwenden kann. Nur - Impossibilium ist eine sehr hohe Anforderung - die der Unm\u00f6glichkeit. Z.b. kannst Du nicht von mir verlangen, dass ich dir exakt das St\u00fcck Kuchen, das ich Dir geklaut und dann aufgegessen habe, wieder zur\u00fcckgebe.

Eine tats\u00e4chliche Unm\u00f6glichkeit bez\u00fcglich des Asylrechts zu erreichen halte ich aus realpolitischen Gr\u00fcnden f\u00fcr ausgeschlossen.K\u00f6nnen ist nicht relativ. In den Gesetzen wo dieser Grundsatz zur Anwendung kommt, geht es i.A. um Unm\u00f6glichkeit (unterlassene Hilfeleistung z\u00e4hlt da nicht dazu, dort geht es um Zumutbarkeit).

Im International Humanitarian Law f\u00fcr Fl\u00fcchtlinge gibt es durchaus auch Zumutbarkeitsgrenzen - diese beziehen sich z.B. darauf, dass die innere Sicherheit nicht mehr aufrechterhalten werden kann.&gt;&gt;&gt;Nun geh\u00f6rt der Artikel 16 Asylrecht zu den ersten 20 Grundgesetzartikeln, die unter dem so genannten Ewigkeitsvorbehalt stehen, das hei\u00dft, sie k\u00f6nnen nicht aufgehoben werden. Wie ist das mit Ihrer These zu vereinbaren?

&gt;&gt;Der Artikel 79, Absatz 3, die so genannte Ewigkeitsgarantie, gilt, wenn Sie genau lesen, f\u00fcr die Grunds\u00e4tze in Artikel 1 und 20, nicht 1 bis 20. Das hei\u00dft, der Artikel 16a f\u00e4llt nicht darunter, das hat das Bundesverfassungsgericht auch ausdr\u00fccklich so entschieden. Das Asylrecht kann auch abgeschafft werden.

Nun, f\u00fcr das Grundgesetz hat er recht - aber er l\u00e4sst einen ganz wichtigen Punkt aus - wir sind nicht nur durch das Grundgesetz gebunden, sondern auch durch ein ganzes Geflecht von mehr oder weniger unk\u00fcndbaren internationalen Vertr\u00e4gen (internationalem Recht), die durch die Ratifizierungen auch Gesetzescharakter haben und von uns ohne Einbeziehung von &gt;&gt;100 weiteren Staaten nicht ge\u00e4ndert werden k\u00f6nnen. Wir k\u00f6nnten sie nur brechen.&gt;Komisch nur, dass wir das einzige Land EU-weit sind, das dieses Geflecht so auslegt wie wir.

Kein EU Land legt es so aus, dass man das Asylrecht abschaffen k\u00f6nnte. Alle akzeptieren z.B. die Menschenrechtskonvention aber grunds\u00e4tzlich auch die EU-Vertr\u00e4ge.

&gt;Und mal abgesehen davon - wenn wir das jetzt nicht einhalten, kommt dann die internationale Polizei und nimmt uns fest?

Nein, aber da internationales Recht eben nicht anderes als durch Vertrauen garantiert werden kann, sch\u00e4digt man damit das internationale Recht und das Vertrauen in den Vertragspartner Deutschland. Am Ende landet man dann wieder beim old-style-Realismus und Machtpolitik, und irgendwo in der \u00c4ra vor dem zweiten Weltkrieg.Die 1300 Milliarden sind der Anteil der bereits jetzt durch die Staatskassen flie\u00dft, wie auch immer Du die im einzelnen nennen magst. Das ist die Staatsquote, ~44% vom BIP.

&gt;Das Gesamtsteuereinkommen liegt zur Zeit bei 650 Milliarden Euro. Wenn Du auf 1300 Milliarden kommen m\u00f6chtest, um diese als BGE zu verteilen, mu\u00dft Du also die Steuern verdoppeln, sprich, die, die jetzt 40% zahlen, m\u00fcssen dann 80% zahlen.

Ich m\u00f6chte keine 1300 Milliarden verteilen, das ist die Staatsquote/Staatsanteil, den wir momentan haben und den der Staat jetzt schon jedes Jahr verteilt. Und auch die 1000 Milliarden w\u00e4ren nat\u00fcrlich kein Mehraufwand - sondern der Gesamtaufwand, wenn jeder 1000 Euro im Moment BGE bek\u00e4me, der Mehraufwand w\u00fcrde wesentlich darunter liegen.

&gt;die jetzt 40% zahlen, m\u00fcssen dann 80% zahlen.

Nur als Anmerkung: Um auf &gt;40% (incl. Solidarit\u00e4tzuschlag) zu kommen, muss man als Alleinstehender 250.000 Euro / Jahr zu versteuerndes Einkommen haben.

&gt;Danach f\u00e4hrst Du s\u00e4mtliche Ausgaben, die der Staat hat auf 0 und verteilst alle Steuergelder, um jedem 1000 Euro pro Monat zu zahlen. Klingt nach einem super Plan, um den das Land zu ruinieren...

Wer sagt das denn? Ich m\u00f6chte nur ein Drittel vom BIP anders verteilen - wir verteilen ingesamt bereits einen 10% h\u00f6heren Betrag - und vieles von diesem Drittel ist da bereits drin. Wir w\u00fcrden dann insgesamt etwas mehr verteilen m\u00fcssen, aber keinesfalls derart viel mehr. Es fallen ja viele Sozialabgaben und andere Kosten weg, und wer ein hohes Einkommen hat, bezahlt mehr Steuern als er BGE bekommt. &gt;zumal ich mich jetzt frage, woher eigentlich die Aussage mit der "1 Billion Sozialleistungen pro Jahr" kommt?

1000 Milliarden sind einfach ganz stumpf: 

1000 Euro BGE * 12 Monate * 82000000 B\u00fcrger = 984 Milliarden. 

Das ist nat\u00fcrlich Quatsch da \u00fcberhaupt nichts gegengerechnet wird (und 1000 Euro je nach Gegend auch zuwenig sind). 

edit: Oder meinst Du die aktuelle Sozialleistungsquote? Dazu hab ich einen Link im anderen Kommentar - die liegt aber ein klein wenig darunter.&gt;Dann erkl\u00e4r mir mal, wie das geht. Ich lerne gerne dazu. Sch\u00e4ubles "schwarze Null" kommt ohne Neuverschuldung aus. Sprich, alle Ausgaben sind durch Einnahmen gedeckt. Die Einnahmen sind die Steuern und die liegen bei 643,6 Milliarden Euro f\u00fcr 2014.

So: 1239 Milliarden Gesamtausgaben, 1245 Milliarden Gesamteinnahmen =&gt; "schwarze Null"(https://www.destatis.de/DE/ZahlenFakten/GesellschaftStaat/OeffentlicheFinanzenSteuern/OeffentlicheFinanzen/EUHaushaltsrahmenrichtlinie/Tabellen/OeffentlicherGesamthaushalt.html)

&gt;Ja, gut ausgebildete Leute, die nichts lieber t\u00e4ten als auf noch mehr ihres Einkommens zu verzichten, um anderen das BGE zu finanzieren. Und Du meinst nicht, da\u00df die sich in ein anderes Land absetzen w\u00fcrden? Ich w\u00fcrde wahrscheinlich auswandern.

Na ja, 250,000 Euro zu versteuerndes Einkommen / Jahr sind durchaus ein sehr hohes Einkommen. Wenn man das etwas mehr besteuert, werden die weder arm, noch hauen gleich ab. 

&gt;Was hei\u00dft hier "nur"? Wie kommst Du da dran (siehe oben)?

Wie gesagt, das ist etwas ein Drittel, und 44% sind heute bereits Staatsquote.&gt;Das BIP hat nichts mit dem dem Staat zur Verf\u00fcgung stehenden Finanzvolumen zu tun sondern repr\u00e4sentier (in etwa) die Finanzkraft der gesamten Gesellschaft.

Das BIP ist nicht das Finanzvolumen, sondern die Summe all dessen, was wir in einem Jahr leisten (bzw. wenn du willst auch die Westsch\u00f6pfung, dann etwa 2700 Milliarden).

Und ich sage doch gar nicht das der Staat auf dies Zugriff hat, momentan hat er Zugriff auf etwa 1300 (genau 1250) Milliarden die im Jahr durch regul\u00e4re Haushalte flie\u00dfen - das ist der Staatsanteil. In Wirklichkeit ist es sogar noch etwas mehr. Das sind 44% des BIP.&gt;Selbst Moderatoren, die fr\u00fcher (also bevor Newsgroups) im Spiegelforum was zu sagen hatten (damals wart ihr alle nur feuchte Tr\u00e4ume eurer V\u00e4ter) werden gnadenlos runter gew\u00e4hlt.

Was willst Du uns sagen? Das Usenet/Newsnet (und auch andere BBS) ist doch "etwas" \u00e4lter als jegliches Web(-forum), ich habe es schon benutzt, als es noch \u00fcberhaupt keine Webforen und erst recht keine Webauftritte von Spiegel und Co gab...&gt;Au\u00dferdem muss man auch sagen dass \u00a73 in diesem Zusammenhang ein ziemlich Papiertiger ist. Sagt der Vermieter nicht ausdr\u00fccklich etwas wie "Ich vermiete nicht an Pack wie euch!" dann kannst du ihn sehr schwer auf \u00a73 festnageln.

Der Artikel 3 gilt auch gar nicht f\u00fcr ihn, diese Norm beschr\u00e4nkt und bestimmt den  Staat. Und mit den anderen Gesetzen wird die Auswahl nur bedingt beschr\u00e4nkt: http://www.berliner-mieterverein.de/magazin/online/mm0906/090620.htm .In meiner Kindergarten und Sandkastenzeit habe ich keinerlei Fremdenfeindlichkeit gesehen und es war ein sehr pluralistisches Umfeld. Die Gruppenbildung war v\u00f6llig unabh\u00e4ngig von der Herkunft.Baum und Maihofer - beide Vertreter der [Freiburger Thesen](https://de.wikipedia.org/wiki/Freiburger_Thesen), Baum immernoch beim Freiburger Kreis, waren keine schlechten Innenminister. Und ein ganz anderes intellektuelles Kaliber als ein de Maizi\u00e8re - aber das k\u00f6nnte man auch von vielen anderen - die politisch nicht viel besser waren - auch sagen...&gt;"dann karpfenfresse"

Sonst geht's aber noch? Dir ist klar, in welche Ideengeschichte Du Dich damit einreihst? Z.b. die Doktorarbeit eines gewissen Dr. med. Josef Mengele: "Sippenuntersuchungen bei Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumenspalte"?

edit: soviele downvotes - wirklich? Ihr findet es also okay, wenn man Menschen aufgrund eines angeborenen Fehlers "Karpfenfresse" nennt?Ich bin ja nun kein Maihofer-Fan. Aber der war wenigstens in seiner politischen Grundposition einigerma\u00dfen ertr\u00e4glich, w\u00e4hrend fast alle anderen schon grunds\u00e4tzlich recht anti-liberal waren. 

&gt;Nachtrag: Andererseits, ist es nicht erschreckend, so weit zur\u00fcck greifen zu m\u00fcssen?

Durchaus. Innenminister ist eine Rolle, die einen dazu dr\u00e4ngt weniger liberal zu werden, da man sich ja selbst als unverd\u00e4chtig und gut ansieht. Deshalb sollte man diese Rolle mit au\u00dferordentlich liberalen Politikern besetzen - traurigerweise macht man meistens genau das Gegenteil.&gt;Strangely enough, despite having one of the more liberal firearms laws in Europe and many hundreds of thousands of guns in private hands, there's very little gun violence.

Well, Austria is on rank 13 in private gun ownership - Germany on rank 15, Switzerland on rank 4... There is not much of a difference between Germany and Austria. And we also can "stand our ground" in Germany - we are not obliged to a "sch\u00e4ndliche Flucht" (~ disreputable flight). And there not even proportionality, but only stark misproportion (e.g. you can't shoot at children which steal cherry, you can't shoot at a drunk insulting you), else you are only obliged to use the least harming means available to stop the attack.

(http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-srv/special/nation/gun-homicides-ownership/table/)The number you quote, is the number of applications in 2014. If you count all refugees, asylees, asylum seekers, ... then their number was 629,000 at the end of 2014.

(Die Gesamtzahl der so gez\u00e4hlten Fl\u00fcchtlinge mit unterschiedlichen Aufenthaltsstatus in Deutschland, mit und ohne rechtliche Anerkennung, sank von \u00fcber eine Million im Jahr 1997 auf etwa 629 000 im Jahr 2014. - http://dip21.bundestag.de/dip21/btd/18/058/1805862.pdf)

For most of your other numbers, I don't even know what they mean, most of them are pretty useless, because they don't clearly define the populations.

edit: You also use the number of suspects and not the number of convicts - this could lead to huge errors."Asylbewerber" are probably people which applied for asylum in the statistics period - if they are first applicants, and what this number exactly means, needs a further definition, in particular also which types of asylum/protection are meant.Hier geht es um einen angeborenen Fehler, der f\u00fcr die eugenischen Phantasien der Nazis durchaus eine Rolle gespielt hat und der zu starker Diskriminierung gef\u00fchrt hat - zum Gl\u00fcck f\u00fcr diese Menschen wurden sie nicht komplett als "unwertes Leben" betrachtet. Aus den Lebensbornheimen wurden Betroffene ausselektiert und zumindest einige auch ermordet. Was mit den anderen geschah, wei\u00df man nicht so genau...

Ich sehe da durchaus einen Unterschied. Jemanden aufgrund eines solchen "Fehlers" "Karpfenfresse" zu nennen ist v\u00f6llig daneben. Sackgesicht hat nat\u00fcrlich in einer politischen Diskussion auch absolut nichts zu suchen, ist aber eine recht normale Beleidigung.&gt;&gt;The number you quote, is the number of applications in 2014.

&gt;Applicants, according to the text.

Yeah, but who are those? People currently stuck in the application process? I don't think they mean those in the stats, they at least include accepted applicants (edit: but as stated not including refugees). I don't know what exactly they mean at all. If you want to use those numbers, you have to ask them.

On page 153, they explain others e.g. as: "Der Begriff \u201eSonstige\u201c umfasst eine heterogene Restgruppe, z.B. Erwerbslose, nicht anerkannte Asylbewerber mit Duldung, Fl\u00fcchtlinge, Besucher und andere Personengruppen"

The EU numbers you used are clearly defined in another way (also because of EU-standardization, Germany has at least 4 different kinds of protection - asylees defined by German law are only a very small group). 

&gt;I'm citing another data source. If you want to see what the populations are, check the data.

I checked the data and I wanted to calculate some of those things some time ago - it's not possible with those available numbers.

&gt;Possibly. I didn't bother using error bars either. But the parsimonious assumption is proportionality - you would need evidence to suggest that there's a difference.

It is very likely that there is a difference in the number of suspect for crimes committed by somebody settled and somebody who is on the move. The first one is probably much easier to identify by the victim or witnesses, and thus the number of suspects is lower.It's the same here. We fundamentally have no proportionality in Germany for self-defense. You have to use the mildest means available to securely end the attack. Proportionality is only for stark misproportion - e.g. you can't shoot somebody, also if it's the only way to stop him insulting you.

The article of the StGB just states:

&gt;&gt;Self-defence

&gt;&gt;(1) A person who commits an act in self-defence does not act unlawfully.

&gt;&gt;(2) Self-defence means any defensive action that _is necessary_ to avert an _imminent_ unlawful attack on oneself or another.Well, that's not possible. Greece could only voluntarily leave the EU - but not the Euro-Zone, the Euro is - intentionally - a one way road.You should show him this: http://www.theguardian.com/news/datablog/2015/sep/18/angela-merkel-10-years-germany-chancellor-economy-cdu

It's debatable how much of that happened because of Merkel - but in her time, German fundamentals developed in an excellent way. In addition to that, Germany got to the second best soft-power rank (http://softpower30.portland-communications.com/ranking), and became a much more influential and involved international player not only in Europe but in global affairs. 

And you could also look at her ranking there - 2010/11 was as "bad" as now.Yeah, the graph here (you must add the two more months) http://www.theguardian.com/news/datablog/2015/sep/18/angela-merkel-10-years-germany-chancellor-economy-cdu shows, that she already had such a "bad" ranking once before. And it's not drawn in a way, that make 49% look like it's a small value.Sure, the whole Greece debate was fueled by such irrational demands, instead of debating the actually available options and thinking to the end what each of those would mean. 

And yeah, for the refugee crisis it's about the same. It's pretty awful to read all these demands, which are practically or legally impossible. And with legally impossible I mean, that any democratic German government would never ever break those laws - not even a CSU with an absolute majority.

Most of those things are only demanded by people, who are in the cozy position, of not being in power, and being able to use such deceiving populism. This is e.g. for the people demanding open-borders but also for the people demanding a fence/wall or violation of international law. Requiescat in pace. M\u00f6gen die Mentholzigaretten im Jenseits an den B\u00e4umen wachsen.RIP. In particular interesting for this sub is his last great speech: https://www.spd.de/scalableImageBlob/23344/data/20111204_speech_schmidt-data.pdf - "Germany in and with and for Europe"Die hat Helmut Schmidt noch nie gebraucht. Genauso wie Absprachen mit Terroristen war das Rauchen nicht verhandelbar.I hope this is not too long then: http://www.nytimes.com/2015/11/11/world/europe/helmut-schmidt-assertive-west-german-chancellor-dies-at-96.html?_r=0No, just a few big companies do that. &gt;You're giving an emotional argument here, and emotions are never a good way to run a country or an economy.
&gt;So again, how can this benefit us?

What is a benefit is a purely moral and emotional question. I benefit from helping people, you might not. 

All politics is based in ethics, morality and emotions.

&gt;So what you are saying is that we should priortise our needs second even though our government's job is to put our needs first? &gt;We elect governments to further our best interests.

The states interest of the EU is to "The Union's aim is to promote peace, its values and the well-being of its peoples." - in a balanced way, but in this order.

&gt;Why isn't this being treated as it should be treated - like charity where taking one family is something we are doing out of goodness and should be enough if we say it's enough.

Because we decided after the second world war, that we have to help refugees and that it shouldn't be charity anymore but mandatory. We didn't want something like Evian ever happen again - "The world seemed to be divided into two parts \u2013 those places where the Jews could not live and those where they could not enter." 

"At stake at Evian were both human lives \u2013 and the decency and self-respect of the civilized world. If each nation at Evian had agreed on that day to take in 17,000 Jews at once, every Jew in the Reich could have been saved. As one American observer wrote, 'It is heartbreaking to think of the ...desperate human beings ... waiting in suspense for what happens at Evian. But the question they underline is not simply humanitarian ... it is a test of civilization.'" Walter Mondale

Civilization shouldn't fail again.I benefit from being able to look in the mirror everyday and not seeing an asshole, who doesn't help people in need. And I benefit from not having to know that people suffer, while we could help them without even giving up much for it.Sick and old people are also a burden. That's not an argument, and in no way realist like you claim it to be. This is an ethical decision. 

&gt;I was thinking more along the lines of 200k full stop and then we take no more. 500k is quite a lot to feed, house, educate, police, provide healthcare to etc. especially since we've some of our own people to take care of who are in desperate poverty.

We could and should also help those people. It's bullshit to count that against each other, because we also didn't help them when there were no refugees. This was and is also a decision we took. Europe is by far rich enough, to have no extreme poverty.5 Billion is a pretty small sum compared to our GDPs and on what else we spent money. It is about 1/3500 of our GDP. 

&gt;Any money used on refugees is less money to help our poor.

This is bullshit. If we want to spent enough money on the poor is just a decision. We could easily finance both, if we would make it our goal.Yes, but more people can generate more wealth, by demand and by production. For example by demand - all the money that now stays in Germany and is used for refugees, generates wealth there, instead of going abroad. And even if only a fraction of the refugees work, they'll also generate wealth. 

Wealth is not a finite resource in the sense you mean. Wealth is generated and destroyed all the time. And with changing the parameters - e.g. letting refugees in - as well the generation and destruction of wealth will also change - so the amount of wealth will clearly not stay the same, and even less at the same location.Sure there is a legal force. If they finally got refuge in another EU country, they can't get it in Germany anymore, and according to most immigration members' laws, they also don't get a Schengen Visa, but have to stay in their country or even county of refuge. They'll get a refugee passport, but that only allows them to travel, not to settle. So them going to Germany is illegal. And they also won't get any benefits there.Many of them also from the Balkan itself. In Greece about 750,000-800,000 arrived this year, in Italy about 150,000. Some were already there. Not all of them came to Germany. So a significant part is from the Balkans itself (this is also reflected by the stats e.g. from the BAMF).&gt;I would myself support helping migrants and think Estonia, for example, is capable of housing a few hundred easily, but I'd refuse any forceful placements, even a single one. That's just one area I'd never trust Brussels in and would not want to give away our sovereignity.

This is all part of the EU treaties. Even a common asylum policy already is. It is just not completely implemented so far. And it is referring to the international conventions, that make the sheltering of refugees mandatory. All our countries decided to give up sovereignty in this respect to the EU with ratifying the Lisbon treaties.Don't be so angry :) And not I am saying you must help, the treaties you signed, say we must help - together. As they also say, that we must help your countries. 

And this is not so much about money - we can easily pay that - in the end, if it is financed mostly by the EU, it's the more wealthy countries that will pay for it - I have no objections against that. I don't even have objections, that Eastern Europe say, we are more homogeneous societies, we have another history and it is more difficult for us to integrate foreigners, so we'll take less for a restricted period of time. And if you like to, you can do a policy like Germany had it in the past, refugees treated clearly as guests for a restricted time without integration - some treaties must be changed for that, but it is possible (I don't think it would be a good idea). But I have objections against them saying, we just don't like this part of the treaty, but we demand that all others are fulfilled. At least they should show some solidarity, as the treaty also clearly demands.Demand is also generating wealth. Every refugee taken in needs something to eat, clothes, housing. Producing these things generates wealth. And likely not all that wealth will be balanced by less generation in another place. Please define benefits then, and please try it without ethics, emotions and morality^1. Then I could give you an answer. 

^1 I think you can't. All political goals are emotional, ethical, moral. Their can't be "objectivity" in those. Most of us think war is bad, other people thought it is good and necessary to bring out the best of mankind.We not only have Dublin (btw. you oversimplified it, it is not always the entry country, but for Estonia it is mostly correct), but also the TFEU article 78-80, in particular 78(1), 78(3), 80. 78(3) and 80 are important for such a situation like now, Dublin is more for business like usual, not for huge inflows.

Let me quote the important ones:

__Art. 78__

_1.The Union shall develop a common policy on asylum, subsidiary protection and temporary protection with a view to offering appropriate status to any third-country national requiring international protection and ensuring compliance with the principle of non-refoulement. This policy must be in accordance with the Geneva Convention of 28 July 1951 and the Protocol of 31 January 1967 relating to the status of refugees, and other relevant treaties._

_2. For the purposes of paragraph 1, the European Parliament and the Council, acting in accordance with the_ __ordinary legislative procedure__, _shall adopt measures for a common European asylum system comprising:_

 [...]

_3. In the event of one or more Member States being_ __confronted with an emergency situation characterised by a sudden inflow of nationals of third countries__, _the Council, on a proposal from the Commission, may adopt provisional measures for the benefit of the  ember State(s) concerned. It shall act after consulting the European Parliament._

__Art. 80__

_The policies of the Union set out in this Chapter and their implementation shall be governed by the principle of solidarity and fair sharing of responsibility, including its financial implications, between the Member States. Whenever necessary, the acts of the Union adopted pursuant to this Chapter shall contain appropriate measures to give effect to this principle._I could also call them an "unnecessary burden". That it is necessary is because of a moral judgement (I am not saying this judgement is "wrong"). But please accept that  your position on refugees is also a decision based on a moral judgement/ethics/emotions.National legislation doesn't matter, the EU-treaties are national law, and above that binding to the outside according to the Vienna Convention on the Law of Treaties to the outside, no matter if they are legal or illegal internally. And no, they don't conflict with another part of the treaties, and they are not vague. They clearly say, that the EU is responsible and has to adopt legislation for the points named in 78(2) (sorry forgot to link it, here: http://www.lisbon-treaty.org/wcm/the-lisbon-treaty/treaty-on-the-functioning-of-the-european-union-and-comments/part-3-union-policies-and-internal-actions/title-v-area-of-freedom-security-and-justice/chapter-2-policies-on-border-checks-asylum-and-immigration/346-article-78.html ) and that it can be done by ordinary legislation.&gt;I asked the questions already - the only two questions that matter.

&gt;How can taking refugees improve the economy?

I think they might (and depending on how you measure the improvement of the economy, they surely will), but that's the wrong question - would you also ask: how can taking care of elderly and sick improve the economy?

&gt;How can taking refugees improve our infrastructure?

Same here. 

&gt;These are things that can be measured without ethics.

What's a bettering of the economy is a highly ethical question. Is a balanced economy, without poverty but a little bit smaller GDP better than a little bit higher GDP? Is the production of things becoming obsolete short after, bettering the economy, because you always can produce new things and the numbers will rise? &gt;You could call them that, but you would be wrong. Pensions do not negatively affect the economy because it is not free money, it has been paid into.

No, pensions - no matter what system you take, are always relying on the productivity and generation of wealth by the currently working people.

&gt;My position is based purely on the tangible benefits of unskilled non-EEA immigration to our economy and infrastructure of which there is none. There is tangible negative actually.

This is a moral judgement - you say that having a better economy and infrastructure is more important than helping those people. A "better" economy is nothing as such good or evil - this is a moral/ideological/ethical definition.&gt;No, it isn't. There are empirical measures of what is a good and bad economy.

Yes, if you take particular factors, you'll get some numbers. And that you call Greece bad and Germany good in respect to the economy, is because they have a similar moral basis and Greece is performing worse in relation to that. I could also look at other factors and demand a sustainable economy with a high level of equality - then both fail. Or I take the Gross Domestic Happyness as a scale like Bhutan - I would again get other numbers.

&gt;Yes, the pension system is a Ponzi scheme but it is not free. I am paying my grandmothers pension right now, and my grandchildren will pay mine etc. etc. you are simply being paid back with interest for what you've paid in, it's not charity.

I could also say, we have treaties/rules to help refugees, so helping refugees is no charity. And that asking for the "real profit" is just wrong, because the profit is primarily an ethical and no economic one. Asking about the economic benefit of Human Rights is an important question in political and economical science, but it is not the significant point about Human Rights. Even if a slave market or killing the poor would be most profitable, most of us would reject the idea - for moral reasons.Well, you don't get my point. I am just saying, that this is not an economical question, even if economic factors might be important. This is a moral/ethical decision, and we should be so honest, to say that. Like it was our decision, that we have just a little bit more wealth, and didn't eradicate world hunger ling ago. Sure you have to factor-in the economy - but economical policy is like all political instruments an instrument to further some ethical/ideological political goal. There is no objective good or bad. If you define "awful" goals, they'll stay awful, even they're done very efficient. We define things as bad and good.

And yes, counter concepts like a gross domestic happiness are important to see, that another ethical basis leads to other view of those things and probably to other conclusions.

&gt;comparing not taking refugees to slavery.

I didn't compare these. I said, that economic policy can't be fundamentally realist, but is always working on a particular ethical base. It is a gross case to show that. We think that having property is good. We think that people get an income related to their work is good. We think that our own people should get enough to eat, that they don't starve, some think that should be the case for all people. We think being rich is good. We think having slaves is not good. We think killing the poor and "useless" is not good. We think sick people should get help. Nothing of that is "objective". It is all ethical.&gt;Economic growth is objective.

Yes. But that you say it is good, is not. The "Club of Rome" won't call an economy that is built on constant growth good. It is just another number.

&gt;Listen, my friend you keep appealing to emotion

I am not appealing to emotions - and my point of view isn't important here. This is about a fundamental misunderstanding on your side. Yes, the numbers are objective - but the scale we apply to them, is ethical/moral/ideological.

&gt; - and it doesn't work, I'm an incredibly cold, heartless and business minded individual.

Oh, you are not. You have some pretty strong ethical compass, you just deny it. You want numbers to judge if what happens will be good for you ideological/ethical point of view.

&gt;We can argue about right and wrong all day but it's meaningless 

The numbers are meaningless without defining right and wrong.&gt;Anyway, the point here is if there are two colliding acts, then usually the more concrete one would be followed. That's a general rule with the continental law system.

They are not really directly colliding, and I am not speaking about the EU laws, but about the Lisbon-Treaties itself. They can both be fully in force. The international one is, when it is signed and if necessary ratified, and the constitution is to the inside - nothing of both is stronger. This could lead to very big problems. If other states have no reason to doubt it, e.g. a treaty signed by a president of a country is fully binding, even if it is violating the laws and constitution and he wasn't allowed to sign it. Only if it is before the signature more or less obvious to the other parties illegal internally, it is invalid.

&gt;I really don't see any specific points there, they are vague.

It is not vague at all, for which points the EU got the sovereignty from the member states:

_2. For the purposes of paragraph 1, the European Parliament and the Council, acting in accordance with the ordinary legislative procedure, shall adopt measures for a common European asylum system comprising:_

_(a) a uniform status of asylum for nationals of third countries, valid throughout the Union;_

_(b) a uniform status of subsidiary protection for nationals of third countries who, without obtaining European asylum, are in need of international protection;_

_(c) a common system of temporary protection for displaced persons in the event of a massive inflow;_

_(d) common procedures for the granting and withdrawing of uniform asylum or subsidiary protection status;_

_(e) criteria and mechanisms for determining which Member State is responsible for considering an application for asylum or subsidiary protection;_

_(f) standards concerning the conditions for the reception of applicants for asylum or subsidiary protection;_

_(g) partnership and cooperation with third countries for the purpose of managing inflows of people applying for asylum or subsidiary or temporary protection._

_3. In the event of one or more Member States being confronted with an emergency situation characterised by a sudden inflow of nationals of third countries, the Council, on a proposal from the Commission, may adopt provisional measures for the benefit of the  ember State(s) concerned. It shall act after consulting the European Parliament._

(http://www.lisbon-treaty.org/wcm/the-lisbon-treaty/treaty-on-the-functioning-of-the-european-union-and-comments/part-3-union-policies-and-internal-actions/title-v-area-of-freedom-security-and-justice/chapter-2-policies-on-border-checks-asylum-and-immigration/346-article-78.html)

(e) is Dublin. Most of the other points are still not implemented - but the EU has to and has the sovereignty to do all this by regular legislation.It is probably him: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RdhVSZh7QN0 

It has a vmax of &gt;100 km/hHe modified the gearing and also the brake system.He has a "100" sticker at the back - if it is the official one, the trailer is licensed for 100 km/h - so it is one of the exceptions.Did you just confuse Europe/Germany with the US? We have these discussions all the time here and we don't care much about political correctness. Article is from "Oct. 8, 2015, 10:42 AM" - also on /r/Europe today with many upvotes. That's odd.The German "Bild" had to do that in multiple cases, and it didn't help. http://farm1.static.flickr.com/59/189905178_7f1cbd4b2e.jpg (The bold text is a counter statement on the title page)Not all European states are secular and the UK, and in particular England even still has a state religion.

From Wikipedia: 

_United Kingdom - The Church of England is the established state religion of England, but there is no established church in Northern Ireland, Scotland, and Wales. Two Archbishops and 24 senior diocesan Bishops of the Church of England have seats in the House of Lords (the Lords Spiritual) and they can and do participate in debates and vote in divisions, which involve decisions affecting the entire United Kingdom. Parliament is opened with prayers, in the House of Lords usually led by one of the Lords Spiritual and in the Commons by the Speaker's chaplain. The full term for the expression of the Crown's sovereignty via legislation is the Crown-in-Parliament-under-God. At the coronation, The King or Queen is anointed with consecrated oil by the Archbishop of Canterbury in a service at Westminster Abbey and must swear to maintain the Laws of God and the True profession of the Gospel, maintain in the United Kingdom the Protestant Reformed Religion established by law and to maintain and preserve inviolable the settlement of the Church of England, and the doctrine, worship, discipline, and government thereof, as by law established in England. Thus though the Church of Ireland is no longer established and the Church of England has been disestablished in Wales to the Church in Wales, the Crown is still bound to protect Protestantism in general in the whole of the United Kingdom by the Coronation Oath and the Bill of Rights, and to protect the Church of Scotland by the Act of Union. All Members of Parliament must declare their allegiance to the Queen in order to take their seat, although it is for the individual MP to decide whether to do so by swearing a religious oath or making a solemn affirmation._

(https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Secular_state#Ambiguous_states)Germany and Finland are also not completely secular. For some other states it is disputable, because it doesn't happen that clear in law, but in action and in statements.

But if we look at it a bit closer, I think even the majority of the European states give religious entities particular privileges and a distinct treatment from non-religious entities. France with its laicism is probably one of the only fully secular states in Europe.Until Russia stops to break international law in Crimea. This cannot only be "healed" by giving it back (which is very unlikely and not possible for a Russian leader, not even for Putin, without losing his job, and would lead to an enormous unrest in Crimea), but also by a settlement with Ukraine. If Russia and Ukraine make a treaty about Crimea, the ongoing violation of international law, which is the reason for the sanctions, will also end.

Probably not even Poroshenko wants Crimea back or thinks this is possible. What both sides here need, is a solution which they can presented at home as a win - for Russia this will probably be Crimea becoming a real and international accepted part of Russia (and the end of the sanction, but that will never be openly mentioned, because it will look like a defeat) and for Ukraine getting some kind of restitution and protection for former citizens, and don't having to take Crimea back (which would be mostly a burden by now - not only economically, but also politically and socially).

For the outside world this would be easily acceptable - Europe doesn't care much about Crimea being Russian or Ukrainian - it is about the way Putin took it, in the end most of Europe wants some kind of partnership with Russia back. With a new referendum and a treaty the sanctions which were there, would've been already enough of a "punishment" to satisfy all of Western, and most of Eastern Europe.Das ist auch schlicht falsch. Saudi Arabien hat momentan den Vorsitz _der Expertengruppe_ (diese hat 5-Mitglieder und k\u00fcmmert sich um die Auswahl von Experten in den betroffenen L\u00e4ndern) des Menschenrechtsrates der UN. Dem Menschenrechtsrat sitzt f\u00fcr dieses Jahr turnusgem\u00e4\u00df als Vertreter der westlichen Staatengruppe Deutschland vor. Saudi Arabien hatte eine Bewerbung f\u00fcr 2016 anvisiert, allerdings nach einem Stimmingstest auch gleich wieder zur\u00fcckgezogen.

Also nur ein sehr kleiner wahrer Kern.Ach, die UN ist zwar recht unbeachtet, aber ingesamt hat sie, f\u00fcr eine Organisation die auf Wohlwollen der Mitglieder und Freiwilligkeit setzen muss, doch viel erreicht. Z.B. alleine die Millenium Development Goals haben das Leben von hunderten von  Millionen gerettet und von Milliarden verbessert, die gerade von fast allen Staaten der Erde beschlossenen sehr ambitionierten Nachhaltigen Entwicklungsziele f\u00fcr 2030 werden hoffentlich noch mehr erreichen.

(https://sustainabledevelopment.un.org/post2015/transformingourworld)

_Sustainable Development Goals_ (f\u00fcr 2030)

_Goal 1. End poverty in all its forms everywhere_

_Goal 2. End hunger, achieve food security and improved nutrition and promote sustainable agriculture_

_Goal 3. Ensure healthy lives and promote well-being for all at all ages_

_Goal 4. Ensure inclusive and equitable quality education and promote lifelong learning opportunities for all_

_Goal 5. Achieve gender equality and empower all women and girls_

_Goal 6. Ensure availability and sustainable management of water and sanitation for all_

_Goal 7. Ensure access to affordable, reliable, sustainable and modern energy for all_

_Goal 8. Promote sustained, inclusive and sustainable economic growth, full and productive employment and decent work for all_

_Goal 9. Build resilient infrastructure, promote inclusive and sustainable industrialization and foster innovation_

_Goal 10. Reduce inequality within and among countries_

_Goal 11. Make cities and human settlements inclusive, safe, resilient and sustainable_

_Goal 12. Ensure sustainable consumption and production patterns_

_Goal 13. Take urgent action to combat climate change and its impacts*_

_Goal 14. Conserve and sustainably use the oceans, seas and marine resources for sustainable development_

_Goal 15. Protect, restore and promote sustainable use of terrestrial ecosystems, sustainably manage forests, combat desertification, and halt and reverse land degradation and halt biodiversity loss_

_Goal 16. Promote peaceful and inclusive societies for sustainable development, provide access to justice for all and build effective, accountable and inclusive institutions at all levels_

_Goal 17. Strengthen the means of implementation and revitalize the global partnership for sustainable development_Oh, und was sagt es aus, wenn man einen Schal so tr\u00e4gt, dass er auch w\u00e4rmhalt und nicht nur als nutzloser Lappen da rumbaumelt? Und wenn es dann gar noch ein dunkelbunter Kufiya oder ein schwarzer Wollschal ist? Finde mich da nicht wieder :(

(Btw. ich habe schon ein paar Krawatten-beinahe-Unf\u00e4lle miterlebt - mit diesen Schals ist das Risiko noch viel h\u00f6her - fast alles Kandidaten f\u00fcr den Darwinaward...)Well, who studied medicine at Damascus university can get it recognized in Germany, and the level seems to be on-par.

&gt;I've worked with developing world electrical engineers who could not do basic calculus, which is completely insane. I don't understand how they were able to even finish one course successfully in uni.

And how is this related to Syria? Syria had pretty high standards of education. Iranians not only come to Europe highly educated, their children keep that up. Iranian immigrants in Germany finish even more often secondary and tertiary education than Germans, which is pretty remarkable compared to other immigrant groups.It's the minimum, also in Germany. The Bachelors studies which are typically leading to Masters studies, tend to have a shorter duration, than the ones being a full education on themselves. E.g. for Universities of Applied Sciences 7-8 semesters (as long as the old diploma) are more typical than 6.The most open generation of immigrants was mostly the first generation, and where we see some fundamentalism developing is sometimes in the second, but more often in the third generation. They don't learn that from their parents. This fundamentalism is primarily not brought to Germany or France, it mostly developed here.

And well, you should also consider, which parents our leading generations had - those were often in no way better than those parents. The law for condemnation of violence in the education of children came just in 2000 (and not without big debates), the last criminal law particular for homosexuals was removed just in 1994.Well, I grew up in my early childhood with immigrants - they were always integrated pretty well, and even while they had less good chances than me, now 30 years later, most of them found their place in our society, most of them are part of the non-academic middle class. 

Why did this work? Because I lived in a smaller industrial town in a pretty open but square region of Germany, because already their parents were welcomed here, because it were many different nationalities in the quarter and not just one , and partially also because we don't have significant unemployment here.
I don't know how they count the employment rate - but your numbers clearly doesn't fit for a current unemployment quota in Germany of 6,2%. This graph: http://www.bpb.de/nachschlagen/zahlen-und-fakten/soziale-situation-in-deutschland/61724/ausgewaehlte-arbeitslosenquoten-i shows it better.

And well, how many basic workers we need, also depends on how many qualified workers we can get to create jobs, and we clearly don't have enough of them. For my state and region, e.g. the Bosnian refugees in the 1990's probably lowered and not raised the overall unemployment quota, because they partially filled this gap.Well, I hear this whining about automation and robots killing jobs since the 1980's. And it didn't happen. ( http://www.voxeu.org/sites/default/files/image/FromApr2012/krebs%20fig1%2019%20sep.png (unemployment according to OECD standard, Germany, 2015  it is even lower, ~ on the level of 1975).

Old jobs were gone and new came. And we got more productive, and could work much less. People always forgot to take that great achievement into account in particular for Germany, who has the lowest annual working hours of all OECD countries - Germany has a very high productivity and alone since the 1990's we achieved to work 200 hours a years less, 300 hours and nearly 25% less than the OECD average or the US, while raising the standards of living. I can't see that's a bad development. (https://stats.oecd.org/Index.aspx?DataSetCode=ANHRS#)
We know why. Because they in some regions and in particular in some big cities they were pushed out of the society, and tried to find something of their own. In my region - with full employment, no real ghettos, but some poorer quarters in which all nationalities live together, we have nearly none of these problems.

This is for "normal" traditionalism. For extremism the reasons are different - this seems to be more like a youth culture to me. One of the worst we ever had.Well, I lived in a town of about the same size in Baden-W\u00fcrttemberg. It's not like everything went completely flawless - but we never had those problems on a large scale. We never had real Muslim "ghettos" - the "ghetto" I grew up in, was a mix of Germans, Turks, Yugoslavs, Italians, Portuguese, ... We had also some smaller problems with youth gangs - but all of those were interreligious and interethnic. A bit later we got some trouble with immigrants (and we still have, and get more with their now teenage and young adult children), with the fraction of ethnic Germans from eastern Europe, which came late, which didn't get good support in particular in education and language, and which were housed in "ghettos". At the same time, the ones in the smaller villages around without "ghettos", and with more interaction and support by the German population, integrated very well.&gt;Does the fact that a well-regulated militia is no longer required -- because the US now has a standing army -- mean the right to bear arms is no longer protected? Doesn't "well-regulated militia" mean that you can't just give guns to anyone who wants them -- they have to be properly trained to fight as a disciplined militia? 

_A well regulated militia being necessary to the security of a free state, the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed._

Well, the US has numerous _well-regulated militias_ (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Militia_(United_States)#Organized_militia), probably more than any other country. And even in a narrow interpretation, I can't see, that _the people_ here means each and every person, but the complete people as such, e.g. in the national guards in difference to the army. &gt;Unless you are a hunter or you protect a cash transport (or anything where a gun is necessary to protect yourself), there is absolutely NO reason for a private person to own a gun.

Those people are allowed to carry guns, many more are allowed to own guns.

&gt;A gun is a device primarily designed to kill individuals and animals and should always be treated as that. I'd rather have people not being able to collect guns or persue shooting as a sports, than risking such a killing device falling into the wrong hands.

Well, we allow that in Germany and it doesn't make much troubles. You shouldn't forget, that Germany is also a highly armed country - we own about a third of the weapons / capita compared to the US. We just have more strict regulations on how to deal with those guns.Germans are still on place 15 worldwide with 30 firearms / 100 citizens. 
&gt;Almost 1000 people die each day in car crashes. Should we ban driving?

Around 90 people die every year by traffic accidents in the US. And about 90 gun related deaths (including suicides) happen every day in the US. Both numbers are much too high compared to Germany, and sure something should be done about it.

Nobody demands to ban guns or to ban driving. Guns are not banned in Germany, and Germany is anything but a gun free zone. It is on rank 15 world wide in guns owned by citizens, with 30 guns/100 citizens.&gt; A lot of people think this is outragous, but its the main reason its in the constitution... Guns give you security against the government itself. They have to take you more seriously if you can fire back. Theoretically, this is a check on government power.

This is not in the constitution. In the constitution is that _the people_ must be allowed to own guns, like in well-regulated militias, not that every citizen is allowed to own or even carry a gun.

But you forgot one point pro-point, which I would sign - in some regions it is very reasonable to have a gun to protect oneself against dangerous animals.Probably less than one might think, I'm not sure. But e.g. Switzerland and Germany have about the same rate of suicide, Switzerland has a much higher quota committed with guns, because the availability is much higher there.&gt;Given that, the Second Amendment could be said to apply only to members of the states' National Guards, or to all able-bodied men between the ages of 17 and 45, or both, or -- because the text doesn't explicitly say that the right to bear arms should only apply to the militia, only that the need for a militia is the reason -- everyone.

It says explicitly the people, and not every citizen, every adult or every man. This is pretty clear for me. No matter how it is interpreted in a reasonable way, it never means everyone. And that not even in the NRA interpretation - they don't include children, insane people and so on. While this sentence might've been meant different, a restriction to only people with military training, available or organized in militias, would still fully comply with this paragraph. It wouldn't infringe the right _of the people_, but just the right of many individual citizens.Vor allen Dingen sind auch die Definitionen ganz verschieden. Wenn man z.B. nach Bi- oder Homosexualit\u00e4t fragt, dann inkludiert man z.B. bei weitem nicht alle M\u00e4nner-die-Sex-mit-M\u00e4nnern haben, sich aber dennoch aufgrund des Rollenmodells als heterosexuell definieren.&gt;Ich w\u00fcrde es eher unter "moralischer Sache" abstempeln, da sich der "Nutzen" solcher Programme halt eher schwierig bestimmen l\u00e4sst [da d\u00fcrfen sich dann wieder irgendwelche Experten ihre Statistiken aus dem Arsch ziehen]. Es ist keine Autobahn von der man genau absch\u00e4tzen kann wie viele Autos diese nutzen k\u00f6nnen usw. ;-)

"Moralische Sache" klingt etwas sonderbar - dies ist schlicht Grundwertschutz. Der Schutz von Minderheiten und die Vertretung von Minderheiten durch die Regierung ist fundamental f\u00fcr unser Staatsmodell.  

Und das ist etwas das nicht nur die Minderheit betrifft, sondern die gesamte Gesellschaft, die Kosten auf die Anzahl der betroffenen Minderheit umzurechnen ist nicht nur sehr schwierig, sondern schlicht falsch. 

Selbst mit einer rein neo-liberalen, komplett moralfreien Herangehensweise, m\u00fcsste man ganz anderes Rechnen - n\u00e4mlich wieviel kann durch Verminderung der gesamtwirtschaftlichen Sch\u00e4den eingespart werden und wieviel produktiver wird die Gesellschaft durch Akzeptanzma\u00dfnahmen?

&gt;Naja, Umfragen und Statistiken gibt es zu jedem Thema und anonym kann man sie auch gestalten. Da sollte es eigentlich keine Probleme mit der Akzeptanz geben.

Das gibt Riesenprobleme, da man noch nicht einmal eine einheitliche Definitionen der Ph\u00e4nomene hat. Au\u00dferdem \u00e4ndert die Anonymit\u00e4t nichts an pers\u00f6nlichen Selbstdefinitionen und Rollenmodellen,  z.B. sehen sich viele M\u00e4nner-die-Sex-mit-M\u00e4nnern, nicht als homo- oder bisexuell.F\u00fcr ein Akzeptanzprogramm an der h\u00f6heren Akzeptanz in der Gesellschaft. Was auch immer man als Parameter daf\u00fcr verwendet, die Anzahl der LGBT ist keiner.

Die Anzahl der LGBT ist wichtig f\u00fcr die Frage, ob man ein solches Programm \u00fcberhaupt machen sollte. Daf\u00fcr ist es aber egal, ob es 1%, 3%, 5% oder 15%, das ist alles ein relevanter Teil der Gesellschaft und wenn dieser Teil diskriminiert wird, muss man dagegen Ma\u00dfnahmen ergreifen. 

Wenn man die Ausgaben unbedingt auf eine Kopfzahl umrechnen will, dann bitte auf alle Mitglieder der Gesellschaft oder auf die Anzahl an Homophoben.Richtig, entweder m\u00fcsste man die Gesamtgesellschaft, den nicht LGBT-Teil der Gesellschaft, oder die Anzahl an Homophoben als Grundlage nehmen, und nicht die Anzahl der LGBT. Wenn man weiss (und das ist der Fall), dass es eine signifikante Anzahl an LGBT gibt, spielt deren genaue Anzahl \u00fcberhaupt keine Rolle.Den Bedarf erzeugen und ben\u00f6tigen aber nicht LGBT, sondern Homophobe. Wenn man jemanden z\u00e4hlen m\u00fcsste, dann diese. Wenn ein relevanter Anteil der Bev\u00f6lkerung unter Diskriminierung leidet, muss diese beseitigt werden, das Problem dieser Bev\u00f6lkerungsgruppe zuzuschieben ist v\u00f6llig daneben.&gt;Ich habe eh nie verstanden was diese politischen Aktionen gegen Diskriminierung bringen sollen. Ich finde es diskriminierend wenn auf dem CSD Tunten rumspringen und das als das Prototyp des Schwulen r\u00fcberkommt.

Richtig, das sehe ich auch als recht problematisch, hier wird nur wieder ein weiteres Rollenmodell zementiert, statt schlicht von dem ganzen Klumbatsch endlich wegzukommen. Das hat denke ich prim\u00e4r historische Gr\u00fcnde, die Homosexuellen wurden f\u00fcr ein Jahrhundert in ein solches Rollenmodell gedr\u00e4ngt, und haben dann angefangen sich als Gruppe zur Wehr zu setzen. Mit der alten Idee von der sexuellen Befreiung, wo schlicht solche Gruppenmodelle und Rollenmodellen verschwinden sollten, hat das nicht viel zu tun. Ich hab doch nichts gegen Tunten oder Transen - ich finde es nur nicht besonders f\u00f6rderlich, wenn man eine von 2 Schubladen, die es fr\u00fcher gab, jetzt durch 10 kleinere ersetzt, aber immer noch in Schubladen denkt und immer noch Personen ganz prim\u00e4r durch ein Stereotyp von ihrer Sexualit\u00e4t definiert, insofern diese Personen nicht heterosexuell sind. &gt;Aber insgesamt ging es mir auch nicht darum ein Verfahren vorzuschlagen, sondern anzumerken, dass hier reine Polemik betrieben wird, wenn der AfD unterstellt wird ein "Schwulen-Register" f\u00fchren zu wollen.

Das werfe ich der AfD \u00fcberhaupt nicht vor. Was ich hier sehe ist eine Art von Hetze gegen LGBT, nach dem Motto: "Schaut mal wie viel Geld wir f\u00fcr die/wegen der paar abartigen Dekadenten wieder bezahlen m\u00fcssen. Und wir kriegen nichts, dabei sind wir das Volk und nicht die. "

&gt;Antidiskriminierungs-Programm: 5% der B\u00fcrger sehen eine Verbesserung von 100% (LQBT), 95% sehen eine Verbesserung um 10%. Damit haben wir einen Nutzen f\u00fcr die gesamte Bev\u00f6lkerung von 14,5%.

So kann man nicht rechnen. In einer diskriminierungsfreien Gesellschaft zu leben ist ein Ideal nach dem unseren Gesellschaft strebt, inbesondere auch im Rahmen der EU. Um was es hier geht, ist diesem Ideal n\u00e4her zu kommen, der Nutzen ist f\u00fcr die Gesamtgesellschaft, nicht nur f\u00fcr die Diskriminierten.

Und ich sehe diesen Nutzen durchaus auch ganz pers\u00f6nlich - ich finde es widerlich das Personen in der Gesellschaft in der ich lebe diskriminiert werden, auch wenn ich pers\u00f6nlich nicht diskriminiert werde. Rechts unten im Titelbild befindet sich der play-button. Keine Ahnung warum Deutschlandfunk den so idiotisch platziert...Vor allen Dingen w\u00fcrden sie nicht in Griechenland oder der T\u00fcrkei gestoppt - eine Ausreise kann man n\u00e4mlich kaum verhindern, sondern in Serbien oder anderswo im Balkan und w\u00fcrden dann dort stranden. Und das w\u00fcrde nicht nur eine humanit\u00e4re Katastrophe, sondern sehr wahrscheinlich auch eine politische, in der immer noch nicht vollst\u00e4ndig stabilisierten Balkanregion, herbeif\u00fchren. Du scheinst zu vergessen, dass wir ein Teil der EU und Europas sind. Und das Probleme in der EU und in Europa auch unsere Probleme sind. Und das nicht nur moralisch oder im Sinne der Europ\u00e4ischen Idee, sondern auch ganz real, wirtschaftlich und geopolitisch.Das ist sicher auch einer der Gr\u00fcnde: http://cdn.akamai.steamstatic.com/steamcommunity/public/images/avatars/64/64a2926797dbd6cb2914816c20ce9ea389b1c798_full.jpgRichtig. Und die Zustimmungsquote von Merkel ist ja auch nicht ins bodenlose Gefallen, wie sich das manche w\u00fcnschen, sondern hat sich etwas normalisiert, &gt;50% ist immer noch hervorragend. Das die Zustimmung etwas sinkt, wenn sie tats\u00e4chlich auch mal teilweise innenpolitisch und sichtbar, kontroverse Entscheidungen trifft, ist nicht \u00fcberraschend.&gt;Man muss immer wieder auch daran erinnern, dass Merkel mit ihrer Einladung im Fernsehen viele der Ankommenden erst "zu Fl\u00fcchtlingen gemacht" hat.

Das ist schlicht von den Zahlen her nicht gedeckt. \u00dcber die Mittelmeerroute kamen im August 140.000, im September 170.000 - ungef\u00e4hr der gleiche Anstieg wie all die Monate bevor Merkel irgendwas gesagt hatte. Die, die jetzt nach Deutschland kamen, waren zum gro\u00dfen Teil bereits auf dem Balkan in Europa unterwegs und dort w\u00e4re es sehr bald zu einer gr\u00f6\u00dferen humanit\u00e4ren und politischen Katastrophe gekommen. 

&gt;Sie sollte zur\u00fccktreten (anders geht nicht mehr), und der n\u00e4chste baut den Gegendruck wieder auf, dass hier eben nicht 100% der Grenz\u00fcberschreiter auch anerkannt und bleiben k\u00f6nnen.

Ein guter Teil dieser Grenz\u00fcberschreiter, hat das Recht (bzw. darf daf\u00fcr nicht bestraft werden) nach der Genfer Konvention die Grenze illegal zu \u00fcberschreiten, insofern er sich dann zeitnah bei den Beh\u00f6rden meldet. Nur wenn sie sich vorher in einem anderen Land, das angemessene Versorgung bietet, niedergelassen hatten, haben sie dieses Recht nicht mehr.

&gt;Sie dort zu versorgen w\u00e4re auch erheblich billiger gewesen, selbst mit Milit\u00e4reinsatz um eine sichere Zone aufzuspannen und 100% Vollversorgung durch uns bezahlt.

Ja, h\u00e4tten wir noch mehr in Jordanien, der T\u00fcrkei, Libanon, ... investiert (wo wir \u00fcbrigens auch schon recht gut gezahlt haben) h\u00e4tten wir jetzt weniger Fl\u00fcchtlinge in Europa. Aber wir haben nicht. Und andere haben noch viel weniger.

&gt;Nicht DIE L\u00f6sung, aber ein Teil davon w\u00e4re wenn die Dame aufh\u00f6ren k\u00f6nnte Willkommensbotschaften in die Welt zu senden und ihren Fehler da einzugestehen.

Merkel hat recht wenige "Willkommensbotschaften", zumindest wenn Du diese als Einladung verstehst, in die Welt gesendet. Man hat viel mehr alles, was sie gesagt hat, vollkommen verdreht. Die deutlichste "Einladung" die von ihr kam, ist dass Syrer, die \u00fcber Ungarn kommen, nicht nach Dublin-III zur\u00fcckgeschoben werden - das war seit Jahren regelm\u00e4\u00dfig nicht m\u00f6glich, und seit Mitte diesen Jahres \u00fcberhaupt nicht mehr. Und damit hat Merkel \u00fcberhaupt nichts zu tun, das haben deutschen und Europ\u00e4ische Gerichte aufgrund der humanit\u00e4ren und legalen Umst\u00e4nde in Ungarn (und auch Griechenland) so entschieden, die Orban zu einem ordentlichen Teil, wenn nicht herbeigef\u00fchrt, dann zumindest gef\u00f6rdert hat.Das ist schlicht eine falsche und un\u00fcbliche Auslegung, inbesondere bezogen auf Transit und "good cause". Aus dem Kommentar eines der bekanntesten Rechtsexperten^1 auf dem Gebiet ist z.B. (sorry in english):

&gt;__Summary and tentative conclusions regarding Article 31(1)__

&gt;100\. States party to the 1951 Convention/1967 Protocol undertake to accord certain standards of treatment to refugees, and to guarantee to them certain rights. _They necessarily undertake to implement those instruments in good faith._

&gt;101\. States have choice of means in implementing certain Convention provisions, such as Article 31, and may elect to use legislative incorporation, administrative regulation, informal and ad hoc procedures, or a combination thereof. Mere formal compliance is not itself sufficient to discharge a State\u2019s responsibility; the test is whether, in the light of domestic law and practice, including the exercise of administrative discretion, the State has attained the international standard of reasonable efficacy and efficient implementation of the treaty provisions concerned.

&gt;102\. _Particular attention needs to be paid to situations where the system of administration may produce results incompatible with the applicable principle or standard of international law._

&gt;103\. __Refugees are not required to have come directly from their country of origin.__ Article 31 was intended to apply, and has been interpreted to apply, _to persons who have briefly transited other countries,_ who are unable to find protection Article 31 of the 1951 Convention 34 from persecution in the first country or countries to which they flee, or __who have \u2018good cause\u2019 for not applying in such country or countries.__ The drafters only intended that immunity from penalty should not apply to refugees who had settled, temporarily or permanently, in another country.

&gt;104\. To come directly from the country in which the claimant has a well-founded fear of persecution is recognized in itself as \u2018good cause\u2019 for illegal entry. __To \u2018come directly\u2019 from such country via another country or countries in which he or she is at risk or in which generally no protection is available, is also accepted as \u2018good cause\u2019 for illegal entry.__ __Other factual circumstances, such as close family links in the country of refuge, may also constitute \u2018good cause\u2019. The criterion of \u2018good cause\u2019 is flexible enough to allow the elements of individual cases to be taken into account.__

&gt;105\. _\u2018Without delay\u2019 is a matter of fact and degree as well; it depends on the circumstances of the case, including the availability of advice._

&gt;106\. __Although expressed in terms of the \u2018refugee\u2019, Article 31(1) applies also to asylum seekers and \u2018presumptive refugees\u2019.__

&gt;107\. The practice of States as evidenced in their laws and in the decisions of tribunals and courts confirms this interpretation of the 1951 Convention. __States have also formally acknowledged both that refugees will often have good reason for moving on from countries of first refuge, and that circumstances may oblige
them to use False documents.__

&gt;108\. The term \u2018penalties\u2019 is not defined in Article 31, but includes prosecution, fine, imprisonment, and other restrictions on freedom of movement.

&gt;109\. Provisional detention is permitted if necessary for and limited to the purposes of preliminary investigation.

&gt;110\. __Article 31(1) obliges States parties specifically to take account of any claim to be a refugee entitled to its benefit.__ This responsibility can be engaged by voluntary act of the individual in making a claim for asylum/refugee status. It may also be engaged by an act of the State, for example, in asserting jurisdiction over the individual with a view to implementing immigration-related measures of control (such as removal or refusal of entry), or instituting immigration-related criminal proceedings (such as prosecution for the use of False travel documents).

&gt;111\. Where a State leaves compliance with international obligations within the realm of executive discretion, a policy and practice inconsistent with those obligations involves the international responsibility of the State. _The policy of prosecuting or otherwise penalizing illegal entrants, those present illegally, or those who use False travel documentation, without regard to the_ __circumstances of flight in individual cases, and the refusal to consider the merits of an applicant\u2019s claim, amount to a breach of a State\u2019s obligations in international law.__

&gt;112\. As a matter of principle, also, it should follow that a carrier should not be penalized for bringing in an \u2018undocumented\u2019 passenger, where that person is subsequently determined to be a refugee.

[highlighting by me]

http://www.unhcr.org/3bcfdf164.pdf

^1: https://www.law.ox.ac.uk/people/guy-s-goodwin-gill ; https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Guy_Goodwin-Gill&gt; F\u00fcr den Umgang mit Kriegsfl\u00fcchtlingen, der nicht auf dem GG sondern auf der Genfer Fl\u00fcchtlingskonvention basiert, gilt im Grunde das gleiche. Wer aus einem sicheren Drittstaat anreist, den kann man ohne \u00dcberpr\u00fcfung an der Landesgrenze abweisen.

Nein, dass kann man nicht. Man muss jeden Fall individuell pr\u00fcfen. Ich will nicht noch mal das ganze Zitat aus dem Kommentar zu Art.31 kopieren, also siehe: https://www.reddit.com/r/de/comments/3ok7ct/ausland_kopfsch%C3%BCtteln_%C3%BCber_merkel/cvy44v5Nicht nur das deutsche Recht hat G\u00fcltigkeit, sondern alle ratifizierten Vertr\u00e4ge sind g\u00fcltiges deutsches Recht und haben eingehalten zu werden. Und das internationale Vertragswerk / Recht ist vernetzt - ein Versto\u00df gegen die UN-Charter oder die Genfer Konvention w\u00e4re z.B. automatisch auch ein Versto\u00df gegen den EU-Vertrag.

Edit: Nat\u00fcrlich kann man Vertr\u00e4ge \u00e4ndern - dazu muss man aber recht oft alle Signatoren hinter sich haben - einfach so k\u00fcndigen kann man internationale Vertr\u00e4ge in sehr vielen F\u00e4llen nicht.Nur hat Merkel diese Leute \u00fcberhaupt nicht nach Europa gelockt. Im September kamen 40.000 mehr als im August nach Europa, die ungef\u00e4hr gleiche Steigerungsrate, wie wir sie seit dem Fr\u00fchjahr sehen. Es gibt schlicht keinen Merkel-Knick in der Statistik f\u00fcr Ankunften im Mittelmeerraum: http://data.unhcr.org/mediterranean/regional.phpGib den Hut doch mal in Reparatur - der scheint etwas undicht zu sein.Ist etwas \u00e4lter, und nur f\u00fcr wenige L\u00e4nder, aber f\u00fcr einen ersten Eindruck reicht es immer noch: http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/europe/chart-putins-popularity-reaches-86-but-how-does-it-compare-to-other-world-leaders-10075063.htmlEs ist auch nicht so, als ob die Mehrheit der Kriegfl\u00fcchtlinge \u00fcberhaupt dauerhaft bleiben will. Von den syrischen Fl\u00fcchtlingen wollen 68% nach Hause sobald der Krieg vorbei ist, und 90% irgendwann. 1 Million im Jahr = 10 Millionen w\u00fcrde bedeuten, dass Deutschland &gt;50% aller externen Fl\u00fcchtlinge weltweit aufnimmt.&gt;Die Kanzlerin h\u00e4tte das ja anfahren k\u00f6nnen. Das \u00e4ndert nichts an der Tatsache, dass man vom gleichen Geld ca. 20 mal mehr Leuten einfacher h\u00e4tte helfen k\u00f6nnen, wenn man sie in Lagern im Norden Syriens versorgt h\u00e4tte anstatt hier. Sie wollen doch m\u00f6glichst vielen Leuten helfen, oder?

Wir haben diese Lager unterst\u00fctzt und seit 4 Jahren zehntausende von dort nach Auswahl durch die UNHCR als Kontigentfl\u00fcchtlinge in Deutschland aufgenommen. Desweiteren vertritt Merkel - vermutlich aus moralischen aber auch geopolitischen Gr\u00fcnden - schon ein Weile eine Politik die wesentlich mehr auf Aussenpolitik im Interesse der Deutschlands und der EU, diplomatische Interventionspolitik und Entwicklungshilfe setzt. Da ich mich prim\u00e4r f\u00fcr internationale Politik interessiere, sehe ich von dieser Merkel vermutlich mehr - und in den letzten zwei Jahren hat das Team Merkel/Steinmeier viel geleistet. Ja, Deutschland wird dann verklagt werden, u.a. beim Europ\u00e4ischen Gerichtshof f\u00fcr Menschenrechte. Nat\u00fcrlich k\u00f6nnte man das dann auch einfach missachten... Man k\u00f6nnte dann auch gleich aus der UN, der OSZE, dem Europarat und der EU austreten.

Deutschland als Exportnation ist vermutlich das Land weltweit, das am meisten auf die Einhaltung von Vertr\u00e4gen angewiesen ist. Wenn wird uns nicht mehr an die Regeln halten, dann k\u00f6nnen wir es auch von anderen nicht fordern. Liberalismus im internationalen Raum, das Vertrauen auf die Einhaltung von Vertr\u00e4gen, ist etwas auf das Deutschland wirtschaftlich aber auch geopolitisch angewiesen ist. Wenn man dieses Vertrauen zerst\u00f6rt, kehrt man zur\u00fcck in eine Zeit der reinen Machtpolitik, der Anarchie im internationalen Raum und wirft damit auch alle Ideale Deutschlands oder der EU \u00fcber Bord.&gt;Da frag mal alle anderen Europ\u00e4er. 

Alle anderen? Ein paar L\u00e4nder haben in Relation mehr Fl\u00fcchtlinge aufgenommen als Deutschland.

&gt;Und internationales Recht wird von denen auch nicht gebrochen.

Ungarn bricht selbstverst\u00e4ndlich internationales und Europ\u00e4isches Recht.

Und nein, ein Wettbewerb, wer Fl\u00fcchtlinge am besten abschreckt, ist allein noch nicht immer ein Versto\u00df gegen internationales Recht, wenn man sie dann doch angemessen behandelt (f\u00fcr Ungarn k\u00f6nnten man durchaus einen Versto\u00df gegen Art.2 EU-Vertrag sehen, der nach Art. 7 sanktioniert werden kann). Dennoch ist es in einer Union, die auf Solidarit\u00e4t beruht und sich den Menschenrechten verschrieben hat, einfach nur sch\u00e4big. Die allermeisten dieser Fl\u00fcchtlinge waren bereits in Europa und m\u00fcssen irgendwo versorgt werden. Der Balkan kann dies nicht, also muss es jemand anders machen. Daf\u00fcr gibt es selbstverst\u00e4ndlich auch eine Regelung im zweiten EU-Vertrag, die bereits angewendet wurde f\u00fcr die Quote f\u00fcr die 160.000. Die Kommission beschlie\u00dft, wie in einem Fall einen gro\u00dfen Zustroms von Fl\u00fcchtlingen in ein EU-Land, dieses durch die anderen L\u00e4nder entlastet wird.&gt;Auch die Diskussion \u00fcber die Quote zur Fl\u00fcchtlingsverteilung war ziemlich eindeutig.

Und? Solch eine Ma\u00dfnahme / Quote ist Teil des FEU-Vertrages. Diese L\u00e4nder wurden demokratisch mit einer qualifizierten Mehrheit \u00fcberstimmt.Solange sich diese in Griechenland nicht niedergelassen haben, muss Ungarn alle Antr\u00e4ge individuell bearbeiten und pr\u00fcfen, ob diese einen guten Grund ("good cause") beinhalten weiter zu fliehen. Da die Umst\u00e4nde in Griechenland nach Urteilen des Europ\u00e4ischen Gerichtshofes nicht geeignet sind f\u00fcr Dublin Abschiebungen, ist eine solche Weiterflucht, zumindest im Rahmen der Genfer Konvention, legitimiert. Siehe auch den Kommentar zur Genfer Konvention den ich hier: https://www.reddit.com/r/de/comments/3ok7ct/ausland_kopfsch%C3%BCtteln_%C3%BCber_merkel/cvy44v5 in diesem thread zitiert habe.

Nun, die Alternative w\u00e4re eine humanit\u00e4re Katastrophe an der Ungarisch-Serbischen Grenzen, wahrscheinlich bald darauf an den kroatisch-serbischen, an der kroatisch slovenischen Grenze und auch tiefer im Balkan und in der Ukraine, gefolgt von Spannungen und vermutlich einer schwerwiegenden politischen Krise in diesem Teil Europas gewesen.

Was Merkel hier gemacht hat, ist die "kleinere Katastrophe" zu akzeptieren um eine sehr viel gr\u00f6\u00dfere menschliche, wirtschaftliche und geopolitische zu vermeiden. 

Nat\u00fcrlich war es ein grober Fehler f\u00fcr fast ein Jahr dem Druckaufbau in der Region, und f\u00fcr Jahre dem in Griechenland und Italien einfach zuzusehen, aber immerhin hat sie gerade noch rechtzeitig den St\u00f6psel gezogen. &gt;Auch wenn man den die Unmittelbarkeit freiz\u00fcgig auslegenden Standpunkt des UNHCR anwendet, liegt eine Unmittelbarkeit nicht vor, wenn es eine M\u00f6glichkeit gegeben h\u00e4tte, in einem Drittstaat zu bleiben. 

Hm, der etwas kurz geratene Kommentar (Guy S. Goodwin-Gill hat 30 Seiten Erl\u00e4uterungen vor der Conclusio und Zusammenfassung) sagt grunds\u00e4tzlich genau dasselbe in Bezug auf diesen Punkt, wie der von mir zitierte auch - nur eine Beendigung der Flucht - eine Niederlassung in einem anderen Land, oder eine tats\u00e4chliche Asylgew\u00e4hrung steht der straffreien irregul\u00e4ren Einreise in ein weiteres Land entgegen.

&gt;&gt;&gt;Auch der vor\u00fcbergehende Aufenthalt in einem \u201csicheren Drittstaat\u201d iSd Art. 16a Abs. 2 Grundgesetz unterbricht nicht notwendigerweise die Unmittelbarkeit der Einreise in das Zufluchtsland. _Die Verfasser der GFK f\u00fchrten den Begriff \u201cunmittelbar kommen\u201d nicht ein, um diejenigen, die durch ein anderes Land gereist waren, von dem Anwendungsbereich der Vorschrift auszuschlie\u00dfen,_ __sondern diejenigen, die sich in
einem anderen Land bereits vor\u00fcbergehend niedergelassen hatten__. __Das hei\u00dft, entscheidend ist nicht, ob der Asylsuchende in dem Drittland h\u00e4tte Schutz finden k\u00f6nnen, sondern, ob seine Flucht in dem Drittstaat eine gewisse Beendigung gefunden hat.__ _Denn dann ist dem Schutzsuchenden zuzumuten, bei der Einreise in einen weiteren Staat die entsprechenden Einreisevorschriften zu beachten._ __Die
Auffassung, einem Fl\u00fcchtling k\u00f6nne schon die blo\u00dfe M\u00f6glichkeit, in einem Drittland Schutz zu suchen, entgegengehalten werden, fand in den Verhandlungen zur Annahme der GFK keine Mehrheit.__ Die Staatenbevollm\u00e4chtigten waren der Ansicht, dass eine derartige Behauptung jeder Staat erheben k\u00f6nne und bef\u00fcrchteten, dass
Art. 31 GFK auf diese Weise ausgehebelt werden k\u00f6nnte. _Es liegt daher nahe, zur Auslegung des Begriffes der \u201cUnmittelbarkeit\u201d der Einreise analog die Grunds\u00e4tze heranzuziehen, die das BVerwG zur Fluchtbeendigung im Rahmen der Pr\u00fcfung des anderweitigen Verfolgungsschutzes (\u00a7 27 AsylVfG) entwickelt hat. Hiernach kommt es darauf an, dass die Flucht in einen Drittstaat_ __\u201cstation\u00e4ren Charakter\u201d__ _angenommen hat_. Hat der Fl\u00fcchtling jedoch den Aufenthalt im Drittland allerdings grundlos verz\u00f6gert, ist der Fl\u00fcchtling nicht mehr \u201cunmittelbar\u201d iSd Art. 31 Abs. 1 GFK eingereist. Ob eine grundlose Verz\u00f6gerung des Aufenthalts im Drittland vorlag, sollte angesichts der Vielzahl von m\u00f6glichen Fluchtschicksalen __einzelfallbezogen beurteilt werden__. Eine strenge zeitliche Limitierung ist daher nach Auffassung des UNHCR nicht angebracht. 

oder aus der Zusammenfassung:

&gt;&gt;&gt;Art. 31 Abs. 1 GFK ist nur anwendbar, wenn der Fl\u00fcchtling unmittelbar aus dem Verfolgerstaat eingereist ist. __Die Einreise aus einem sicheren Drittstaat unterbricht allerdings nicht notwendigerweise die Unmittelbarkeit der Einreise, solange die Flucht dort nicht bereits beendet wurde oder der Fl\u00fcchtling den Aufenthalt im Drittland nicht
grundlos verz\u00f6gert hat.__ Die illegale Einreise unter Mithilfe von Schleusern schlie\u00dft die Anwendbarkeit der Vorschrift nicht aus. Art. 31 Abs. 1 GFK erfordert weiterhin, dass der Fl\u00fcchtling sich unverz\u00fcglich bei den Beh\u00f6rden meldet. Ob eine unverz\u00fcgliche Meldung vorliegt, kann nur einzelfallbezogen beurteilt werden. Entscheidend ist, dass der Fl\u00fcchtling die Meldung nicht schuldhaft verz\u00f6gert hat. 

.

Also:

&gt;Auch wenn man den die Unmittelbarkeit freiz\u00fcgig auslegenden Standpunkt des UNHCR anwendet, liegt eine Unmittelbarkeit nicht vor, wenn es eine M\u00f6glichkeit gegeben h\u00e4tte, in einem Drittstaat zu bleiben.


Der Text sagt genau das Gegenteil: "Die Auffassung, einem Fl\u00fcchtling k\u00f6nne schon die blo\u00dfe M\u00f6glichkeit, in einem Drittland Schutz zu suchen, entgegengehalten werden, fand in den Verhandlungen zur Annahme der GFK keine Mehrheit."

Somit ist es nicht: die M\u00f6glichkeit hatten, sondern: die M\u00f6glichkeit wahrgenommen hatten als - zumindest tempor\u00e4re - Niederlassung (die \u00fcber das zur Fl\u00fcchtfortsetzung notwendige hinausgeht), oder als Asylantrag und Gew\u00e4hrung. 

Und das ist nicht der einzige Grund - da ist auch noch der "good cause", darunter f\u00e4llt z.B. auch der Wunsch im selben Land wie Verwandte Zuflucht zu finden, darunter fallen aber auch sehr viele andere Gr\u00fcnde.

Und nur das keine Missverst\u00e4ndnisse aufkommen - ich habe auf: "Artikel 31 der Genfer Fl\u00fcchtlingskonvention erlaubt nur den Grenz\u00fcbertritt zur Flucht vor unmittelbarer Verfolgung. Sp\u00e4testens in der T\u00fcrkei ist diese nicht mehr gegeben." geantwortet. Nat\u00fcrlich sagt Art.31(1) nichts dar\u00fcber aus, ob z.B. Dublin-III Abschiebungen m\u00f6glich sind, es sagt nur etwas \u00fcber die Straffreiheit der illegalen Grenz\u00fcbertritte. Und diese liegt f\u00fcr einen Fl\u00fcchtling i.d.R. vor, bis er seine Flucht zu einem gewissen Grade beendet hat.&gt;Ja wir sind Teil von Europa. Aber Europa ist kein einheitliches Wirtschaftssystem. Wir sind finanziell alle voneinander getrennt. Die T\u00fcrkei geh\u00f6rt nebenbei gesagt nicht einmal zu Europa.

Der Gro\u00dfteil der Fl\u00fcchtlinge, war bereits in Europa - auf dem Balkan, entweder in Griechenland oder Bulgarien, oder in einem Bereich, der komplett von der EU umgeben ist. Und nat\u00fcrlich ist Europa kein vollst\u00e4ndig einheitlicher Wirtschaftsraum, aber insbesondere die EU ist ein eng vernetzter Wirtschaftsraum voller Abh\u00e4ngigkeiten auch in die umgebende Region und dar\u00fcberhinaus, gibt es unz\u00e4hlige Obligationen zur Hilfe der EU Staaten untereinander.

&gt;Wirtschaftlich und geopolitisch. Mit Wirtschaftlich bringst du es auf den Punkt. Warum tun wir uns das wirtschaftlich an?

Weil es ganz klar billiger ist, als eine humanit\u00e4re oder politische Katastrophe auf dem Balkan. Gerade verglichen mit dem zweiten sind die Kosten f\u00fcr "die paar" Fl\u00fcchtlinge peanuts.

&gt;Warum machen wir leichtfertig Fehler, f\u00fcr die noch unsere Enkel bezahlen m\u00fcssen?

Warum sollten unsere Enkel daf\u00fcr bezahlen sollen? Wer jetzt kommt, kommt erstmal als Fl\u00fcchting, und die tendieren dazu, zur Mehrheit das Land auch wieder zu verlassen (von den Syrern wollen 68% gleich wenn der Krieg vorbei ist nach Hause und 90% irgendwann). Ich zahle heute nichts mehr f\u00fcr Bosnien-Fl\u00fcchtlinge, davon hatten wir auch 350.000 in Deutschland (abgesehen davon, dass diese, zumindest in meinem Bundesland, ingesamt wirtschaftsf\u00f6rderlich waren).

Mit den jetztigen Zahlen rechne ich f\u00fcr die Zukunft nicht mit mehr als einer syrischen (und afghanischen) Diapora von wenigen hunderttausend in Deutschland.

Wenn es Dir um unsere Enkel geht, dann solltest Du lieber z.B. auf die Durchsetzung z.B. der Agenda 2030 pochen, und auf die Einhaltung und St\u00e4rkung auch des internationalen, auch humanit\u00e4ren, Rechts. Die Fl\u00fcchtlingsstr\u00f6me die wir jetzt sehen sind l\u00e4cherlich gegen das, was wir ansonsten in den kommenden Jahrzehnten sehen werden.Ah gut, wunderbar, lasst uns politische Gegner doch mal wieder in die Gulacks [sic] oder in KZs stecken, das war doch so sch\u00f6n. Aber w\u00e4re es nicht regional passender die "Volksverr\u00e4ter" und das "Lumpenpack" nach Bautzen zu w\u00fcnschen? Aber wer findet da jetzt 'nen guten Reim mit 'autzen?Oder auch nicht. Ich denke hier wird die falsche Unterscheidung zwischen rechts &lt;&gt; links gemacht und nicht zwischen Autorit\u00e4r/Totalit\u00e4r/Kollektivistisch &lt;&gt; Liberal/Anarchistisch. Die Autorit\u00e4ren sind heute meistens in der Lage recht gut miteinander auszukommen, und vertreten oft dieselben abstrusen Theorien und haben viele gemeinsame Freund- und Feindbilder. Noch wichtiger ist aber - die Fu\u00dfv\u00f6lker dieser Gruppen haben alle die gleiche sentimentale/emotionale Grundhaltung, wenn man die ganzen ideologischen Dekorationen entfernt. Sie wollen gemeinsame gegen oder f\u00fcr irgend jemand br\u00fcllen, irgendwen am n\u00e4chsten Baum aufh\u00e4ngen, in einem Kollektiv aufgehen, anderen vorschreiben wie und ob sie zu leben haben, ...  Ob die jetzt Kulacken, Langnasen, Sozialisten oder Demokraten an den Galgen w\u00fcnschen, ob das Kollektiv das deutsche Volk oder die Kommunisten sind, macht keinen gro\u00dfen Unterschied.

Ich vermute viele dieser Menschen w\u00e4ren recht schnell aktive Unterst\u00fctzer der autorit\u00e4ren, kollektivistischen Regimes gewesen, und zwar v\u00f6llig egal von welchem.Oh, ich vermisse das. In meiner Kindheit durften wir noch sch\u00f6ne Packerl aus dem Altpapier schn\u00fcren. Und jetzt? Einfach ungeordnet ab in die Tonne. Hin und wieder mache ich immer noch Packerl bevor ich sie in die Tonne werfe, das hat etwas sehr befriedigendes an sich - dann erkenne ich aber doch wie unsinnig das eigentlich ist...Ich fand es sch\u00f6n, wie wir als Kinder mit dem Leiterwagen, die ganzen Packerl die wir geschn\u00fcrt hatten, und auch ein paar geschenkte von den Nachbarn zum Altpapierh\u00e4ndler bringen und uns dann ein Eis oder S\u00fc\u00dfigkeiten kaufen konnten. 

Und wenn es keine Kinder wie uns in der Nachbarschaft gab, gemeinn\u00fctzige Organisationen haben die Packerl auch alle paar Wochen abgeholt.In Germany &gt;&gt;5% of the flats and houses are currently unused. If only a fraction of them is used for refugees, not many new ones have to be built.

http://de.statista.com/statistik/daten/studie/258767/umfrage/totale-leerstandsquote-von-wohnungen-nach-bundeslaendern/

https://www.destatis.de/DE/ZahlenFakten/GesellschaftStaat/EinkommenKonsumLebensbedingungen/Wohnen/Tabellen/Leerstandsquote.htmlWhich are those German indigenous peoples? Germany has been the melting pot of Europe for millenniums...Yeah, this is a Erstaufnahmeeinrichtung = reception center, the refugees are not meant to stay there for longer as 3-6 months.The Reception center will only be there, as long as it is needed. And it is not connected to settling refugees there, but to temporarily house them for 3-6 months.Temporary means in the context of a reception center 3-6 months.&gt; I don't listen to those they are all generally crap

Our public news radio stations are amongst the best ones world wide,  - in particular Deutschlandfunk and Deutschlandradio, but also the many regional ones."in doubt left" (im zweifel links) is a regular op-ed in the Spiegel, and clearly not the Spiegel's agenda, but only Jacob Augstein's.Yeah, it's temporary for the refugees, because it is only a reception center, they'll only stay there for 3-6 months. And it's temporary for the village, because of the unsuitable location, if it's not needed anymore, there won't be a reception center in this village anymore.Using an else abandoned building for an emergency measure as a reception center to house the refugees over the winter, instead of leaving them out in the cold in tents, is no fascism.&gt;changing the demographic face \u00f6f a place extremely like this irreversible then call it humanism. 

A temporary emergency measure to house refugees is an irreversible change of the demography? Neither individual refugees will stay there for longer than 6 months, nor will this _reception center_ exist there for a long time, it's in an completely unsuitable location.The law violation can't be persecuted, because the Geneva convention forbids to prosecute or threaten refugees for illegally crossing the border, if they are still on the flight (it doesn't matter how many countries they crossed before) or if they have another good cause for doing so. The only thing that makes it clearly punishable is if they _settled_ in another safe country before.I don't see that Merkel now supports multiculturalism. Did she say anything new about that? In the past she was clearly opposed to that idea and I don't think that changed.Man sollte nicht vergessen, dass wir gleichzeitig bei Wohngeb\u00e4uden und Wohnungen eine Leerstandsquote von &gt;&gt;5% haben.Well no - in all three cases:

are people protesting against it: Yes, fringe groups do for some time, they are related to right wing and far right parties. Those are no mass protests and they are also regional.

are opposition parties fighting against said policy: Yes, but none of the parties in the parliament, but the CSU, which is the party having a Union with Merkels party - so you can't really call that opposition.

Is the acceptance of merkel and her party from the voters crashing down?: Hers was going down, the one of the party didn't much. And crashing, well clearly no. She is now down from 64% to 54% approval rate, still one of the highest ones of any democratic leader. In Britain e.g. Cameron's rate at 41% is still called high, How long it is needed is a completely different question. Now it is needed for the winter, everybody knows that this is a bad location, but a necessary decision in an emergency situation. It's very unlikely that it is used for very long.

The 3-6 months are in my second sentence, this is about how long individual refugees will stay there - and that's 3-6 months - it's only a reception center. 

&gt;when there is no indication that the flow of refugees is stopping anytime soon?

Stopping - probably no. Getting much smaller - yes, pretty sure, pretty soon. The laws are currently getting changed, regulations on the EU and international level also, the countries taking the highest burden now finally have the chance to get more support. You may have a wrong impression of German politics and of Merkel, what she does in difference to others, is finally viewing the refugee crisis as a European and not a Greek, Serbian, Hungarian, German problem, and she liked to take pressure in particular out of the Balkan region and prevent a humanitarian and political catastrophe there - this was about people who are already in Europe, and about a pragmatic and humane solution for a common problem, that only would get worse by doing nothing (what she also did for much to long). About closing the entry points into the EU and Europe she is just another conservative, she also isn't opposed to the idea of transit zones or of having places of refuge outside the EU. About viewing problems more on a European and global scale than on a national one, she is likely not very conservative, but well, correct. The world has gotten much smaller in the last few decades, and if we don't put much effort into programs like the Agenda 2030, we'll probably will see refugee flow some orders of magnitude above what we see now. No, they are no immigrants but refugees, which either want to transit or ask for asylum in a country, and their staying in the country is legal if they soon after crossing the border report themselves to the authorities. Only the border crossing itself is formally illegal, but not allowed to be punished, or be threatened for with punishment.Reading the first half of the headline, I thought, wtf. did these assholes now really put 190 buildings in Berlin on fire :DWulff said this sentence, Merkel said about the same some time later and in another context. None of both said "True".

And well, sure the Islam is a part of Germany, &gt;4 million Muslims are living in Germany, 1-1.8 million of them are German citizens - do you think they are not a part of Germany, and that Merkel is not also the Chancellor of those citizens? At the same time she demanded integration, obeying to the laws and fundamental values, and clearly no multiculturalism or cultural relativism.Was ich so an Leerstand sehe (das ist nat\u00fcrlich \u00fcberhaupt nicht repr\u00e4sentativ) selbst selbst hier im reichen Teil des Westens sind gro\u00dfteils altere H\u00e4user oder Mietwohnungen, durchaus im mittleren oder unteren Segment einzuordnen und oft renovierungsbed\u00fcrftig. Ein Grund f\u00fcr den Leerstand sind oft auch teilweise \u00fcberzogene Anforderungen an die energetische Sanierung^1, die eine Renovierung f\u00fcr viele Vermieter, gerade im unteren Preissegment, wenig lukrativ scheinen lassen und die deshalb Renovierung und Vermietung auf die lange Bank geschoben haben. In dem Bereich ist man gerade dabei die Regeln etwas zu lockern - da k\u00f6nnte es also bald einen gr\u00f6\u00dferen Markt geben.

^1: ich halte das grunds\u00e4tzlich durchaus f\u00fcr sinnvoll - wenn man aber die Anforderung so hoch ansetzt, und sie im Falle jeder relevanten Renovierung oder Sanierung strikt einzuhalten sind und damit viel mehr gemacht werden muss, als man eigentlich wollte, dann f\u00fchrt das oft auch dazu, dass \u00fcberhaupt nicht mehr saniert wird.Niedersachsen is not some region in rural eastern Germany.&gt;Step 1: Only take a number of migrants that you can actually house and integrate.

For immigrants - yes. For refugees this is just not possible. We have to shelter as many as need shelter and didn't get it somewhere else. Also not all refugees can or want to be integrated - we still have to shelter them as long as they need. 

&gt;Step 2: Spend the money it takes for language courses and education to make sure these people do integrate

There are strong efforts to do that.

&gt;Or we can just take everybody and have them live in nice, ethnic gethos without learning German. Thats Merkels current plan.

No, Merkel's plan - in opposite like it was done ever before in Germany - is to integrate refugees from very early on, no matter if they want to stay or go home again. In the past we isolated refugees pretty much from the society, and clearly said, we don't want to integrate them, because that may build too many ties for people who are meant to leave Germany as soon as possible again.

So what you ask for, is more like "Merkel's plan", than any policy about refugees in Germany ever was.&gt;How do you think is the integration and language training going to work here?: 

&gt;https://www.reddit.com/r/europe/comments/3oomkj/german_village_of_100_to_house_1000_refugees/[1]

&gt;And if you think this is an isolated case, why arent these people brought to one of the nice, urban areas with better infrastructure and better education possibilities then?

This article is about a reception center, not a long term refugee shelter, integration starts after people leave these centers in not more than 3-6 months.We had 284,000 people without a home in 2012, but only 24,000 really slept rough.

&gt;Shouldn't they be used for homeless Germans before they are given to homeless foreigners?

Everybody in Germany who has no home, and has a right to stay here (what is not the case for illegal immigrants or some EU immigrants staying too long without financial means), can get a place by his city to live in, either in a shelter, a pension or a flat. The cities are obliged by the law to provide a shelter or home for every involuntary homeless, and they do. It's Germany, not the US.&gt;Dont prosecute or threaten. Get finger prints or DNA or retna scan and then explain the rules that they have to register in another country.

About this was done? For Hungary and Greece we can't anymore because the legal and humanitarian conditions there are too bad (this was ruled in numerous cases by the ECHR and the German courts), but in principle this is exactly Dublin-III. It has no direct relation to punishment for illegal border crossing of refugees - if they didn't settle in another country and are still fleeing, they can't be punished for that according to the Geneva Convention Art. 31(1).&gt;You're talking about "if", but that's going to happen come Spring - already there is talk of closing the border and just letting each country deal with whoever is currently in them.

The "old EU" won't close the borders - not only because we don't like to, but because it's nearly impossible, many of these borders never were really closed, also not before Schengen. The only working solution is to fight against the reasons for the flights and to close the borders to the EU/Europe. When they are in the EU it's too late - we have to care for them. And we should do that together in solidarity and not like it happens to some degree already in the East. This is indign, indecent, anti-European, and doesn't help to deal with this shared crisis at all.As unreliable as the numbers are currently I could say yes or no. Family reunification never changed that much in the past, it were never more that a third to half in addition. Maybe this time it is more, maybe the law will be changed - idk. - but it won't make 5% out of 1%. If you include future developments like this, you'd also to include things like e.g. guessing when the war in Syria will end, we also just don't know now. If it'll end in the next few years, and at least a part of Syria will be safe again, most of the Syrian refugees will have to go home.800,000 accepted. This is a very high estimate for new entries this year.

Also we don't know how underestimated it is. If I sum up the numbers we have so far, we were somewhere between  ~650,000 and ~1,000,000 about a week ago, with the first number being too low for sure, and the second being too high pretty sure. But these are registrations and preliminary registrations, not people who got a permit of any kind.&gt;because people may not have the means to go back on their own anyways.

_or supported (this means, he gets a ticket payed, and depending on the program also moving his stuff home and so on)_ - this seem to be the most common way to depart if somebody is ordered to leave. If they don't take this chance, they'll be deported.To finally end world hunger would cost $30-$50 billion (UN-estimate) a year for some decades, that's anything but a big deal for the developed world together, it's a shame that we didn't do that long ago already. And many of the other topics are also not. I think the Agenda 2030 would be doable, if we really want it. We already got ~200 million out of hunger (and even more out of extreme poverty) in the last 10 years, and prevented millions from starving - and that with everybody paying much less than promised. 

&gt;If only we could just tax every problem away... but that simply isn't realistic.

It's pretty realistic. For most such questions, it's just a lie, that we can't, because we don't want to take the responsibility for having decided it. All the problems I mentioned are just a question of will. We are able to. And sure it's not only taxes, but also a deep restructuring of the societies.

The US was able to lead the Iraq war. This costed as much as more than seventy years of feeding all hungry on the planet. And we don't even need seventy years, because these UN-programs are focused on being sustainable. So there would've been probably enough left to eradicate also extreme poverty. So what's our priority?Well, I commented about my interest in a sentimental and personal way, but I could also answer in a more world politics way.

I didn't mention the "Transforming Our World: The 2030 Agenda" without a reason, I think most of the 17 Sustainable Development Goals are necessary to make the world as we know it sustainable to at least some degree. If we don't put much effort into that, we'll either lose everything we have, or all values and moral standards we have - most of our culture and end in a terrible dystopia.

I was surprised that our World leaders this time put the goals even more ambitious than the MDGs.

&gt;That's noble, but it'll all have to come from somewhere...

We are by far productive enough to not have hunger, extreme poverty in the world (in my other follow up comment, I explain some numbers), and we are also productive enough to have no poverty in Germany. For the second I would suggest a unconditional basic income well above the poverty line, enough for a decent life, but in exchange, remove many restrictions of the labor market, in particular any kind of minimum wage. If you don't like that model - if we would just give everybody on welfare 100 Euro /month more, it would cost for every worker on average 25 Euro (as always taxed progressive), if we let only the 10% with the highest income pay, it would be on average 250 Euro / month, but they earn about a quarter of all income, so they can also easily afford that.

&gt;How far are you prepared to let your own life standard drop to help save the world from it's many injustices?

I think this is the wrong question - I would be willing to pay much - but I don't think this would even be necessary. The pretty stunning fact is, that to address all these problems, is pretty cheap, and it wouldn't harm our life style much. For the example the world hunger - we can afford this easily. If all EU citizens would pay, it would cost $60-$100 a year, for Germans alone, $375-$500 Euro a year - less than a Euro a day for all Germans, less then 2 Euro a day for every working German.

Ready, for much, but I wouldn't need that much - I live pretty sustainable already and just don't spend much of the money. I don't need new stuff all the time and use the old one, until I can't repair it anymore. I still have no flat TV, the old one is still working (but well, for this tube TV, there's now a point reached, where I probably will throw something working away.). I spend much money when I buy things, I try to buy things that I like, that'll work as long as possible and are easy to repair. So in the end, I live pretty cheap but still very comfortable.

&gt;Where does it stop?  Are you willing to give half of the mantle away, like St. Martin? 

Idk. I never had to.

&gt;Do you have any children?

No.

&gt;But it's never going to get to that point, right?

For the refugees? No. As long as they are not one of our European neighbors, we won't take that many that we get into serious troubles. 

&gt;We'll just keep on keeping on, like Mutti tells us, after all, we can handle that...

Oh, Merkel acted in a pretty realist and good way here (for humanitarian and geopolitical reasons, but also for the interests of Germany and the EU). How she said things backfired - I am not sure who to blame there. But she is clearly to blame at least as much as all other European politicians to let this crisis develop until this point. We had warnings for years now, and at least in early summer this year it got clear, that an immediate reaction is needed.Yes, so far there was nearly every year a stop of deportations for the winter months. This time it won't. 

Just a small correction, it's not the districts/counties which decide about that, but this is decided on the federal and state level.&gt;Darling...your math is incorrect. Multiply the number by a large, allowable under "strict" EU policy, family reunification quota (I believe max 8 people). 

There is no absolute number of 8 or something, it's as many as fall under the regulation; family reunification in Germany in generally only for the core family, this is the spouse and children below 16 (with some little restrictions below 18). This is on average far less than 8. Afaik there is no EU-regulation for this, if there is, it can only be stricter than the German one. I don't know the law for other individual European countries. 

The ones you see on TV or in interviews, which like to get other family members to Germany, e.g. elderly parents, are trying to do this e.g. by working and sending money to them to pay traffickers. 

Then there is also the so called "Familiennachzug" - this is only for people who can fully and sustainable pay and provide living space for the relatives and they have to invite them - this is normally not used by refugees, but e.g. by guest workers, after they worked and settled for some years.

&gt;In addition, you're gong to see birth rate in migrant/Muslim "centers" explode.

The birth rate in Syria is down to 3 (already before the war), and it is still going down. More that in European countries, but not what many people might imagine. And well, that the birth rate explodes in the centers is very unlikely, because the ratio of (alone travelling) women is pretty low. And women are the restricting factor for births.Was w\u00e4re denn eine grunds\u00e4tzliche Alternative zu Schiedsgerichten, die nicht nur die Bezeichnung \u00e4ndert?

&gt; I guess the belts are specific for a certain kind of washing machine. 

Most often these are standard parts. But to order a standard one, or have one made, you need to know the exact specifications or find them in a shop like this: http://www.keilriemenexpress.de/keilriemen/poly-v-riemen-keilrippenriemen/rippenband-waschmaschinen-trockner.htmlNo, I am also. 

But it got already much better, in my youth all shops closed at 18:30 on week days, on Saturdays at 16:00 or 14:00. On Wednesday often already at 13:00. And then we got the "langen Donnerstag" (long Thursday), and they were allowed to open until 20:30 one day a week... Do you speak German? This is what the mayors of the 30 biggest cities in Germany tell: http://www.spiegel.de/panorama/gesellschaft/fluechtlinge-in-deutschland-umfrage-unter-buergermeistern-a-1058507.html - the translation of the title is "Germany's mayors are relaxed / calm". And they know the situation on the ground very well.&gt;When we talk of the constiutional right to asylum, we are dealing with a number in the thousands, not the millions of migrants which are flooding into Germany.

We are also obliged by the Geneva Convention.

&gt;Note also that the majority of asylum seekers are rejected, but nonetheless are never deported from Germany.

This is wrong. Of the ones who get denied asylum, many are still legally allowed to stay and sure they are not deported. There are many other reasons for that, beside the right of political asylum. E.g. &gt;1000 Syrians and &gt;1000 Afghans, who got denied political asylum in 2014 are still in Germany, and well, there status is completely legal. 

&gt;But migrants on the other hand are much more likely to commit crimes, including murder. Here are the statistics:

1. The stats you quote is for foreigners, not for migrants - this includes people not living in Germany at all.

2. This is the number of suspects, not the number convicted or  the number of crimes or victims. E.g. in 2014 we had "only" 624 victims of murders and manslaughters, not something in the region of 6000.

3. If you include the social status, foreigners are not prominent anymore. Uneducated and poor Germans from the fringes of the society commit about the same rate of crimes as their foreign counterparts. From your source: "Wenn man den Faktor soziale Lage statistisch herausrechnet, also die Kriminalit\u00e4tsrate von in Deutschland wohnhaften Ausl\u00e4ndern und Inl\u00e4ndern nur jeweils innerhalb derselben Schicht vergleicht, dann sind in Deutschland wohnhafte Ausl\u00e4nder sogar insgesamt weniger kriminell."

&gt;Another source on that page[3] shows that Arabs are the main culprit and are extremely over represened in the crime figures, followed by Turks, then Muslims from the Balkans are far behind. Other immigrants commit very little crime.

This is a stat for Berlin, not for Germany and it is only about "Intensivt\u00e4ter". This is a very small group.

&gt;In short, that poster is completely wrong. Importing arabs is importing crime, and the crimes of the far right are MUCH smaller.

Well, since 1990 there were at least 292 people killed in Germany with a right wing motivation. According to a review of 3300 crimes in which people were killed after the NSU-affair, by the Bundeskriminalamt, they found around 600 (some of them with more than one victim) new cases, which raise suspicions for a right wing motivation. &gt;Eh... you might've forgoten the 2004 Madrid bombings with 191 deaths.. or the 2005 London bombings with 56 deaths, the charlie hebdo attacks with 12 deaths ..

Since 1990 alone between 292 and ~1000 people got killed in Germany by right wing extremism. &gt;no they didn't. They choose to embrace a death cult instead of working hard like other minorities.

30% of them are ethnic German converts. They weren't part of a minority. This is a terrible youth movement, and not a part of the culture of the immigrants. &gt;Nah... the real problem is when the war is over and people start calling for the refugees to return home. Right now is just foreplay.

How big was that problem in the 1990's? We had also &gt;1 million refugees back then and e.g. of 350,000 Bosnians all but 20,000 left until 2000, most of them voluntarily and supported.Please read up your facts and numbers.

&gt;It won't be 800k this year, probably 1,5 Million or roughly 2% of your population. And whats going to happen next year?

We are now at between 650,000 to just above 1,000,000 with the first number being too low and the second probably too high. I don't think we'll get additional 50% until the end of the year.

&gt;There have been about 400k asylum applications within 40 days in germany, whats going to happen if that rate continues?

We got about 40,000 applications for asylum in September, officially registered by the BAMF in the EASY system were 164,000. The 400,000 for the 40 days are preliminary registrations by the states, including double registrations and people which left Germany again to the north.

&gt;And what about their families, if the people that come this year get to bring their families it will be up to several millions.

In the past family reunification brought between a four